ATTACK OF 
THE MUTANT 


Goosebumps - 25 
R.L. Stine 



1 


“Hey—put that down!” 

I grabbed the comic book from Wilson Clark’s hand and smoothed out the 
plastic cover. 

“I was only looking at it,” he grumbled. 

“If you get a fingerprint on it, it will lose half its value,” I told him. I 
examined the cover through the clear wrapper. “This is a Silver Swan Number 
Zero,” I said. “And it’s in mint condition.” 

Wilson shook his head. He has curly, white-blond hair and round, blue eyes. 
He always looks confused. 

“How can it be Number Zero?” he asked. “That doesn’t make any sense, 
Skipper.” 

Wilson is a really good friend of mine. But sometimes I think he dropped 
down from the planet Mars. He just doesn’t know anything. 

I held up the Silver Swan cover so he could see the big zero in the corner. 
“That makes it a collector’s item,” I explained. “Number Zero comes before 
Number One. This comic is worth ten times as much as Silver Swan Number 
One.” 

“Huh? It is?” Wilson scratched his curly hair. He squatted down on the floor 
and started pawing through my carton of comic books. “How come all your 
comics are in these plastic bags, Skipper? How can you read them?” 

See? I told you. Wilson doesn’t know anything. 

“Read them? I don’t read them,” I replied. “If you read them, they lose their 
value.” 

He stared up at me. “You don’t read them?” 

“I can’t take them out of the bag,” I explained. “If I open the bag, they 
won’t be in mint condition anymore.” 

“Ooh. This one is cool!” he exclaimed. He pulled up a copy of Star Wolf. 
“The cover is metal!” 

“It’s worthless,” I mumbled. “It’s a second printing.” 

He stared at the silvery cover, turning it in his hands, making it shine in the 
light. “Cool,” he muttered. His favorite word. 

We were up in my room, about an hour after dinner. The sky was black 



outside my double windows. It gets dark so early in winter. Not like on the 
Silver Swan’s planet, Orcos III, where the sun never sets and all the superheroes 
have to wear air-conditioned costumes. 

Wilson came over to get the math homework. He lives next door, and he 
always leaves his math book at school—so he always comes over to get the 
homework from me. 

“You should collect comic books,” I told him. “In about twenty years, these 
will be worth millions.” 

“I collect rubber stamps,” he said, picking up a Z-Squad annual. He studied 
the sneaker ad on the back cover. 

“Rubber stamps?” 

“Yeah. I have about a hundred of them,” he said. 

“What can you do with rubber stamps?” I asked. 

He dropped the comic back into the carton and stood up. “Well, you can 
stamp things with them,” he said, brushing off the knees of his jeans. “I have 
different-colored ink pads. Or you can just look at them.” 

He is definitely weird. 

“Are they valuable?” I asked. 

He shook his head. “I don’t think so.” He picked up the math sheet from the 
foot of my bed. “I’d better get home, Skipper. See you tomorrow.” 

He started for the door and I followed him. Our reflections stared out at us 
from my big dresser mirror. Wilson is so tall and skinny and blond and blue¬ 
eyed. I always feel like a dark, chubby mole next to him. 

If we were in a comic book, Wilson would be the superhero, and I would be 
his sidekick. I’d be the pudgy, funny one who was always messing up. 

It’s a good thing life isn’t a comic book—right? 

As soon as Wilson left, I turned back to my dresser. My eye caught the big 
computer banner above the mirror: Skipper Matthews, Alien Avenger. 

My dad had someone at his office print out the banner for me for my 
twelfth birthday a few weeks ago. 

Beneath the banner, I have two great posters tacked on the wall on both 
sides of the dresser. One is a Jack Kirby Captain America. It’s really old and 
probably worth about a thousand dollars. 

The other one is newer—a Spawn poster by Todd McFarlane. It’s really 
awesome. 

In the mirror, I could see the excited look on my own face as I hurried to the 



dresser. 

The flat brown envelope waited for me on the dressertop. 

Mom and Dad said I couldn’t open it until after dinner, after I finished my 
homework. But I couldn’t wait. 

I could feel my heart start to pound as I stared down at the envelope. 

I knew what waited inside it. Just thinking about it made my heart pound 
even harder. 

I carefully picked up the envelope. I had to open it now. I had to. 



2 


Carefully, carefully, I tore the flap on the envelope. Then I reached inside and 
pulled out the treasure. 

This month’s issue of The Masked Mutant. 

Holding the comic book in both hands, I studied the cover. The Masked 
Mutant #24. In jagged red letters across the bottom, I read: “A TIGHT 
SQUEEZE FOR THE SENSATIONAL SPONGE!” 

The cover art was awesome. It showed SpongeLife—known across the 
universe as The Sponge of Steel—in terrible trouble. He was caught in the 
tentacles of a gigantic octopus. The octopus was squeezing him dry! 

Awesome. Totally awesome. 

I keep all of my comic books in mint condition, wrapped in collector’s 
bags. But there is one comic that I have to read every month. And that’s The 
Masked Mutant. 

I have to read it as soon as it comes out. And I read it cover to cover, every 
word in every panel. I even read the Letters page. 

That’s because The Masked Mutant is the best-drawn, best-written comic in 
the world. And The Masked Mutant has to be the most powerful, most evil 
villain ever created! 

What makes him so terrifying is that he can move his molecules around. 

That means he can change himself into anything that’s solid. Anything! 

On this cover, the giant octopus is actually the Masked Mutant. You can tell 
because the octopus is wearing the mask that The Masked Mutant always wears. 

But he can change himself into any animal. Or any object. 

That’s how he always escapes from The League of Good Guys. There are 
six different superheroes in The League of Good Guys. They are all mutants, 
too, with amazing powers. And they are the world’s best law enforcers. But they 
can’t catch The Masked Mutant. 

Even the League’s leader—The Galloping Gazelle—the fastest man in the 
solar system, isn’t fast enough to keep up with The Masked Mutant. 

I studied the cover for a few minutes. I liked the way the octopus tentacles 
squeezed SpongeLife into a limp rag. You could see by his expression that The 
Sponge of Steel was in mortal pain. 



Awesome. 

I carried the comic over to the bed and sprawled onto my stomach to read it. 
The story began where The Masked Mutant #23 left off. 

SpongeLife, the world’s best underwater swimmer, was deep in the ocean. 
He was desperately trying to escape from The Masked Mutant. But The Sponge 
of Steel had caught his cape on the edge of a coral reef. 

I turned the page. As The Masked Mutant drew nearer, he began to move 
his molecules around. And he changed himself into a huge, really gross octopus. 

There were eight drawings showing The Masked Mutant transform himself. 
And then came a big, full-page drawing showing the enormous octopus reaching 
out its slimy, fat tentacles to grab the helpless SpongeLife. 

SpongeLife struggled to pull away. 

But the octopus tentacles slid closer. Closer. 

I started to turn the page. But before I could move, I felt something cold 
and slimy wrap itself around my neck. 



3 


I let out a gasp and tried to struggle free. 

But the cold tentacles wrapped themselves tighter around my throat. 

I couldn’t move. I couldn’t scream. 

I heard laughter. 

With a great effort, I turned around. And saw Mitzi, my nine-year-old sister. 
She pulled her hands away from my neck and jumped back as I glared at her. 
“Why are your hands so cold?” I demanded. 

She smiled at me with her innocent, two-dimpled smile. “I put them in the 
refrigerator.” 

“You what ?! ” I cried. “You put them in the refrigerator? Why?” 

“So they’d be cold,” she replied, still grinning. 

My sister has a really dumb sense of humor. She has straight, dark brown 
hair like me. And she’s short and a little chubby like me. 

“You scared me to death,” I told her, sitting up on the bed. 

“I know,” she replied. She rubbed her hands on my cheeks. They were still 

cold. 

“Yuck. Get away, Mitzi.” I shoved her back. “Why did you come up here? 
Just to scare me?” 

She shook her head. “Dad told me to come up. He said to tell you if you’re 
reading comic books instead of doing your homework, you’re in big trouble.” 

She lowered her brown eyes to the comic book, open on the bed. “Guess 
you’re in big trouble, Skipper.” 

“No. Wait.” I grabbed her arm. “This is the new Masked Mutant. I have to 
read it! Tell Dad I’m doing my math, and—” 

I didn’t finish what I was saying because my dad stepped into the room. 
The ceiling light reflected in his glasses. But I could still see that he had his eyes 
on the open comic book on my bed. 

“Skipper—” he said angrily in his booming, deep voice. 

Mitzi pushed past him and ran out of the room. She liked to cause trouble. 
But she never wanted to stay around once things got really ugly. 

And I knew things were about to get ugly—because I had already been 
warned three times that week about spending too much time with my comic 



book collection. 

“Skipper, do you know why your grades are so bad?” my dad bellowed. 
“Because I’m not a very good student?” I replied. 

A mistake. Dad hates it when I answer back. 

Dad reminds me of a big bear. Not only because he growls a lot. But 
because he is big and broad. He has short, black hair and almost no forehead. 
Really. His hair starts almost right above his glasses. And he has a big, booming 
roar of a voice, like a bear’s roar. 

Well, after I answered him back, he let out an angry roar. Then he lumbered 
across the room and picked up my carton of comic books—my entire collection. 
“Sorry, Skipper, I’m tossing these all out!” he cried, and headed for the 

door. 



4 


You probably expected me to panic. To start begging and pleading for him not to 
throw away my valuable collection. 

But I didn’t say anything. I just stood beside the bed with my hands lowered 
at my sides, and waited. 

You see, Dad has done this before. Lots of times. But he doesn’t really 
mean it. 

He has a bad temper, but he’s no supervillain. Actually, I’d put him in The 
League of Good Guys most of the time. 

His main problem is that he doesn’t approve of comic books. He thinks 
they’re just trash. Even when I explain that my collection will probably be worth 
millions by the time I’m his age. 

Anyway, I stood there and waited silently. 

Dad stopped at the door and turned around. He held the carton in both 
hands. He narrowed his dark eyes at me through his black-framed glasses. 

“Are you going to get to your work?” he asked sternly. 

I nodded. “Yes, sir,” I muttered, staring at my feet. 

He lowered the carton a little. It’s really heavy, even for a big, strong guy 
like him. “And you won’t waste any more time tonight on comic books?” he 
demanded. 

“Couldn’t I just finish this new one?” I asked. I pointed to The Masked 
Mutant comic on the bed. 

Another mistake. 

He growled at me and turned to carry the carton away. 

“Okay, okay!” I cried. “Sorry. I’ll get my homework done, Dad. I promise. 
I’ll start right now.” 

He grunted and stepped back into the room. Then he dropped the carton 
back against the wall. “That’s all you think about night and day, Skipper,” he 
said quietly. “Comics, comics. It isn’t healthy. Really. It isn’t.” 

I didn’t say anything. I knew he was about to go back downstairs. 

“I don’t want to hear any more about comics,” Dad said gruffly. 
“Understand?” 


“Okay,” I murmured. “Sorry, Dad.” 



I waited to hear his heavy footsteps going down the stairs. Then I turned 
back to the new issue of The Masked Mutant. I was desperate to find out how 
SpongeLife escaped from the giant octopus. 

But I could hear Mitzi nearby. She was still upstairs. If she saw me reading 
the comic book, she’d run downstairs and tell Dad for sure. Mitzi’s hobby is 
being a snitch. 

So I opened my backpack and started pulling out my math notebook and 
my science textbook and other stuff I needed. 

I zipped through the math questions as fast as I could. I probably got most 
of the problems wrong. But it doesn’t matter. I’m not any good at math, anyway. 

Then I read the chapter on atoms and molecules in my science text. Reading 
about molecules made me think about The Masked Mutant. 

I couldn’t wait to get back to the comic book. 

I finally finished my homework a little after nine-thirty. I had to skip a few 
essay questions on the literature homework. But only the class brains answer all 
of the questions! 

I went downstairs and fixed myself a bowl of Frosted Flakes, my favorite 
late-night snack. Then I said good-night to my parents and hurried back up to my 
room, closing the door behind me, eager to get back in bed and start reading. 

Back under the ocean. SpongeLife escaped by squishing himself so small, 
he slipped out of the octopus’ tentacles. Pretty cool, I thought. 

The Masked Mutant waved his tentacles angrily and vowed he’d get 
SpongeLife another day. Then he changed his molecules back so he looked like 
himself, and flew back to his headquarters. 

His headquarters! 

I stared down at the comic book in shock. 

The secret headquarters of The Masked Mutant had never been shown 
before. Oh, sure, we’d been given glimpses of a room or two on the inside. 

But this was the first time the building had ever been shown from the 
outside. 

I brought the page up close to my face and examined it carefully. “What a 
weird place!” I exclaimed out loud. 

The headquarters building didn’t look like any building I had ever seen 
before. It certainly didn’t look like the secret hideout of the world’s worst villain. 

It kind of looked like a giant fire hydrant. A very tall fire hydrant that 
reached up to the sky. All pink stucco with a huge, green-domed roof. 



“Weird,” I repeated. 

But of course it was the perfect hiding place. Who would ever think that the 
super bad guy of all time stayed in a building that looked like an enormous pink 
fire hydrant? 

I turned the page. The Masked Mutant slipped into the building and 
disappeared into an elevator. He rode all the way to the top and stepped out into 
his private communications center. 

Waiting for him there was... a big surprise. A dark figure. We could see 
only his black silhouette. 

But I could tell instantly who it was. It was The Galloping Gazelle, leader 
of The League of Good Guys. 

How did The Gazelle get in? What was he about to do? 

To be continued next month. 

Wow. I closed the comic. My eyelids felt heavy. My eyes were too tired to 
read the tiny type on the Letters page. I decided to save it for tomorrow. 

Yawning, I carefully set the comic book down on my bed table. I fell asleep 
before my head hit the pillow. 

Two days later, a very cold, clear day, Wilson came running up to me after 
school. His blue coat was unzipped. He never zipped his coat. He didn’t like the 
way it looked when it was zipped. 

I had on a shirt, a sweater, and a heavy, quilted, down coat, zipped up to my 
chin—and I was still cold. “What’s up, Wilson?” I asked. 

His breath steamed up in front of him. “Want to come over and see my 
mbber stamp collection?” 

Was he kidding ? 

“I have to go to my orthodontist,” I told him. “My braces got comfortable. 
He has to tighten them so they’ll hurt again.” 

Wilson nodded. His blue eyes matched his coat. “How are you getting 
there?” 

I pointed to the bus stop. “City bus,” I told him. 

“I’ve seen you take that bus a lot,” he said. 

“There’s a comic book store on Goodale Street,” I replied, shifting my 
backpack onto the other shoulder. “I take the bus there once a week or so to see 
what new comics have come out. The orthodontist is just a few blocks from it.” 

“Do they have rubber stamps at the comic book store?” Wilson asked. 



“I don’t think so,” I told him. I saw the blue-and-white city bus turn the 
corner. “Got to run. See you later!” I called. 

I turned and ran full speed to the bus stop. 

The driver was a nice guy. He saw me running and waited for me. 
Breathing hard, I thanked him and climbed on to the bus. 

I probably wouldn’t have thanked him if I had known where this bus was 
going to take me. But I didn’t know that it was carrying me to the most 
frightening adventure of my life. 



5 


The bus was unusually crowded. I stood for a while. Then two people got off, 
and I slid into a seat. 

As the bus bounced along Main Street, I stared out at the passing houses 
and front yards. Dark clouds hung low over the roofs. I wondered if we were 
about to get our first snowfall of the winter. 

The comic book store was a few blocks away. I checked my watch, thinking 
maybe I had time to stop there before my orthodontist appointment. But no. No 
time for comics today. 

“Hey, do you go to Franklin?” A girl’s voice interrupted my thoughts. 

I turned to see that a girl had taken the seat beside me. Her carrot-colored 
hair was tied back in a single braid. She had green eyes and light freckles on her 
nose. 

She wore a heavy, blue-and-red-plaid ski sweater over faded jeans. She held 
her red canvas backpack in her lap. 

“Yeah. I go there,” I replied. 

“How is it?” she asked. She narrowed her green eyes at me as if checking 
me out. 

“It’s okay,” I told her. 

“What’s your name?” she asked. 

“Skipper,” I told her. 

She snickered. “That’s not a real name, is it?” 

“It’s what everyone calls me,” I said. 

“Do you live on a boat or something?” she asked. Her eyes crinkled up. I 
could see she was laughing at me. 

I guess Skipper is kind of a dumb name. But I’ve gotten used to it. I like it a 
lot better than my real name—Bradley. 

“When I was a little kid, I was always in a hurry,” I told her. “So I used to 
skip a lot. That’s why they started calling me Skipper.” 

“Cute,” she replied with a smirk. 

I don’t think I like this girl, I told myself. “What’s your name?” I asked her. 

“Skipper,” she replied, grinning. “Same as yours.” 

“No. Really,” I insisted. 



“It’s Libby,” she said finally. “Libby Zacks.” She stared past me out the 
window. The bus stopped for a red light. A baby started crying in the back. 

“Where are you going?” Libby asked me. “Home?” 

I didn’t want to tell her I had an orthodontist appointment. That was too 
geeky. “I’m going to a comic book store,” I said. “The one on Goodale.” 

“You collect comics?” She sounded surprised. “So do I.” 

It was my turn to be surprised. Most of the comic book collectors I know 
are boys. “What kind do you collect?” I asked. 

“High School Harry & Beanhead,” she replied. “I collect all the digest¬ 
sized ones and some of the regular ones, too.” 

“Yuck.” I made a face. “High School Harry and his pal Beanhead? Those 
comics stink.” 

“They do not!” Libby insisted. 

“Those are for babies,” I muttered. “They’re not real comics.” 

“They’re very well written,” Libby replied. “And they’re funny.” She stuck 
her tongue out at me. “Maybe you just don’t get them.” 

“Yeah. Maybe,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

I gazed out the window. The sky had grown darker. I didn’t recognize any 
of the stores. I saw a restaurant called Pearl’s and a tiny barbershop. Had we 
passed the comic book store? 

Libby folded her hands over her red backpack. “What do you collect? All 
that superhero junk?” 

“Yeah,” I told her. “My collection is worth about a thousand dollars. Maybe 
two thousand.” 

“In your dreams,” she shot back. She laughed. 

“High School Harry comics never go up in value,” I informed her. “Even 
the Number Ones are worthless. You couldn’t get five dollars for your whole 
collection.” 

“Why would I want to sell them?” she argued. “I don’t want to sell them. 
And I don’t care what they’re worth. I just like to read them.” 

“Then you’re not a real collector,” I said. 

“Are all the boys at Franklin like you?” Libby asked. 

“No. I’m the coolest one,” I declared. 

We both laughed. 

I still couldn’t decide if I liked her or not. She was pretty cute-looking. And 
she was funny, in a nasty sort of way. 



I stopped laughing when I glanced out the window and realized I had 
definitely passed my stop. I saw the bare trees of a small park I’d never seen 
before. The bus rumbled past it, and more unfamiliar stores came into view. 

I felt a sudden stab of panic in my chest. I didn’t know this neighborhood at 
all. 

I pushed the bell and jumped to my feet. 

“What’s your problem?” Libby demanded. 

“My stop. I m-missed it,” I stammered. 

She moved her legs into the aisle so that I could squeeze past. The bus 
squealed to a stop. I called out good-bye and hurried out the back door. 

Where am I? I asked myself, glancing around. Why did I let myself get into 
an argument with that girl? Why didn’t I pay attention instead? 

“Are you lost?” a voice asked. 

I turned and saw to my surprise that Libby had followed me off the bus. 
“What are you doing here?” I blurted out. 

“It’s my stop,” she replied. “I live two blocks down that way.” She pointed. 

“I have to go back,” I said, turning to leave. 

And as I turned, something came into view that made my breath catch in 
my throat. 

“Ohh.” I let out a startled cry and stared across the street. “But—that’s 
impossible !” I exclaimed. 

I was staring at a tall building on the other corner. A tall, pink stucco 
building with a bright green, domed roof. 

I was staring at the secret headquarters of The Masked Mutant. 



6 


“Skipper—what’s wrong?” Libby cried. 

I couldn’t answer her. I stared goggle-eyed at the building across the street. 
My mouth dropped open. My jaw nearly hit my knees! 

I raised my eyes to the bright green roof. Then I slowly lowered them over 
the shiny pink walls. I had never seen colors like these in real life. They were 
comic book colors. 

It was a comic book building. 

But here it was, standing on the corner across the street. 

“Skipper? Are you okay?” Libby’s voice sounded far away. 

It’s real! I told myself. The secret headquarters building of The Masked 
Mutant is real! 

Or is it? 

Two hands shook me by the shoulders, snapping me out of my amazed 
thoughts. “Skipper! Are you in shock or something?” 

“Th-that building!” I stammered. 

“Isn’t that the ugliest thing you ever saw?” Libby asked, shaking her head. 
She pushed back her carrot-colored braid and hiked her backpack onto her 
shoulder. 

“But it—it’s—” I still couldn’t speak. 

“My dad says the architect had to be color blind,” Libby said. “It doesn’t 
even look like a building. It looks like a blimp standing on its end.” 

“How long has it been there?” I asked, my eyes studying the glass doors 
that were the only entrance. 

Libby shrugged. “I don’t know. My family just moved here last spring. It 
was already here.” 

The clouds darkened overhead. A cold wind swirled around the corner. 

“Who do you think works in there?” Libby asked. “There’s no sign or 
anything on the building.” 

Of course there’s no sign, I thought. It’s the secret headquarters of the 
world’s most evil villain. There’s no way The Masked Mutant would put a sign 
out front! 

He doesn’t want The League of Good Guys to find his secret headquarters, 



I told myself. 

“This is crazy!” I cried. 

I turned and saw Libby staring at me. “You sure you’re okay? It’s just a 
building, Skipper. No need to go ballistic.” 

I could feel my face turning red. Libby must think I’m some kind of a nut, I 
realized. “I—I think I saw this building somewhere,” I tried to explain. 

“I’ve got to get home,” she said, glancing up at the darkening sky. “Want to 
come over? I’ll show you my comic book collection.” 

“No. I’m late for my orthodontist appointment,” I replied. 

“Huh?” She narrowed her green eyes at me. “You said you were going to a 
comic book store.” 

I could feel my face turning even redder. “Uh... I’m going to the comic 
book store after my appointment,” I told her. 

“How long have you had your braces?” she asked. 

I groaned. “Forever.” 

She started backing away. “Well, see you sometime.” 

“Yeah. Bye.” 

She turned and jogged down the street. She must think I’m a total geek, I 
thought unhappily. 

But I couldn’t help it. I really was in shock, seeing that building. I turned 
back to it. The top of the building had become hidden by the lowering clouds. 
Now the building looked like a sleek, pink rocket ship, reaching up to the clouds. 

A moving truck rumbled past. I waited for it to go by, then hurried across 
the street. 

There was no one on the sidewalk. I hadn’t seen anyone go into the building 
or come out of it. 

It’s just a big office building, I told myself. Nothing to get excited about. 

But my heart was pounding as I stopped a few feet from the glass doors at 
the entrance. I took a deep breath and peeked in. 

I know it’s crazy, but I really expected to see people wearing superhero 
costumes walking around in there. 

I narrowed my eyes and squinted through the glass doors. 

I couldn’t see anyone. It appeared dark inside. 

I took a step closer. Then another. 

I brought my face right up to the glass and peered in. I could see a wide 
lobby. Pink-and-yellow walls. A row of elevators near the back. 



But no people. No one. Empty. 

I grabbed the glass-door handle. My throat made a loud gulping sound as I 
swallowed hard. 


Should I go in? I asked myself. Do I dare? 



7 


My hand tightened on the glass-door handle. I started to tug the heavy door 
open. 

Then, out of the corner of my eye, I saw a blue-and-white bus moving 
toward me. I glanced at my watch. I was only five minutes late for my 
appointment. If I jumped on the bus, I could be at the orthodontist’s office in a 
few minutes. 

Letting go of the handle, I turned and ran to the bus stop, my backpack 
bouncing on my shoulders. I felt disappointed. But I also felt relieved. 

Walking into the headquarters of the meanest mutant in the universe was a 
little scary. 

The bus eased to a stop. I waited for an elderly man to step off. Then I 
climbed onboard, dropped my money into the box, and hurried to the back of the 
bus. 

I wanted to get one last look at the mysterious pink-and-green building. 

Two women were sitting in the back seat. But I pushed between them and 
pressed my face against the back window. 

As the bus pulled away, I stared at the building. Its colors stayed bright, 
even though the sky was so dark behind it. The sidewalk was empty. I still hadn’t 
seen anyone come out or go inside. 

A few seconds later, the building disappeared into the distance. I turned 
away from the window and walked up the aisle to find a seat. 

Weird, I thought. Totally weird. 

“And it was the exact same building as in the comic book?” Wilson asked. His 
blue eyes stared across the lunchroom table at me. 

I nodded. “As soon as I got home yesterday afternoon, I checked out the 
comic book. The building was exactly the same.” 

Wilson pulled a sandwich from his lunch bag and started to unwrap the foil. 
“What kind of sandwich did your mom pack for you?” he asked. 

I opened mine. “Tuna salad. What’s yours?” 

He lifted a slice of bread and examined his sandwich. “Tuna salad,” he 
replied. “Want to trade?” 



“We both have tuna salad,” I told him. “Why do you want to trade?” 

He shrugged. “I don’t know.” 

We traded sandwiches. His mom’s tuna salad was better than mine. I pulled 
the juice box from my lunch bag. Then I tossed the apple in the trash. I keep 
telling Mom not to pack an apple. I told her I just throw it away every day. Why 
does she keep packing one? 

“Can I have your pudding container?” I asked Wilson. 

“No,” he replied. 

I finished the first half of the sandwich. I was thinking hard about the 
mysterious building. I’d been thinking about it ever since I saw it. 

“I’ve solved the mystery,” Wilson said. He scratched his white-blond curls. 
A smile formed on his face. “Yes! I’ve solved it!” 

“What?” I demanded eagerly. 

“It’s simple,” Wilson replied. “Who draws The Masked Mutant?” 

“The artist?” I asked. “Jimmy Starenko, of course. Starenko created The 
Masked Mutant and The League of Good Guys.” How could Wilson not know 
that? 

“Well, I’ll bet this guy Starenko was here one day,” Wilson continued, 
jabbing the straw into the top of his juice box. 

“Starenko? Here? In Riverview Falls?” I said. I wasn’t following him. 

Wilson nodded. “Let’s say Starenko is here. He’s driving down the street, 
and he sees the weird building. He stops his car. He gets out. He stares at the 
building. And he thinks: What a great building! This building would make a 
perfect secret headquarters building for The Masked Mutant.” 

“Wow. I see,” I murmured. I was catching on to Wilson’s thinking. “You 
mean, he saw the building, liked it, and copied it when he drew the headquarters 
building.” 

Wilson nodded. He had a piece of celery stuck to his front tooth. “Yeah. 
Maybe he got out of the car and sketched the building. Then he kept the sketches 
in a drawer or something till he needed them.” 

It made sense. 

Actually, it made too much sense. I felt really disappointed. I knew it was 
silly, but I really wanted that building to be The Masked Mutant’s secret 
headquarters. 

Wilson had spoiled everything. Why did he have to be so sensible for once? 

“I got some new rubber stamps,” he told me, finishing the last spoonful 



from his pudding container. “Want to see them? I could bring them over to your 
house after school.” 

“No thanks,” I replied. “That would be too exciting.” 

I planned to take the bus and go see the building again that afternoon. But Ms. 
Partridge gave us a ton of homework. I had to go straight home. 

The next day, it snowed. Wilson and I and some other guys went sledding 
on Grover’s Hill. 

A week later, I finally had a chance to go back and take another look at the 
building. This time, I’m going inside, I told myself. There must be a receptionist 
or a guard, I decided. I’ll ask whose building it is and who works there. 

I was feeling really brave as I climbed on to the bus after school. It was an 
ordinary office building, after all. Nothing to get excited about. Taking a seat at 
the front of the bus, I looked for Libby. The bus was filled with kids going home 
after school. Near the back, I saw a red-haired girl arguing with another girl. But 
it wasn’t Libby. 

No sign of her. 

I stared out the window as the bus rolled past the comic book store. Then, a 
few blocks later, we bounced past my orthodontist’s office. Just seeing his 
building made my teeth ache! 

It was a sunny, clear afternoon. Bright sunlight kept filling the bus 
windows, forcing me to shield my eyes as I stared out. 

I had to keep careful watch, because I wasn’t sure where the stop was. I 
really didn’t know this neighborhood at all. 

Kids were jammed in the aisle. So I couldn’t see out the windows on the 
other side of the bus. 

I hope we haven’t already passed the building, I thought. I had a heavy 
feeling in the pit of my stomach. I have a real fear of getting lost. 

My mom says that when I was two, she lost me for a few minutes in the 
frozen foods section at the Pic ’n Pay. I think I’ve had a fear of getting lost ever 
since. 

The bus pulled up to a bus stop. I recognized the small park across the 
street. This was the stop! 

“Getting off!” I shouted, jumping into the aisle. I hit a boy with my 
backpack as I stumbled to the front door. “Sorry. Getting off! Getting off!” 

I pushed through the crowd of kids and leaped down the steps, onto the 



curb. The bus rumbled away. Sunlight streamed around me. 

I stepped to the corner. Yes. This was the right stop. I recognized it all now. 
I turned and raised my eyes to the strange building. 

And found myself staring at a large, empty lot. 

The building was gone. 



8 


“Whoa!” I cried, frozen in shock. 

Shielding my eyes with one hand, I stared across the street. How could that 
enormous building vanish in one week? 

I didn’t have long to think about it. Another bus pulled up to the bus stop. 
“Skipper! Hey—Skipper!” Libby hopped off the bus, waving and calling my 
name. 

She was wearing the same red-and-blue ski sweater and faded jeans, torn at 
one knee. Her hair was pulled straight back, tied in a ponytail with a blue hair 
scrunchie. 

“Hey—what are you doing back in my neighborhood?” she asked, smiling 
as she ran over to me. 

“Th-that building!” I stammered, pointing to the vacant lot. “It’s gone!” 

Libby’s expression changed. “Well, don’t say hi or anything,” she muttered, 
frowning at me. 

“Hi,” I said. “What happened to that building?” 

She turned and followed my stare. Then she shrugged. “Guess they tore it 
down.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“It was so ugly,” Libby said. “Maybe the city made them tear it down.” 

“But did you see them tear it down?” I demanded impatiently. “You live 
near here, right? Did you see them doing it?” 

She thought about it, crinkling her green eyes as she thought. “Well... no,” 
she replied finally. “I’ve gone past here a few times, but—” 

“You didn’t see any machinery?” I demanded anxiously. “Any big wrecking 
balls? Any bulldozers? Dozens of workers?” 

Libby shook her head. “No. I didn’t actually see anyone tearing the building 
down. But I didn’t really look.” 

She pulled her red backpack off her shoulder and held the strap in front of 
her with both hands. “I don’t know why you’re so interested in that ugly 
building, Skipper. I’m glad it’s gone.” 

“But it was in a comic book!” I blurted out. 

“Huh?” She stared hard at me. “What are you talking about?” 



I knew she wouldn’t understand. “Nothing,” I muttered. 

“Skipper, did you come all the way out here just to see that building?” she 
asked. 

“No way,” I lied. “Of course not.” 

“Do you want to come to my house and see my comic book collection?” 

I was so frazzled and mixed up, I said yes. 

I hurried out of Libby’s house less than an hour later. Those High School Harry 
& Beanhead comics are the most boring comics in the world! And the art is so 
lame. Can’t everyone see that the two girls are drawn exactly the same, except 
one has blond hair and one has black? 

Yuck! 

Libby insisted on showing me every High School Harry & Beanhead comic 
she had. And she had shelves full of them! 

Of course I couldn’t concentrate on those boring comics. I couldn’t stop 
thinking about the weird building. How could a whole building vanish without a 
trace? 

I jogged back to the bus stop on Main Street. The sun was sinking behind 
the buildings. Long blue shadows tilted over the sidewalks. 

When I get to the corner, I bet the building will be back! I found myself 
thinking. 

But of course it wasn’t. 

I know. I know. I have weird thoughts. I guess it comes from reading too 
many comic books. 

I had to wait nearly half an hour for the bus to come. I spent the whole time 
staring at the empty lot, thinking about the vanished building. 

When I finally got home, I found a brown envelope waiting for me on the 
little table in the hall where Mom drops the mail. 

“Yes!” I exclaimed happily. The special issue of The Masked Mutant ! The 
comics company was sending out two special editions this month, and this was 
the first. 

I called “hi” to my mom, tossed my coat and heavy backpack onto the floor, 
and raced up the stairs to my room, the comic book gripped tightly in my hot 
little hand. 

I couldn’t wait to see what had happened after The Galloping Gazelle 
sneaked into The Masked Mutant’s headquarters. Carefully, I slid the comic 



book out of the envelope and examined the cover. 

And there it stood. The pink-and-green headquarters building. Right on the 
cover. 

My hand trembled as I opened to the first page. MORNING OF A MUTANT 
was the big title in scary red letters. The Masked Mutant stood in front of a big 
communications console. 

He stared into a wall of about twenty TV monitors. Each TV monitor 
showed a different member of The League of Good Guys. 

“I’m tracking each one of them,” The Masked Mutant said in the first 
dialogue balloon. “They’ll never find me. I’ve thrown an Invisibility Curtain 
around my entire headquarters!” 

My mouth dropped open as I read those words. 

I read them three times before I let the comic book slip out of my hands to 
my bed. 

An Invisibility Curtain. 

No one can see The Masked Mutant’s building because he slipped an 
Invisibility Curtain around it. 

I sat excitedly on the edge of my bed, breathing hard, feeling the blood 
pulse at my temples. 

Is that what happened in real life? 

Is that why I couldn’t see the pink-and-green building this afternoon? 

Was the comic book giving me the answer to the mystery of the missing 
building? 

It sounded crazy. It sounded totally crazy. 

But was it real? Was there really an Invisibility Curtain hiding the building? 

My head was spinning faster than The Amazing Tornado-Man! I knew only 
one thing. I had to go back there and find out. 



9 


After school the next afternoon, I had to go with my mom to the mall to buy 
sneakers. I usually try on at least ten or twelve pairs, then beg for the most 
expensive ones. You know. The ones that pump up or flash lights when you walk 
in them. 

But this time I bought the first pair I saw, plain black-and-white Reeboks. I 
mean, who could think about sneakers when an invisible building was waiting to 
be discovered? 

Driving home from the mall, I started to tell Mom about the building. But 
she stopped me after a few sentences. “I wish you were as interested in your 
schoolwork as you are in those dumb comics,” she said, sighing. 

That’s what she always says. 

“When is the last time you read a good book?” she continued. 

That’s the next thing she always says. 

I decided to change the subject. “We dissected a worm today for science,” I 
told her. 

She made a disgusted face. “Doesn’t your teacher have anything better to 
do than to cut up poor, innocent worms?” 

There was just no pleasing Mom today. 

The next afternoon, wearing my new sneakers, I eagerly hopped on the city bus. 
Tossing my token into the box, I saw Libby sitting near the back. As the bus 
lurched away from the curb, I stumbled down the aisle and dropped beside her, 
lowering my backpack to the floor. 

“I’m going back to that building,” I said breathlessly. “I think there’s an 
Invisibility Curtain around it.” 

“Don’t you ever say hi?” she complained, rolling her eyes. 

I said hi. Then I repeated what I had said about the Invisibility Curtain. I 
told her I read about it in the newest Masked Mutant comic, and that the comic 
may be giving clues as to what was happening in real life. 

Libby listened to me intently, not blinking, not moving. I could see that she 
was finally starting to see why I was so excited about finding this building. 

When I finished explaining everything, she put a hand on my forehead. 



“You don’t feel hot,” she said. “Are you seeing a shrink?” 

“Huh?” I pushed her hand away. 

“Are you seeing a shrink? You’re totally out of your mind. You know that 
—don’t you?” 

“I’m not crazy,” I said. “I’ll prove it. Come with me.” 

She edged closer to the window, as if trying to get away from me. “No 
way,” she declared. “I can’t believe I’m sitting here with a boy who thinks that 
comic books come to life.” 

She pointed out the window. “Hey, look, Skipper—there goes the Easter 
Bunny! He’s handing an egg to the Tooth Fairy!” She laughed. A mean laugh. 

“Ha-ha,” I muttered angrily. I have a good sense of humor. But I don’t like 
being laughed at by girls who collect High School Harry & Beanhead comics. 

The bus pulled up to the bus stop. I hoisted my backpack and scrambled out 
the back exit. Libby stepped off right behind me. 

As the bus pulled away, sending out puffs of black exhaust behind it, I 
gazed across the street. 

No building. An empty lot. 

“Well?” I turned to Libby. “You coming?” 

She twisted her mouth into a thoughtful expression. “To that empty lot? 
Skipper, aren’t you going to feel like a jerk when there’s nothing there?” 

“Well, go home then,” I told her sharply. 

“Okay. I’ll come,” she said, grinning. 

We crossed the street. Two teenagers on bikes nearly ran us over. “Missed 
’em!” one of them cried. The other one laughed. 

“How do we get through the Invisibility Curtain?” Libby asked. Her voice 
sounded serious. But I could see by her eyes that she was laughing at me. 

“In the comic book, people just stepped through it,” I told her. “You can’t 
feel it or anything. It’s like a smoke screen. But once you step through it, you 
can see the building.” 

“Okay. Let’s try it,” Libby said. She tossed her ponytail over her shoulder. 
“Let’s get this over with, okay?” 

Walking side by side, we took a step across the sidewalk toward the empty 
lot. Then another step. Then another. 

We crossed the sidewalk and stepped onto the hard dirt. 

“I can’t believe I’m doing this,” Libby grumbled. We took another step. “I 
can’t believe I’m—” 



She stopped because the building popped into view. 

“Ohhh!” We both cried out in unison. She grabbed my wrist and squeezed it 
hard. Her hand was ice-cold. 

We stood a few feet from the glass entrance. The bright walls of the pink- 
and-green building rose above us. 

“You—you were right!” Libby stammered, still squeezing my wrist. 

I swallowed hard. I tried to talk, but my mouth was suddenly too dry. I 
coughed, and no words came out. 

“Now what?” Libby asked, staring up at the shiny walls. 

I still couldn’t speak. 

The comic book is real\ I thought. The comic book is real. 

Does that mean the building really belongs to The Masked Mutant? 

Whoa! I warned myself to slow down. My heart was already racing faster 
than Speedboy. 

“Now what?” Libby repeated impatiently. “Let’s get away from here— 
okay?” For the first time, she sounded really frightened. 

“No way!” I told her. “Come on. Let’s go in.” 

She tugged me back. “Go in? Are you crazy?” 

“We have to,” I told her. “Come on. Don’t stop to think about it. Let’s go.” 

I took a deep breath, pulled open the heavy glass door, and we slipped 
inside. 



10 


We took one step into the brightly lit lobby. My heart was pounding so hard, my 
chest hurt. My knees were shaking. I’d never been so scared in my life! 

I glanced quickly all around. 

The lobby was enormous. It seemed to stretch on forever. The pink-and- 
yellow walls gave off a soft glow. The sparkly white ceiling seemed to be a mile 
above our heads. 

I didn’t see a reception desk. No chairs or tables. No furniture of any kind. 

“Where is everyone?” Libby whispered. I could see that she was frightened, 
too. She clung to my arm, standing close beside me. 

The vast room was empty. Not another person in sight. 

I took another step. 

And heard a soft beep. 

A beam of yellow light shot out of the wall and rolled down over my body. 

I felt a gentle tingling. Kind of a prickly feeling, the kind of feeling when 
your arm goes to sleep. 

It swept down quickly from my head to my feet. A second or two later, the 
light vanished and the tingly feeling went away. 

“What was that?” I whispered to Libby. 

“What was what?” she replied. 

“Didn’t you feel that?” 

She shook her head. “I didn’t feel anything. Are you trying to scare me or 
something, Skipper?” 

“It was some kind of electric beam,” I told her. “It shined on me when I 
stepped forward.” 

“Let’s get out of here,” she muttered. “It’s so quiet, it’s creepy.” 

I turned my eyes to the row of elevators against the yellow wall. Did I dare 
take a ride on one? Was I brave enough to do a little exploring? 

“It—it’s just a big office building,” I told Libby, trying to work up my 
courage. 

“Well, if it’s an office building, where are the workers?” she demanded. 

“Maybe the offices are closed,” I suggested. 



“On a Thursday?” Libby replied. “It isn’t a holiday or anything. I think the 
building is empty, Skipper. I don’t think anyone works here.” 

I took a few steps toward the elevators. My sneakers thudded loudly on the 
hard marble floor. “But all the lights are on, Libby,” I said. “And the door was 
open.” 

She hurried to catch up to me. Her eyes kept darting back and forth. I could 
see she was really scared. 

“I know what you’re thinking,” she said. “You don’t think this is just an 
office building. You think this is the secret headquarters of that comic book 
character—don’t you, Skipper?!” 

I swallowed hard. My knees were still shaking. I tried to make them stop, 
but they wouldn’t. 

“Well, maybe it is,” I replied, staring at the elevators across from us. “I 
mean, how do you explain the Invisibility Curtain? It was in the comic book— 
and it was outside this building.” 

“I—I can’t explain it,” Libby stammered. “It’s weird. It’s too weird. This 
place gives me the creeps, Skipper. I really think—” 

“There’s only one way to find out the truth,” I said. I tried to sound brave, 
but my voice shook nearly as much as my knees! 

Libby followed my gaze to the elevators. She guessed what I was thinking. 
“No way!” she cried, stepping back toward the glass doors. 

“We’ll just ride up and down,” I told her. “Maybe open the elevator doors 
on a few floors and peek out.” 

“No way,” Libby repeated. Her face suddenly appeared very pale. Her 
green eyes were wide with fright. 

“Libby, it will only take a minute,” I insisted. “We’ve come this far. I have 
to explore a little. I don’t want to go home without finding out what this building 
is.” 

“You can ride the elevators,” she said. “I’m going home.” She backed up to 
the glass doors. 

Outside I saw a blue-and-white bus stop at the curb. A woman climbed off, 
carrying a baby in one hand, dragging a stroller in the other. 

I could run out the door and climb right onto that bus, I thought. I could get 
out of here, safe and sound. And be on my way home. 

But what would happen when I got home? 

I would feel like a coward, a total wimp. And I would spend day after day 



wondering about this building, wondering if I had actually discovered the secret 
headquarters of a real supervillain. 

If I jumped on the bus and rode home now, the building would still be a 
mystery. And the mystery would drive me crazy. 

“Okay, Libby, you can go home if you want,” I told her. “I’m going to ride 
the elevator to the top and back.” 

She stared at me thoughtfully. Then she rolled her eyes. “Okay, okay. Til 
come with you,” she murmured, shaking her head. 

I was glad. I really didn’t want to go alone. 

“I’m only doing this because I feel sorry for you,” Libby said, following me 
across the marble floor to the elevators. 

“Huh? Why do you feel sorry for me?” I demanded. 

“Because you’re so messed up,” she replied. “You really think a comic 
book can come to life. That’s sad. That’s really sad.” 

“Thank goodness High School Harry and Beanhead can’t come to life!” I 
teased. Then I added, “What about the Invisibility Curtain? That was real— 
wasn’t it?” 

Libby didn’t reply. Instead, she laughed. “You’re serious about this!” she 
said. The sound of her laughter echoed in the enormous, empty lobby. 

It made me feel a little braver. I laughed, too. 

What’s the big deal? I asked myself. So you’re going to take an elevator 
ride. So what? 

It’s not like The Masked Mutant is going to jump into the elevator with us, I 
assured myself. We’ll probably peek out at a lot of boring offices. And that’s all. 

I pushed the lighted button on the wall. Instantly, the silvery elevator door 
in front of us slid open. 

I poked my head into the elevator. It had walls of dark brown wood with a 
silver railing that went all the way around. 

There were no signs on the walls. No building directory. No words at all. 

I suddenly realized there were no signs in the lobby, either. Not even a sign 
with the name of the building. Or a sign to tell visitors where to check in. 

Weird. 

“Let’s go,” I said. 

Libby held back. I tugged her by the arm into the elevator. 

The doors slid shut silently behind us as soon as we stepped in. I turned to 
the control panel to the left of the door. It was a long, silvery rectangle filled 



with buttons. 

I pushed the button to the top floor. 

The elevator started to hum. It jerked slightly as we began to move. 

I turned to Libby. She had her back pressed against the back wall, her hands 
shoved into her jeans pockets. She stared straight ahead at the door. 

“We’re moving,” I murmured. 

The elevator picked up speed. 

“Hey!” Libby and I both cried out at the same time. 

“We—we’re going down!” I exclaimed. 

I had pushed the button to the top floor. But we were dropping. Fast. 

Faster. 

I grabbed the railing with both hands. 

Where was it taking us? 

Would it ever stop? 



11 


The elevator stopped with a hard thud that made my knees bend. “Whoa!” I 
cried. 

I let go of the railing and turned to Libby beside me. “You okay?” 

She nodded. She stared straight ahead at the elevator door. 

“We should have gone up,” I muttered tensely. “I pushed up.” 

“Why doesn’t the door open?” Libby asked in a trembling voice. 

We both stared at the door. I stepped to the center of the elevator. “Open!” I 
commanded it. 

The door didn’t move. 

“We’re trapped in here,” Libby said, her voice getting shrill and tiny. 

“No,” I replied, still trying to be the brave one. “It’ll open. Watch. It’s just 
slow.” 

The door didn’t open. 

“The elevator must be broken,” Libby wailed. 

“We’ll be trapped down here forever. The air is starting to run out already. I 
can’t breathe!” 

“Don’t panic,” I warned, struggling to keep my voice calm. “Take a deep 
breath, Libby. There’s plenty of air.” 

She obediently sucked in a deep breath. She let it out in a long whoosh. 
“Why won’t the door open? I knew we shouldn’t have done this!” 

I turned to the control panel. A button at the bottom read OPEN. I pushed it. 
Instantly, the door slid open. 

I turned back to Libby. “See? We’re okay.” 

“But where are we?” she cried. 

I stepped to the doorway and poked my head out. It was very dark. I could 
see some kind of heavy machinery in the darkness. 

“We’re in the basement, I think,” I told Libby. “There are all kinds of pipes 
and a big furnace and things.” 

“Let’s go,” Libby urged, hanging back against the elevator wall. 

I took a step out the door and glanced both ways. I couldn’t see much. More 
machinery. A row of metal trash cans. A stack of long metal boxes. 



“Come on, Skipper,” Libby demanded. “Let’s go back up. Now!” 

I stepped back into the elevator and pushed the button marked LOBBY. 

The door didn’t close. The elevator didn’t move, didn’t hum. 

I pushed LOBBY again. I pushed it five or six times. 

Nothing happened. 

I suddenly had a lump in my throat as big as a watermelon. I really didn’t 
want to be stuck down in this dark basement. 

I started pushing buttons wildly. I pushed everything. I pushed a red button 
marked EMERGENCY five or six times. 

Nothing. 

“I don’t believe this!” I choked out. 

“Let’s get out and take a different elevator,” Libby suggested. 

Good idea, I thought. There was a long row of elevators up in the lobby. 
We’ll just get out of this one and push the button for another one to come down 
and get us. 

I led the way out into the dark basement. Libby stayed close behind me. 

“Oh!” We both let out low cries as the elevator door quickly slid shut 
behind us. 

“What’s going on?” I demanded. “Why wouldn’t it close before?” 

Libby didn’t reply. 

I waited for my eyes to adjust to the darkness. Then I saw what Libby was 
staring at. 

“Where are the other elevators?” she cried. 

We were staring at a smooth, bare wall. The elevator that had brought us 
down here was the only elevator on the wall. 

I spun around, checking out the other walls. But it was too dark to see very 
far. 

“The other elevators don’t come down here, I guess,” Libby murmured in a 
trembling voice. 

I searched the wall for a button to push to bring our elevator back. I 
couldn’t find one. No button. 

“There’s no way out!” Libby wailed. “No way out at all!” 



12 


“Maybe there are elevators on the other wall,” I said, pointing across the huge, 
dark room. 

“Maybe,” Libby repeated doubtfully. 

“Maybe there’s a stairway or something,” I said. 

“Maybe,” she said softly. 

A sudden noise made me jump. A rumble followed by a grinding hum. 

“Just the furnace starting up,” I told Libby. 

“Let’s find a way out of here,” she urged. “I’m never going in an elevator 
again as long as I live!” 

I could feel her hand on my shoulder as I started to make my way through 
the darkness. The huge, gray furnace rumbled and coughed. Another big 
machine made a soft clattering sound as we edged past it. 

“Anybody down here?” I called. My voice echoed off the long, dust- 
covered pipes that ran along the low ceiling above our heads. I cupped my hands 
around my mouth and called again. “Anybody here? Can anybody hear me?” 

Silence. 

The only sounds I could hear were the rumble of the furnace and the soft 
scrape of our sneakers as Libby and I slowly crept over the floor. 

As we came near the far wall, we could see that there were no elevators 
over here. The smooth plaster wall was bare except for a thick tangle of cobwebs 
up near the ceiling. 

“There’s got to be some stairs leading out of here,” Libby whispered, close 
behind me. 

Dim light shone through a narrow doorway up ahead. “Let’s see where this 
leads,” I said, brushing stringy spiderwebs off my face. 

We stepped through the doorway and found ourselves in a long hallway. 
Dust-covered ceiling bulbs cast pale light onto the concrete floor. 

“Anybody here?” I called again. My voice sounded hollow in the long 
tunnel of a hallway. 

No reply. 

Dark doorways lined both sides of the hallway. I peeked into each door as 
we passed. I saw stacks of cartons, tall file cabinets, strange machinery I didn’t 



recognize. One large room was jammed with enormous coils of metal cable. 
Another room had sheets of metal piled nearly to the ceiling. 

“Helloooooo!” I called. “Helllooooooo!” 

No reply. 

Flashing red lights inside a large room caught my eye. I stopped at the 
doorway and stared in at some sort of control panel. 

One wall was filled with blinking red and green lights. In front of the lights 
stood a long counter of dials and gears and levers. Three tall stools were placed 
along the counter. But no one sat in them. 

No one worked the controls. The room was empty. As empty as the rest of 
this strange, frightening basement. 

“Weird, huh?” I whispered to Libby. 

When she didn’t answer, I turned to make sure she was okay. 

“Libby?” 

She was gone. 



13 


I spun around. “Libby?” 

My entire body shook. 

“Where are you?” 

I squinted back down the long, gray hallway. No sign of her. 

“Libby? If this is some kind of a dumb joke...” I started. But the rest of my 
words caught in my throat. 

Breathing hard, I forced myself to retrace our steps. “Libby?” I stopped at 
every door and called her name. “Libby?” 

The hallway curved, and I followed it. I began jogging, my hands down 
stiffly at my sides, calling her name, searching every door, peering into every 
dark room. 

How could she get lost? I asked myself, feeling my panic rise until I could 
barely breathe. She was right behind me. 

I turned another corner. Into a hallway I hadn’t explored yet. “Libby?” 

The narrow hall led to an enormous, brightly lit room. I had to shut my eyes 
against the sudden bright light. 

When I opened them, I found myself nearly face-to-face with a gigantic 
machine. Bright floodlights from the high ceiling covered it in light. 

The machine had to be a block long! A big control panel, filled with dials, 
and buttons, and lights, stood against the side. A long, flat part—like a conveyor 
belt—led to several rollers. And at the very end of the machine stood a huge 
white wheel. No—a cylinder. No—a roll of white paper. 

It’s a printing press! I realized. 

I lurched into the room, stepping around stacks of paper and cardboard 
cartons. The floor was littered with paper, ink-smeared paper, crumpled, folded, 
and ripped. 

As I staggered toward the huge printing press, the sea of paper rose up 
nearly to my knees! 

“Libby? Are you in here? Libby?” 

Silence. 

This room was as empty as all the others. 

The paper crackled under my sneakers. I made my way to a long table at the 



back of the room. I found a red stool in front of the table, and I dropped down 
onto it. 

I kicked big sheets of paper away from my legs and glanced around the 
room. A hundred questions pushed into my mind at once. 

Where is Libby? How could she disappear like that? 

Is she somewhere close behind me? Will she follow the hallway to this big 
room? 

Where is everyone? Why is this place totally deserted? 

Is this where they print the comic books? Am I in the basement of 
Collectable Comics, the company that publishes The Masked Mutant ? 

Questions, questions. 

My brain felt about to burst. I stared around the cluttered room, my eyes 
rolling past the gigantic printing press, searching for Libby. 

Where was she? Where ? 

I turned back to the table—and gasped. 

I nearly toppled off the stool. The Masked Mutant was staring up at me. 



14 


A large, color drawing of The Masked Mutant stared up at me from the table. 
Startled, I picked it up and examined it. 

It had been drawn on thick posterboard in colored inks. The Masked 
Mutant’s cape swept behind him. Through his mask, his eyes appeared to stare 
out at me. Evil, angry eyes. 

The ink glistened on the page, as if still wet. I rubbed my thumb over an 
edge of the cape. The ink didn’t come off. 

I wonder if Starenko drew this portrait, I thought, studying it. 

Glancing across the table, I saw a stack of papers on a low counter that ran 
along the entire back wall. Hopping off the tall stool, I made my way over to the 
counter and began shuffling through the papers. 

They were ink drawings and pencil sketches. Many of them were of The 
Masked Mutant. They showed him in different poses. Some of them showed him 
moving his molecules around, changing into wild animals and strange, unearthly 
creatures. 

I opened a thick folder and found about a dozen color sketches of the 
members of The League of Good Guys. Then I found a stack of pencil drawings 
of characters I’d never seen before. 

This must be where they make the comic books! I told myself. 

I was so excited about seeing these actual drawings and sketches, I nearly 
forgot about Libby. 

This pink-and-green building must be the headquarters of Collectable 
Comics, I realized. 

I was starting to feel calmer. My fears dropped away like feathers off The 
Battling Bird-Boy. 

After all, there was nothing to be afraid of. I hadn’t stumbled into the 
headquarters of the world’s most evil supervillain. I was in the basement of the 
comic book offices. 

This is where the writers and artists worked. And this is where they print 
the comic books every month. 

So why should I be afraid? 

I shuffled through folder after folder, making my way down the long 



counter. I found a pile of layouts for a comic book that I had just bought. 

It was so exciting seeing the actual art. The page was really big, at least 
twice as big as the comic book. I guessed that the artists made their drawings 
much bigger than the actual page. And then they shrank the drawings down 
when they printed them. 

I found some really new pencil drawings of The Masked Mutant. I knew 
they were new because I didn’t recognize them from my comics at home—and I 
have them all! 

Drawing after drawing. My eyes were practically spinning! 

I never dreamed that Collectable Comics were made right in Riverview 
Falls. 

I flipped through a sketchbook of Penguin People portraits. I never liked the 
Penguin People. I know they’re good guys, and people really think they’re great. 
But I think their black-and-white costumes just look silly. 

I was having a great time. Really enjoying myself. 

Of course it had to end. 

It ended when I opened the last folder on the counter. And stared at the 
sketches inside. 

I gaped at them in disbelief, my hands trembling as I shuffled from one to 
the next. 

“This is impossible!” I cried out loud. 

I was staring at sketches of ME. 



15 


I frantically shuffled through the big stack of drawings. 

You’re just imagining it, Skipper, I told myself. The boy in the sketches 
only looks like you. It isn’t really you. 

But it had to be me. 

In every drawing, the boy had my round face, my dark hair—cut short on 
the sides and long on top. 

He was short like me. And just a little bit chubby. He had my crooked 
smile, up a little higher on one side. He wore my clothes—baggy jeans and long- 
sleeved, pocket T-shirts. 

I stopped at a drawing halfway through the pile and stared hard at it, 
holding it close to my face. “Oh, wow!” I exclaimed. 

The boy in the drawing even had a chip on his front tooth. Just like me. 

“It’s impossible!” I cried out loud, my voice tiny and shrill in the enormous 
room. 

Who had been drawing me? And why? Why would a comic book artist 
make sketch after sketch of me? 

And how did the artist know me so well? How did the artist know that I 
have a tiny chip on one front tooth? 

A cold shiver ran down my back. I suddenly felt very frightened. I stared at 
the drawings, my heart pounding. 

In one drawing, I looked really scared. I was running from something, my 
arms out stiffly in front of me. 

Another drawing was a close-up portrait of my face. My expression in the 
sketch was angry. No. More than angry. I looked furious. 

Another sketch showed me flexing my muscles. Hey, I look pretty cool! I 
thought. The artist had given me bulging superhero biceps. 

In another drawing, my eyes were closed. Was I asleep? Or was I dead? 

I was still staring at the drawings, shuffling from one to the next, studying 
each one—when I heard the footsteps. 

And realized I was no longer alone. 

“Who-who’s there?” I cried, whirling around. 



16 


“Where were you?” Libby demanded angrily, running across the room toward 
me. “I searched everywhere!” 

“Where were you?” I shot back. “I thought you were right behind me.” 

“I thought you were right ahead of me!” she cried. “I turned a corner, and 
you were gone.” She stopped in front of me, breathing hard, her face bright red. 
“How could you leave me by myself in this creepy place?” 

“I didn’t!” I insisted. “You left me!” 

She shook her head, still gasping for breath. “Well, let’s get out of here, 
Skipper. I found some elevators that are working.” She tugged my sleeve. 

I picked up the stack of drawings. “Look, Libby.” I held them up to her. 
“You have to see these.” 

“Are you serious?” she cried. “I want to get out of here. I don’t want to look 
at comic book drawings now!” 

“But—but—” I sputtered, waving the drawings. 

She turned and started toward the doorway. “I told you I found some 
elevators. Are you coming or not?” 

“But these are drawings of me!” I cried. 

“Yeah. Sure,” she called back sarcastically. She stopped at the front of the 
big printing press and turned back to me. “Why would anyone draw you, 
Skipper?” 

“I-I don’t know,” I stammered. “But these drawings—” 

“You have a sick imagination,” she said. “You seem like a normal guy. But 
you’re totally weird. Bye.” Libby started jogging over the paper-cluttered floor 
to the door. 

“No—wait!” I called. I dropped the drawings onto the counter, slid off the 
tall stool, and chased after her. “Wait up, Libby!” 

I followed her out into the hall. I didn’t want to be left alone in this creepy 
place, either. I had to get home and think about this. I had to puzzle it out. 

My head was spinning. I felt totally confused. 

I followed her through the long tunnel of hallways. We turned a corner, and 
I saw a row of elevators against the wall. 

Libby pushed the button on the wall, and one of the elevators slid open 



silently. We both peered carefully inside before stepping on. It was empty. 

We were both panting. My head was throbbing. My side ached. Neither of 
us spoke a word. 

Libby pushed the button marked LOBBY. We heard a soft hum and felt the 
elevator start to move. 

When the door slid open, and we saw the pink-and-yellow walls of the 
lobby, Libby and I both cheered. We burst out of the elevator together and ran 
across the marble floor to the exit. 

Out on the sidewalk, I stopped, lowering my hands to my knees, sucking in 
deep breaths of fresh air. When I glanced up, I saw Libby studying her watch. 

“I’ve got to get home,” she said. “My mom is going to have a cow!” 

“Do you believe me about the drawings?” I asked breathlessly. 

“No,” she replied. “Who would believe that?” She waved and made her 
way across the street, heading for home. 

I could see a bus approaching, a few blocks down. Searching in my jeans 
pocket for a token, I turned to take one last look at the weird building. 

It had vanished once again. 

I needed time to think about everything that had happened. But Wilson was 
waiting for me when I got home, and he followed me up to my room. 

“I brought over some of my rubber stamps,” he said, raising a brown paper 
bag up to my face. He turned it over and emptied it onto my desk. “I thought you 
might like to see some of the better ones.” 

“Wilson—” I started. “I really don’t—” 

“This one is a ladybug,” he said, holding up a small wooden stamp. “It’s 
very old. It’s the oldest one I own. Here. I’ll show it to you.” He opened a blue 
inkpad, stamped the ladybug on it, and pressed it onto the top of a pad of paper I 
had on the desk. 

“How old is it?” I asked him. 

“I don’t know,” he replied. He held up another one. “It’s a cow,” he said. As 
if I couldn’t tell. He stamped it onto the pad. “I have several cows,” Wilson said. 
“But I only brought one.” 

I studied the cow, pretending to be interested. 

“It’s another really old one,” Wilson said proudly. 

“How old?” I asked. 

He shrugged. “Beats me.” He reached for another stamp. 



“Uh... Wilson... I just had a really weird thing happen,” I told him. “And I 
need to think about it. Alone.” 

He narrowed his blue eyes at me, confused. “What happened?” 

“It’s kind of a long story,” I said. “I was in a building. On the north side of 
town. I think it’s where they make the Collectable Comics.” 

“Really? Here in Riverview Falls?” Wilson’s face filled with surprise. “And 
they let you in?” 

“There was no one there,” I told him. It felt good to share the story with 
someone. “So we went in. This girl I met on the bus. Libby. And me. We tried to 
go up in the elevator. But it took us down. Then Libby got lost. And I found a 
stack of drawings of myself.” 

“Whoa!” Wilson exclaimed, raising a hand for me to stop. “I’m not 
following this too well, Skipper.” 

I realized what I had said didn’t make any sense at all. How could I explain 
it? 

I told Wilson I’d talk to him later, after I calmed down. I helped him gather 
up his rubber stamps. He’d brought about twenty of them. “Twenty of the best,” 
he said. 

I walked him downstairs and said I’d call him after dinner. 

After he left, something caught my eye on the mail table in the hall. A 
brown envelope. 

My heart jumped. Was it—? Yes! An envelope from the Collectable Comics 
company. The next special issue of The Masked Mutant 

I was so excited, I nearly knocked the whole table over as I grabbed for the 
envelope. I tucked it under my arm without opening it and ran up the stairs, two 
at a time. 

I need total privacy. I have to study this! I told myself. 

I closed the bedroom door behind me and dropped down onto the edge of 
the bed. My hands trembled as I ripped open the envelope and pulled out the 
comic book. 

The cover showed a closeup of The Masked Mutant. His eyes glared 
angrily out at the reader. A NEW FOE FOR THE MUTANT! proclaimed the title. 

Huh? A new foe? 

I took a deep breath and held it. Calm down, Skipper, I urged myself. It’s 
only a comic book. 

But would this new issue help to solve the mystery for me? 



Would it tell me anything about the strange, pink-and-green headquarters 
building? Would it help solve any of the puzzles from this afternoon? 

I turned to the first page. It showed the headquarters building from above. 
The next drawing showed the building at street level. In the deep shadows, 
someone was approaching the glass doors. 

Someone was sneaking into the headquarters building. 

I turned the page. 

And shrieked at the top of my lungs: “I don’t believe it!” 



17 


Yes. You probably guessed it. It was ME sneaking into The Masked Mutant’s 
headquarters building. 

I stared at the page so hard, I thought my eyes were going to pop out of my 
head. 

I was so excited—and so shocked—I couldn’t read the words. They became 
a gray blur. 

I turned the pages with shaking hands. I don’t think I took a breath. I 
studied each picture, holding the comic book about an inch from my face. 

The Galloping Gazelle sat in a tiny room. The room grew hotter and hotter. 
In minutes, The Galloping Gazelle would become The Boiled Gazelle! 

The Masked Mutant had trapped The Galloping Gazelle in his headquarters. 
And now he planned to leave The Gazelle there to boil. 

I turned the page. My hand shook so hard, I nearly tore the page off. 

There I was, creeping through the dark hallway. In the comic, I wore the 
same T-shirt and baggy jeans I had on right now. 

The next drawing showed a closeup of my face. Big balls of sweat rolled 
down my pink face. I guess that meant I was scared. 

I’m a little too chubby in that drawing, I thought. 

But it was me. It was definitely ME! 

“Mom!” I screamed, closing the comic and jumping off the bed. “Mom! 
Dad! You have to see this!” 

I tore out of my room and hurtled down the stairs. I don’t think my feet 
touched the floor! 

“Mom! Dad! Where are you?” 

I found them in the kitchen, preparing dinner. Dad was chopping onions by 
the sink. His eyes were filled with tears. Mom was bent over the stove. As usual, 
she was having trouble getting the oven lit. 

“I’m in this comic book!” I cried, bursting into the room. 

“Not now!” they both replied in unison. 

“No. You have to see this!” I insisted, waving it in front of Dad. 

Dad didn’t stop chopping. “You had a letter to the editor published?” he 
asked through his tears. 



“No! I’m in the comic!” I told him breathlessly. I waved it closer to him. 

“I can’t see a thing!” Dad exclaimed. “Get that away from me. Can’t you 
see what this onion is doing to my eyes?” 

“There’s a trick to chopping onions,” Mom said, bent over the stove. “But I 
don’t know what it is.” 

I ran over to Mom. “You have to check this out, Mom. I’m in here. Look. 
It’s really me!” 

Mom shook her head, frowning. “I can’t get it to light,” she said, sighing. “I 
think the pilot is out again.” 

“I’ll check it if I ever stop crying,” Dad told her. 

“Willyou look at this?!” I screamed, totally losing it. 

Mom gave a quick glance to the page I was holding in front of her. “Yes, 
yes. That does look a little like you, Skipper,” she said, waving me away. She 
turned back to the oven. “We really need a new stove, dear.” 

“Dad—take a look,” I pleaded. 

I ran back to him, but he had shoved a towel up to his face and was crying 
into the towel. “I guess you can’t look now, huh?” I said softly. 

He didn’t answer. He just cried into the towel. 

I let out a long, exasperated moan. What was their problem, anyway? 

This was the most exciting thing that had ever happened to me. And they 
couldn’t be bothered to take one look. 

Angrily, I closed the comic and stomped out of the room. 

“Skipper, set the table,” Mom shouted after me. 

Set the table? I’m starring in a famous comic book, and she’s asking me to 
set the table? 

“Why can’t Mitzi do it?” I asked. 

“Set the table, Skipper,” Mom repeated sternly. 

“Okay, okay. In a few minutes,” I called back. I dropped down onto the 
living room couch and turned to the back of the comic. I had been too excited to 
read it to the end. Now I wanted to read the part where it tells you what to expect 
in the next comic book. 

My eyes swept over the page. There was The Galloping Gazelle, still 
trapped in the boiling hot room. And there stood The Masked Mutant outside the 
door, about to declare his victory. 

I squinted at the white thought balloon over The Galloping Gazelle’s head. 
What was he saying? 



“Only the boy can save me now,” The Galloping Gazelle was thinking. 
“Only the boy can save the world from The Masked Mutant’s evil. But where is 
he?” 

I read it again. And again. 

Was it true? Was I the only one who could save The Galloping Gazelle? 

Did I really have to go back there? 



18 


After school the next day, I hurried to the bus stop. It was a clear, cold day. The 
ground beneath my sneakers was frozen hard. The sky above looked like a broad 
sheet of cold, blue ice. 

Leaning into the sharp wind, I wondered if Libby would be on the bus. I 
was dying to tell her about the comic book. I wanted to tell her I was going back 
into the strange building. 

Would she go back with me? 

No way, I decided. Libby had been frightened after our first visit, I could 
never drag her back there. 

I jogged past the playground, my eyes on the street, watching for a bus. 

“Hey, Skipper!” a familiar voice called. I turned to see Wilson running after 
me, his coat unzipped and flapping up behind him like wings. “Skipper—what’s 
up? You going home?” 

Two blocks up, the blue-and-white bus turned the corner. 

“No. I’m going someplace,” I told Wilson. “I can’t look at your rubber 
stamp collection now.” 

His expression turned serious. “I’m not collecting rubber stamps anymore,” 
he said. “I gave it up.” 

I couldn’t hide my surprise. “Huh? How come?” 

“They took up too much of my time,” he replied. 

The bus pulled to the curb. The door opened. “See you later,” I told Wilson. 

As I stepped on to the bus, I remembered where I was going. And I 
suddenly wondered if I would see Wilson later. I wondered if I would ever see 
him again! 

Libby wasn’t on the bus. In a way, I was glad. It meant I wouldn’t have to 
explain to her what I was doing. 

She would have laughed at me for believing what I read in a comic book. 

But the comic book had told the truth about the Invisibility Curtain. And 
now it had said that I was the only one who could save The Galloping Gazelle 
and stop The Masked Mutant’s evil. 

“But it’s just a comic book!” Libby would have said. “How can you be such 



a jerk to believe a comic book?” 

That’s what she would have said. And I don’t know how I could have 
answered. 

So I was glad she wasn’t on the bus. 

I climbed off the bus in front of the empty lot. 

I gazed at it from across the street. I knew it wasn’t really an empty lot. I 
knew the pink-and-green building was there, hidden behind the Invisibility 
Curtain. 

As I crossed the street, I felt a wave of fear sweep down over me. My 
mouth suddenly got dry. I tried to swallow, but nearly choked. My throat felt as 
if someone had tied a knot in it. My stomach felt kind of fluttery. And my knees 
got sweaty and refused to bend. 

I stopped on the sidewalk and struggled to calm myself down. 

It’s just a comic book. Just a comic book. That’s what I told myself, 
repeating the words over and over. 

Finally, staring straight ahead at the empty lot, I worked up my courage 
enough to move forward. One step. Another. Another. 

Suddenly, the building popped into view. 

I gasped. Even though I had crossed through the Invisibility Curtain before, 
it was still amazing to see a building suddenly appear before my eyes. 

Swallowing hard, I pulled open one of the glass entrance doors and stepped 
into the bright, pink-and-yellow lobby. 

Staying near the door, I turned to the left, then the right. 

Still empty. Not a person in sight. 

I coughed. My cough sounded tiny in the huge lobby. My sneakers 
squeaked over the marble floor as I started to the elevators on the far wall. 

Where is everyone? I asked myself. It’s the middle of the afternoon. How 
can I be the only one in this huge lobby? 

I stopped in front of the elevators. I raised my finger to the elevator button 
—but I didn’t push it. 

I wish Libby had come along, I decided. If Libby were here, at least I’d 
have someone to be terrified with ! 

I pushed the elevator button. 

“Well... here goes,” I murmured, waiting for the door to open. 

And then someone laughed. A cold, evil laugh. 

Right behind me. 



19 


I let out a low cry and spun around. 

No one there. 

The laughter repeated. Soft, but cruel. 

My eyes darted around the lobby. I couldn’t see anyone. 

“Wh-who’s there?” I choked out. 

The laughter stopped. 

I continued to search. My eyes went up to the wall above the elevator. A 
small, black loudspeaker poked out from the yellow wall. 

The laughter must have come from there, I decided. I stared up at it as if I 
expected to see someone in there. 

Get out of here! a voice inside me begged. My sensible voice. Just turn 
around, Skipper, and run out of this building as fast as your rubbery, shaky legs 
will take you! 

I ignored it and pressed the elevator button. The elevator door on the left 
slid open silently, and I stepped inside. 

The door closed. I stared at the control panel. Should I push up or down? 

The last visit, I had pushed up, the top floor—and the elevator had taken 
Libby and me down to the basement. 

My finger hesitated in front of the buttons. What would happen if this time 
I pushed down ? 

I didn’t get a chance to find out. The elevator started with a jolt before I 
pushed any button at all. 

I grabbed on to the railing. My hand was cold and wet. The elevator 
hummed as it rose. 

I’m going up, I realized. Up to where? 

The ride seemed to take forever. I watched the floor numbers whir by on 
top of the control panel. Forty... forty-one... forty-two... The elevator beeped 
each time it passed a floor. 

It came to a stop at forty-six. Was this the top floor? 

The door slid open. I let go of the railing and stepped out. 

I glanced down a long, gray hallway. I blinked once. Twice. It looked as if I 
had stepped into a black-and-white movie. The walls were gray. The ceiling was 



gray. The floor was gray. The doors on both sides of the hall were gray. 

It feels like I’m standing in a thick, gray fog, I thought, peering one way, 
then the other. Or in a dark cloud. 

No one in sight. Nothing moving. 

I listened hard. Listened for voices, for laughter, for the click and hum of 
office machinery. 

Silence—except for the thudding of my heart. 

I shoved my cold, clammy hands into the pockets of my jeans and began to 
walk, slowly following the hallway. 

I turned a corner and stared down another endless, gray hallway. The end of 
the hall seemed to fade away, to fade into a gray blur. 

I suddenly remembered the drawings in the newest issue of The Masked 
Mutant. A big, two-page drawing had shown the long hallways of The Masked 
Mutant’s secret headquarters. 

The long, twisting hallway in the comic book looked just like this hallway 
—except that the comic book hallway had bright green walls and a yellow 
ceiling. And the rooms were filled with costumed supervillains who worked for 
The Masked Mutant. 

As I slowly made my way through this gray, empty hallway, I had a weird 
thought. Everything looked so gray and washed out, I had the feeling that I was 
in a sketch of a hallway. A black-and-white pencil drawing that hadn’t been 
filled in yet. 

But, of course, that didn’t make any sense at all. 

You’re just thinking crazy thoughts because you’re so scared, I told myself. 

And then I heard a noise. 

A hard, thumping sound. A bump. 

“Whoa!” I whispered. My heart leaped up to my throat. I stopped in the 
middle of the hall. And listened. 

Bump. Thump. 

Coming from up ahead. From around the next corner? 

I forced myself to walk. I turned the corner. And gasped at the bright colors. 

The walls down this hallway were bright green. The ceiling was yellow. 
The thick carpet under my sneakers was a dark, wine-red. 

Bump. Bump. Thump. 

The colors were so bright, I had to shield my eyes with one hand. 

I squinted to the end of the hall. The green walls led to a closed yellow 



door. The door had a metal bolt against the front. 

Thump. Thump. 

The sounds were coming from behind the bolted doorway. 

I made my way slowly down the hall to the doorway. 

I stopped outside the bolted door. “Anyone in there?” I tried to call into the 
room. But my voice came out in a choked whisper. 

I coughed and tried again. “Anyone in there?” 

No reply. 

Then, another loud bumping sound. Like wood thumping against wood. 

“Anyone in there?” I called, my voice a little stronger. 

The thumping sounds stopped. “Can you help me?” a man’s voice called 
from inside the room. 

I froze. 

“Can you help me?” the man pleaded. 

I hesitated for a second. Should I try to help him? 

Yes. 

I raised both hands to the metal bolt. I took a deep breath and shoved the 
bolt with all my strength. 

To my surprise, it slid easily. 

The door was unlocked. I turned the handle and pushed the door open. 

I stumbled off-balance into the room and stared in amazement at the figure 
staring back at me. 

“You—you’re real?” I cried. 



20 


His cape was twisted, and his mask had rolled down over one eye. But I knew I 
was staring at The Galloping Gazelle. 

“You’re really alive?” I blurted out. 

“Of course,” he replied impatiently. “Untie me, kid.” He gazed toward the 
open door. “You’d better hurry.” 

I realized that his powerful arms and legs were tied to the chair. The 
thumping and bumping had been the sounds of his chair banging against the 
floor as he had tried to escape. 

“I—I can’t believe that you’re here!” I cried. I was so amazed—and so 
frightened—I didn’t know what I was saying! 

“I’ll give you my autograph later,” he said, his eyes still on the doorway. 
“Just hurry, okay? We’ve got to get out of here. I don’t think we have much 
time.” 

“T-time?” I stammered. 

“He’ll be back,” The Galloping Gazelle murmured. “We want to get to him 
before he gets to us, right, kid?” 

“Us?!” I cried. 

“Just untie me,” The Galloping Gazelle instructed. “I can handle him.” He 
shook his head. “I wish I could contact my buddies at the League. They’re 
probably all searching the universe for me.” 

Still half dazed, I stumbled across the tiny room to the chair and began 
working at the ropes. The knots were big and tight and hard to untie. The coarse 
rope scraped my hands as I struggled to loosen them. 

“Hurry, kid,” The Galloping Gazelle urged. “Hey, how did you find the 
secret headquarters, anyway?” 

“I... just found it,” I replied, tugging at the knots. 

“Don’t be modest, kid,” the superhero said in his flat, low voice. “You used 
your secret cyber-radar powers, right? Or did you use ultra-mind control to read 
my thoughts and hurry to my rescue?” 

“No. I just took the bus,” I replied. 

I didn’t really know how to answer him. Did he have me confused with 
someone else? 



Why was I here? What was going to happen to us? To me? 

Questions, questions. They flew through my mind as I frantically worked at 
the heavy ropes. 

I tried to ignore the pain from the cuts and scrapes to my hands. But it hurt 

a lot. 

Finally, one of the knots slid open. The Galloping Gazelle flexed his 
muscles and stretched out his powerful chest—and the ropes popped away 
easily. 

“Thanks, kid,” he boomed, jumping to his feet. He adjusted his mask so that 
he could see through both eyeholes. Then he swept his long cape behind him and 
straightened his tights. 

“Okay. Let’s go pay him a surprise visit,” he said, pulling up the ends of his 
gloves. He started toward the door, taking long, heavy strides. His boots 
thundered loudly as he walked. 

“Uh... do you really want me to come, too?” I asked, lingering behind the 
chair. 

He nodded. “I know what you’re worried about, kid. You’re worried that 
you won’t be able to keep up with me because I have dyno-legs and I’m the 
fastest living mutant in the known universe.” 

“Well...” I hesitated. 

“Don’t worry,” he replied. “I’ll go slow.” He motioned impatiently. “Let’s 
get moving.” 

I tripped over the tangle of ropes on the floor. Grabbed the chair to catch 
my balance. Then followed him out into the green-and-yellow hallway. 

He turned and began running down the hall. As I started to follow, he 
became a blue-and-red blur of light—and then vanished. 

A few seconds later, he came jogging back. “Sorry. Too fast for you?” he 
called. 

I nodded. “A little.” 

He rested a gloved hand heavily on my shoulder. His gray eyes peered at 
me solemnly through the slits in his mask. “Do you have wall-climbing 
abilities?” he demanded. 

I shook my head. “No. Sorry.” 

“Okay. We’ll take the stairs,” he said. 

He grabbed my hand and pulled me down the hall. He moved so fast, both 
of my feet were in the air. 



I guess it was impossible for him to go slow. 

The walls whirred past in a bright green blur. He pulled me around a corner, 
then another corner. 

I felt as if I were flying! We were moving so fast, I didn’t have time to 
breathe. 

Around another corner. Then through an open doorway. 

The doorway led to a flight of steep, dark stairs. I peered up to the top, but I 
could see only heavy blackness. 

I expected The Galloping Gazelle to pull me up the stairs. But to my 
surprise, he stopped just past the doorway. 

He narrowed his eyes at the stairs. “There is a disintegrator-ray there,” he 
announced, rubbing his square jaw thoughtfully. 

“A what?” I cried. 

“A disintegrator-ray,” he repeated, his eyes locked on the stairs. “If you step 
into it, it will disintegrate you in one hundredth of a second.” 

I swallowed hard. My entire body started to tremble. 

“Do you think you can jump the first two steps?” The Galloping Gazelle 
asked. 

“You mean—?” I started. 

“Land on the third step,” he instructed. “Get a good running start.” 

I’ll need it, I thought, staring at the steep steps. 

I suddenly wished I hadn’t eaten so many Pop-Tarts and bowls of Frosted 
Flakes for breakfast every morning. If only I were a little slimmer, a little lighter. 

“Get a good running start and make sure you clear the first two steps,” The 
Galloping Gazelle warned. “Land on the third step and keep moving. If you land 
on the first or second step, you’ll disintegrate.” He motioned with his fingers. 
“Poof.” 

I let out a low, frightened moan. I couldn’t help myself. I wanted to be 
brave. But my body wasn’t cooperating. It was shaking and quaking as if I were 
made of Jell-O. 

“I’ll go first,” the superhero said. He turned to the stairs, bent his knees, 
stretched both hands forward—and leaped over the invisible disintegrator-ray. 
He landed on the fifth step. 

He turned around and motioned for me to follow. “See? It’s easy,” he said 
brightly. 

Easy for you! I thought darkly. Some of us don’t have dyno-legs. 



“Hurry,” he urged. “If you stop to think about it, you won’t be able to do it.” 

I’m already thinking about it! I thought. 

How can I not think about it? 

“I—I’m not very athletic,” I murmured in a tiny, trembling voice. What an 
understatement! Whenever the kids I know play any sports, I am always the last 
kid chosen for a team. 

“Hurry,” The Galloping Gazelle urged. He reached out both hands. “Take a 
good running jump, kid. Aim for the third step. It isn’t that high. I’ll catch you.” 

The third step looked about a mile in the air to me. But I held my breath, 
bent my knees, took a running leap—my best leap— 

—and I landed with a hard thud on the first step. 



21 


I screamed and clamped my eyes shut as the disintegrator-ray poured through 
me, and my body crumbled into thin air. 

Actually, I didn’t feel anything. 

I opened my eyes to find myself still standing on the bottom step. Still in 
one chubby piece. 

“I—I—I—” I stammered. 

“I guess he doesn’t have it turned on,” The Galloping Gazelle said calmly. 
He smiled at me through the mask. “You caught a break, kid.” 

I was still trembling. Cold beads of sweat rolled down my forehead. I 
couldn’t speak. 

“Hope your luck holds out,” The Galloping Gazelle muttered. He turned 
and started up the stairs, his cape floating behind him. “Come on. Let’s go meet 
our destiny.” 

I didn’t like the sound of that. Not one bit. 

But I didn’t like anything that was going on. The Galloping Gazelle had 
said that I was lucky. 

But I certainly didn’t feel lucky as I followed him up the dark stairs. 

At the top landing, he pushed open a wide metal door, and we stepped into 
an amazing room. 

The room glowed with color. It was decorated like an office, the fanciest, 
most luxurious office I have ever seen. 

The shaggy white carpet was soft and so thick, I sank in it nearly to my 
ankles. Silky blue curtains were draped over enormous windows that overlooked 
the town. Sparkly, crystal chandeliers hung from the ceiling. 

Velvety couches and chairs were arranged around dark wood tables. One 
wall was covered with floor-to-ceiling bookshelves, each shelf filled with 
leather-covered books. 

A giant TV screen—dark—stood in one corner. Beside it, a wall of 
electronic equipment. Enormous oil paintings of green farm fields covered one 
wall. 

A shiny, gold-plated desk stood in the middle of the room. The tall desk 
chair behind it looked more like a throne than a chair. 



“Wow!” I cried, lingering near the door, my eyes taking in the splendor of 
the vast room. 

“He treats himself nice,” The Galloping Gazelle commented. “But his time 
is over.” 

“You mean—?” I started. 

“I’m too fast for him,” the superhero boasted. 

“I’ll run circles around him, faster and faster—until I become a raging 
tornado. He’ll be swept away forever.” 

“Wow,” I repeated. I didn’t know what else to say. 

“He caught me napping before,” The Galloping Gazelle continued. “That’s 
the only way he can catch me. When I’m asleep. Otherwise, I’m much too fast 
for him. Too fast for anybody. Know how fast I run the one-hundred?” 

“How fast?” I asked. 

“I run it in one-tenth. One-tenth of a second. That would be an Olympic 
record. But they don’t let me in the Olympics because I’m a mutant.” 

I started to follow The Galloping Gazelle to the center of the room. But I 
stopped when I heard the laughter. 

The same cold laughter I had heard in the lobby. 

I froze in fright. 

And stared as the gold desk began to move. And change. 

The shiny gold shimmered as it shifted and bent, raising itself up and 
forming a human figure. 

I took a step back, trying to hide behind The Galloping Gazelle as the desk 
melted away—and The Masked Mutant rose up in its place. 

His dark eyes burned menacingly through the slits in his mask. He was a lot 
taller than he appeared in the comic. And a lot more powerful-looking. 

And a lot scarier. 

He raised a fist at The Galloping Gazelle. “You dare to invade my private 
office?” he demanded. 

“Say good-bye to all this ill-gotten splendor,” The Galloping Gazelle told 
the Mutant. 

“I’ll say good-bye to you!” The Masked Mutant shot back, spitting the 
words angrily. 

Then he turned his frightening, cold eyes on me. “I’ll handle you easily, 
Gazelle,” the world’s most evil supervillain said softly. “But, first, watch me 
destroy the kid!” 



22 


I shrank back as The Masked Mutant took a step toward me, his fist still raised, 
his black eyes glaring furiously into mine. 

My heart pounding, I turned and frantically searched for a hiding place. 

But there was nowhere to hide. 

And I couldn’t make a run for it. The door slammed shut as The Masked 
Mutant moved closer. 

“Whoa!” I cried. I raised both hands in front of my face, as if shielding 
myself. 

I couldn’t bear to see his cold, cruel eyes glaring at me as he approached. 
He’s going to destroy me, I thought. But I don’t have to watch! 

And, then, as The Masked Mutant took one more step, The Galloping 
Gazelle moved to block his way. “You’ll deal with me, Mutant!” he declared in 
his booming voice. “If you want the kid, you’ll have to take me out first.” 

“No problem,” The Masked Mutant declared softly. 

But his expression changed as The Galloping Gazelle began to circle him. 
Faster and faster—until the Gazelle appeared to disappear into a whirling, 
spinning tornado of blue and red. 

The Gazelle is carrying out his plan, I realized as I backed up to the wall. 
He’s going to run faster and faster around The Masked Mutant until he creates a 
whirlwind that will blow the evil Mutant away. 

Pressing my back against the wall, I watched the amazing battle eagerly. 
The Galloping Gazelle whirled faster. Faster. So fast, a powerful wind swept 
over the room, slapping the curtains, toppling over a vase of flowers, sending 
books flying from the shelves. 

Yes! I thought happily, shooting both fists into the air. Yes ! We win! We 

win! 

I lowered my hands and let out a horrified groan when I saw The Masked 
Mutant casually stick his foot out. 

The Galloping Gazelle tripped over the foot and slammed facedown onto 
the floor with a shattering thud. 

He bounced hard a couple of times and then lay still. 

The wind stopped. The curtains fell back in place. 



The Masked Mutant stood over the fallen superhero, hands triumphantly on 
the waist of his costume. 

“Get up!” I screamed, without even realizing I was doing it. “Get up, 
Gazelle! Please!” 

The Gazelle groaned, but didn’t move. 

“Dinnertime,” sneered The Masked Mutant. 

My back pressed hard against the wall, I stared in horror as The Mutant 
began to change again. His face twisted and appeared to flatten. His body 
lowered, and he leaned forward, spreading his hands on the floor. 

He stepped forward as a snarling leopard. Tilting its head to one side, the 
leopard uttered a ferocious growl of attack. 

Then it arched its back, tensed its back legs—and leaped on to the sprawled 
body of The Galloping Gazelle. 

“Get up! Get up, Gazelle!” I shrieked as the leopard attacked. 

The Masked Mutant clawed and gnawed at the helpless Gazelle. 

“Get up! Get up!” I screamed. 

To my shock, The Galloping Gazelle opened his eyes. 

The ferocious leopard ripped away the bottom of The Gazelle’s mask with 
its teeth. 

The Galloping Gazelle rolled out from under the enormous beast and 
scrambled to his feet. 

With a roar, the leopard swiped its paws, sending a long tear down the 
length of The Gazelle’s cape. 

“I’m outta here!” The Gazelle cried, making tracks to the door. He turned 
back to me. “You’re on your own, kid!” 

“No! Wait!” I screamed. 

I don’t think The Gazelle heard me. He shoved open the door with one 
shoulder and vanished. 

The door slammed behind him. 

Quickly, the leopard changed, rising up on its hind legs, its body shifting 
and moving—until The Masked Mutant stepped forward. 

He smiled at me as he approached, a cold, menacing smile. 

“You’re on your own, kid,” he said softly. 



23 


I edged along the wall as The Masked Mutant moved slowly, steadily toward me. 
I knew I couldn’t get to the door, as The Galloping Gazelle had. I wasn’t fast 
enough. 

He should call himself The Galloping Chicken! I thought bitterly. 

How could he save his own skin and leave me here like this? 

I couldn’t run. I couldn’t fight. What could I do? 

What could I do against a deadly foe who could turn himself into anything 
solid? 

The Masked Mutant stopped in the center of the room, hands on his waist, 
his dark eyes twinkling. He was enjoying my fright. And already tasting his 
victory. 

“What are your powers, kid?” he demanded, a sneer in his voice. 

“Huh?” His question caught me by surprise. 

“What are your powers?” he repeated impatiently, swirling his cape behind 
him. “Do you shrink down to a tiny bug? Is that your secret?” 

“Huh? Shrink? Me?” I was shaking so hard, I couldn’t think straight. 

Why was he asking me these questions? 

“Do you burst into flames?” he continued, moving closer. “Is that your 
power? Are you magnetic? Are you a mind-fogger?” His voice turned angry. 
“What is it, kid? Answer me! What is your power?” 

“I—I don’t have any powers,” I stammered. If I pressed any harder into the 
wall, I’d become part of the wallpaper! 

The Masked Mutant laughed. “So you won’t tell me, huh? Okay, okay. 
Have it your way.” 

His smile faded. His dark eyes turned cold and hard. “I was just trying to 
make it easy on you,” he said, moving even closer. “I want to destroy you in the 
easiest way possible.” 

“Oh. I see,” I muttered. 

My eye caught something on the shelf. A large, smooth stone as big as a 
coconut. It was some kind of decoration. I wondered if it would make a good 
weapon. 

“Say bye-bye, kid,” he said through clenched teeth. 



He came toward me quickly. 

And as he moved, I grabbed the big stone off the shelf. It was a lot heavier 
than I’d thought. It wasn’t stone, I realized. It was shaped like a smooth stone. 
But it was made of solid steel. 

I hoisted it up and took careful aim. Then I heaved it at The Masked 
Mutant’s head. And missed. 

The stone thudded heavily onto the carpet. “Nice try,” he muttered... 

.. .and moved quickly to destroy me. 



24 


I tried to duck away from him, but he was too quick. 

His powerful hands grabbed me around the waist and lifted me off the floor. 

Higher. Higher. 

I realized he was moving his molecules, making his arms stretch until he 
had lifted me above the chandelier. 

I thrashed my arms and legs and tried to squirm away. But he was too 
strong. 

Higher. Higher. Until my head banged hard against the ceiling, at least 
twenty feet above the floor. 

“Happy landings!” The Masked Mutant cried gleefully as he prepared to 
drop me and send me plummeting to my doom. 

But before he could drop me, I heard the door swing open. 

The Masked Mutant heard it, too. Holding me suspended in the air, he 
turned to see who had entered. “You!” he cried in surprise. 

High above the floor, I squirmed around and bent my head to see through 
the chandelier. The light sparkled through the crystals, making it impossible to 
see. 

“How dare you burst in here!” The Masked Mutant cried to the intruder. 

He lowered me a little. Just enough for me to see the doorway. 

“Libby!” I cried. “What are you doing here?” 



25 


The Masked Mutant lowered me to the floor and turned to face Libby. My legs 
were wobbling so badly, I had to grab on to a bookshelf to hold myself up. 

“Libby—get out of here! Get away!” I tried to warn her. 

But she stormed into the room, her red hair flying behind her. She had her 
eyes on me and completely ignored The Masked Mutant. 

Doesn’t she know that he is the most evil supervillain in the known 
universe? 

“Skipper—didn’t you hear me calling you?” Libby demanded sharply. 

“Huh? Libby—” 

“I was across the street,” she said. “I saw you going into this building. I 
called to you.” 

“I—I didn’t hear you,” I stammered. “Listen, you’d better get out of here, 
Libby.” 

“I’ve been searching and searching for you,” she continued, ignoring my 
warning, ignoring my frantic gestures. “What are you doing in here, Skipper?” 

“Uh... I really can’t talk right now,” I replied, pointing to The Masked 
Mutant. 

He stood impatiently, hands at his waist, tapping his boot on the carpet. “I 
see that I will have to destroy you both,” he said quietly. 

Libby spun around. She seemed to notice the supervillain for the first time. 
“Skipper and I are leaving now,” she said with a sneer. 

I gasped. Didn’t she know who she was talking to ? 

No. Of course she didn’t know. She reads only High School Harry & 
Beanhead comics. She has no idea how much danger we are in! I realized. 

“I’m sorry,” The Masked Mutant replied, sneering back at Libby from 
under his mask. “You are not leaving. In fact, you are never leaving this building 
again.” 

Libby glared back at him, and I saw her expression change. Her green eyes 
grew wide, and her mouth dropped open. 

She took a step back until she stood beside me. “We have to do something,” 
she whispered. 

Do something? 



What could we do against the monstrous mega-mutant? 

I swallowed hard. I couldn’t think of how to answer her. 

The Masked Mutant tossed back his cape and took a step toward us. 
“Which one of you wants to go first?” he demanded softly. 

I turned and saw that Libby had backed up to the bookshelves. She pulled a 
yellow plastic toy gun from her backpack. 

“Libby—what are you doing?” I whispered. “That’s just a toy!” 

“I know,” she whispered back. “But this is a comic book—right? It can’t be 
real. So if it’s a comic book, we can do anything !” 

She raised the plastic toy pistol and aimed it at The Masked Mutant. 

He let out a cold laugh. “What do you plan to do with that toy?” he asked 
scornfully. 

“It only l-looks like a toy,” Libby stammered. “It’s a Molecule-Melter. 
Leave this room—or I’ll melt all your molecules!” 

The Mutant’s smile grew wider. “Nice try,” he said, flashing two rows of 
perfect, white teeth. 

He narrowed his eyes at Libby and took another step toward her. “I guess 
you want to go first. I’ll try not to hurt you—too much.” 

Libby held the toy gun in front of her with both hands. She gritted her teeth, 
preparing to pull the trigger. 

“Put down that toy. It can’t help you,” The Masked Mutant declared, 
moving closer. 

“I’m not kidding,” Libby insisted in a shrill voice. “It isn’t a toy. It really is 
a Molecule-Melter.” 

The Masked Mutant laughed again and took another step closer. Then 
another step. 

Libby aimed the gun at The Mutant’s chest. She pulled the trigger. 

A high-pitched whistle burst out of the gun. 

The Masked Mutant took another step closer. Then another. 



26 


Libby lowered the plastic gun. 

We both stared in horror as The Masked Mutant came nearer. 

He took one more step. Then stopped. 

A bright white light circled his body. The light became a crackling electrical 
current. 

The Mutant uttered a low moan. Then he began to melt. 

His head melted down into his mask. Tinier and tinier—until it disappeared 
completely. The empty mask slumped on to the shoulders of his costume. And 
then the rest of his body melted away, shrinking until there was nothing left but a 
wrinkled costume and cape, heaped on the carpet. 

Libby and I stood staring down at the costume in silence. 

“It—it worked!” I finally managed to choke out. “The toy gun—it worked, 
Libby!” 

“Of course,” she replied with surprising calm. 

She walked over to the empty costume and kicked it with her sneaker. “Of 
course it worked. I warned him it was a Molecule-Melter. He wouldn’t listen.” 

My brain was doing flip-flops. I didn’t really understand. It was just a toy 
pistol. Why did it destroy the mightiest mutant on Earth? 

“Let’s get out of here!” I pleaded, starting toward the door. 

Libby moved to block my path. “I’m sorry, Skipper,” she said softly. 

“Sorry? What do you mean?” 

She raised the plastic pistol and aimed it at me. “I’m sorry,” she said, 
“because you’re disappearing next.” 



27 


At first I thought Libby was joking. “Libby, put down the gun,” I told her. “You 
have a sick sense of humor!” 

She kept the plastic gun aimed at my chest. 

I let out a feeble laugh. 

But I quickly cut it short when I saw the hard expression on her face. 
“Libby—what’s your problem?” I demanded. 

“I’m not Libby,” she replied softly. “I hate to break the news to you, 
Skipper—but there is no Libby.” 

As she said those words, she began to change. Her red hair slid into her 
head. Her cheeks grew wider. Her nose lengthened. Her eyes changed from 
green to black. 

She stretched up, growing taller. Muscles bulged on her skinny arms. And 
as she grew, her clothing changed, too. Her jeans and T-shirt appeared to melt 
away—replaced by a familiar-looking costume. 

The costume of The Masked Mutant. 

“Libby—what’s going on?” I cried in a tiny, frightened voice. I still didn’t 
understand. “How are you doing that?” 

She shook her head. “You don’t catch on very fast, do you?” she said, 
rolling her eyes. Her voice came out deep and booming. A man’s voice. 

“Libby, I—” 

She swept her cape behind her. “I’m The Masked Mutant, Skipper. I 
changed my molecules into a girl your age and called myself Libby. But I’m The 
Masked Mutant.” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

She tossed the toy gun aside and grinned at me triumphantly. 

“But you just melted The Masked Mutant!” I cried. “We both saw him 
melt!” 

She shook her head. “No. You’re mistaken. I just melted The Magnificent 
Molecule Man.” 

I gaped at her in astonishment. “Huh? Molecule Man?” 

“He worked for me,” she explained, glancing down at the crumpled, empty 
costume on the floor. “Sometimes I ordered him to dress like me. To keep people 



off my track.” 

“He worked for you—and you melted him?” I cried. 

“I’m a villain,” The Masked Mutant replied, smiling. “I do very bad things 
—remember?” 

It all started to come clear. There never was a Libby. It had been The 
Masked Mutant all along. 

The Masked Mutant stepped over the crumpled costume to move closer to 
me. Once again, I pressed my back against the wall. “Now I have no choice. 
Now I have to do something very bad to you, Skipper,” he said flatly, his black 
eyes staring hard into mine through his mask. 

“But—why?” I cried. “Why can’t I just leave? I’ll go straight home. I’ll 
never tell anyone about you. Really!” I pleaded. 

He shook his head. “I can’t let you leave. You belong here now.” 

“Huh?” I gasped. “What are you saying, Libby—I mean, Mutant?” 

“You belong here now, Skipper,” he replied coldly. “I knew it when I saw 
you on the bus for the first time. I knew you were perfect when you told me you 
knew everything about my comics.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered again. 

“It’s so hard to find good characters for my stories, Skipper. It’s so hard to 
find good foes. I’m always looking for new faces. That’s why I was so pleased 
when I discovered you.” 

His evil grin grew wider. “Then when you recognized my headquarters 
building, I knew you were right. I knew you were ready to star in a story.” 

The smile faded quickly. “I’m so sorry, Skipper. But the story is over. Your 
part has come to an end.” 

“What—what are you going to do?” I stammered. 

“Destroy you, of course!” The Mutant replied coldly. 

I pressed my back against the wall. I stared back at him, thinking hard. 

“Good-bye, Skipper,” The Masked Mutant said softly. 

“But you can’t do this!” I screamed. “You’re just a character in a comic 
book! But I’m real! I’m a real, live person! I’m a real boy!” 

A strange smile formed on The Mutant’s lips. “No, you’re not, Skipper,” he 
said, snickering. “You’re not real. You’re just like me now. You’re a comic book 
character, too.” 



28 


I pinched my arm. It felt as warm and real as always. 

“You’re a liar!” I shouted. 

The Masked Mutant nodded. A pleased smile formed on his face. “Yes, I’m 
a liar,” he agreed. “That’s one of my better qualities.” His smile faded. “But I’m 
not lying this time, Skipper. You’re not real anymore.” 

I refused to believe him. “I feel the way I always have,” I declared. 

“But I changed you into a comic book character,” he insisted. “Remember 
when you entered this building for the first time? Remember when you walked 
through the glass door and a beam of light passed over you?” 

I nodded. “Yes. I remember that,” I muttered. 

“Well, that was a scanner,” The Masked Mutant continued. “When you 
stepped through it, it scanned your body. It turned you into tiny dots of ink.” 

“No!” I shouted. 

He ignored my cry. “That’s all you are now, Skipper. Tiny dots of red, blue, 
and yellow ink. You’re a comic book character, just like me.” 

He slid toward me menacingly, his cape spreading out behind him. “But I’m 
sorry to say you’ve made your last appearance in my comic book. Or in any 
comic book.” 

“Wait!” I cried. 

“I can’t wait any longer,” The Masked Mutant replied coldly. “I’ve already 
wasted too much time on you, Skipper.” 

“But I’m not Skipper!” I declared. 

“I’m not Skipper Matthews,” I said. “There is no Skipper Matthews.” 

“Oh, really?” he asked, rolling his eyes. “Then who are you?” 

“I’m The Colossal Elastic Boy!” I replied. 



29 


The Masked Mutant uttered a low gasp. “Elastic Boy!” he exclaimed. “I thought 
you looked familiar!” 

“Good-bye, Mutant,” I said in a deep voice. 

“Where are you going?” he asked sharply. 

“Back to my home planet of Xargos,” I replied, starting toward the door. 
“I’m not allowed to guest-star in other comic books.” 

He moved quickly to block the door. “Nice try, Elastic Boy,” he said. “But 
you have invaded my secret headquarters. I have to destroy you.” 

I laughed. “You can’t destroy Elastic Boy!” I boasted. “I’ll stretch out my 
elastic arms and wrap you in them, and squeeze you into Play-Doh!” 

“I don’t think so,” The Masked Mutant replied dryly. He let out an angry 
growl. “I’m tired of all this talk, talk, talk. I’m going to tear you to pieces—and 
then tear your pieces into tiny pieces!” 

I laughed again. “No way!” I told him. “I’m elastic, remember? I can’t be 
torn into pieces. I bend—but I don’t break! There’s only one way that Elastic 
Boy can be destroyed!” 

“What’s that?” The Masked Mutant asked. 

“By sulphuric acid,” I replied. “That’s the only thing that can destroy my 
elastic body!” 

A pleased smile spread behind the masked face. 

“Oops!” I cried. “I didn’t mean to let that slip out!” 

I tried to make it to the door. But I wasn’t fast enough. 

I saw The Masked Mutant quickly begin to change. He changed into a 
steaming hot wave of sulphuric acid. 

And before I could move, the tall wave of acid swept toward me. 



30 


With a loud cry, I leaped away. 

The tall wave swept past. It missed me by inches. 

I turned and watched it splash over the carpet. The carpet began to sizzle 
and burn. 

“Yes!” I shouted gleefully. “Yes!” 

I had never felt so happy, so strong, so triumphant! 

I had defeated The Masked Mutant. I had totally tricked him. I had 
destroyed the most evil supervillain ever to walk the planet! 

Me! A twelve-year-old boy named Skipper Matthews! I had sent The 
Masked Mutant to his doom! 

Such a simple trick. But it had worked. 

From reading the comics, I knew that The Masked Mutant could change his 
molecules into anything solid. And then change back again. 

But I tricked him into changing himself into a liquid ! And once he changed 
into a liquid, he could not re-form himself. 

The Masked Mutant was gone forever. 

“Skipper, you are a clever guy!” I shouted out loud. I was so happy, I did a 
little dance on the thick carpet. 

I couldn’t believe The Masked Mutant had believed that I was Elastic Boy. 
I’d made that name up. I’ve never heard of any Elastic Boy! 

But he fell for it. And now the evil supervillain is gone! I thought happily. 

And I am alive! Alive! 

I couldn’t wait to get home and see my family again. The bus ride seemed 
to take hours. 

Finally, I was running up my front lawn. Into the house through the front 

door. 

I immediately saw a brown envelope lying on the mail table. The new issue 
of The Masked Mutant. 

Who needs it? I asked myself. 

I ignored it and hurried to say hi to my parents. I was so glad to be home, I 
was even happy to see Mitzi. “Mitzi—how about a game of Frisbee?” I asked. 



“Huh?” She gaped at me in shock. I never want to play anything with my 
little sister. 

But, today, I just wanted to be happy and celebrate being alive. 

Mitzi and I hurried out to the back yard. We threw a Frisbee around for 
about half an hour. We had a great time. 

“How about a snack?” I asked her. 

“Yeah. I’m starving,” she replied. “Mom left some chocolate cake on the 
counter.” 

Chocolate cake sounded just right. 

Humming happily to myself, I trotted into the kitchen. I pulled down two 
plates from the cabinet. Then I found the big cake knife in the drawer. 

“Don’t make your slice bigger than mine!” Mitzi warned, watching me 
carefully as I prepared to cut the cake. 

“Mitzi, I promise I won’t cheat you,” I said sweetly. I was in such a good 
mood, even Mitzi couldn’t get me upset. 

“This looks like awesome chocolate cake!” I exclaimed. 

I slid the big knife over the cake. 

It slipped. 

“Ow!” I cried out as the knife blade cut the back of my hand. 

I raised my hand and stared down at the cut. “Hey!” I uttered in surprise. 

What was trickling out from the cut? 

Not blood. 

It was red, blue, yellow, and black. 

INK! 

“Cool!” Mitzi cried. 

“Where’s that new Masked Mutant comic?” I asked. I suddenly had the 
feeling that my comic book career wasn’t over! 



MY HAIRIEST ADVENTURE 
Goosebumps - 26 
R.L. Stine 



1 


Why were there so many stray dogs in my town? 

And why did they always choose me to chase? 

Did they wait quietly in the woods, watching people go by? Then did 
they whisper to each other, “See that blond kid? That’s Larry Boyd—let’s 
go get him”? 

I ran as fast as I could. But it’s so hard to run when you’re carrying a 
guitar case. It kept banging against my leg. 

And I kept slipping in the snow. 

The dogs were catching up. They were howling and barking, trying to 
scare me to death. 

Well, it’s working, guys! I thought. I’m scared. I’m plenty scared! 

Dogs are supposed to sense when you’re afraid of them. But I’m not 
usually afraid of dogs. In fact, I really like dogs. 

I’m only afraid of dogs when there’s a pack of them, running furiously 
after me, drooling hungrily, eager to tear me to tiny shreds. Like now. 

Scrambling over the snow, I nearly toppled into a drift up to my knees. 
I glanced back. The dogs were gaining on me. 

It isn’t fair! I thought bitterly. They have four legs, and I only have 

two! 

The big black dog with the evil black eyes was leading the pack, as 
usual. He had his lips pulled back in an angry snarl. He was close enough 
so that I could see his sharp, pointy teeth. 

“Go home! Go home! Bad dogs! Go home!” 

Why was I yelling at them? They didn’t even have homes! 

“Go home! Go home!” 

My boots slipped in the snow, and the weight of my guitar case nearly 
pulled me over. Somehow I staggered forward, caught my balance, and kept 
moving. 

My heart was pounding like crazy. And I felt as if I were burning up, 
even though it was about twelve degrees. 

I squinted against the bright glare of the snow. I struggled to run faster, 
but my leg muscles were starting to cramp. 



I don’t stand a chance! I realized. 

“Ow!” The heavy guitar case bounced against my side. 

I glanced back. The dogs were leaping excitedly, making wide 
crisscrosses across the yards, howling and yowling, as they scrambled after 
me. 

Moving closer. And closer. 

“Go home! Bad dogs! Bad! Go home!” 

Why me? 

I’m a nice guy. Really. Ask anybody. They’ll tell you—Larry Boyd is 
the nicest twelve-year-old kid in town! 

So why did they always chase me? 

The last time, I dived into a parked car and shut the door just as they 
pounced. But today, the dogs were too close. And the cars along the street 
were all snow-covered. By the time I got a car door open, the dogs would 
be having me for dessert! 

I was only half a block from Lily’s house. I could see it on the corner 
across the street. It was my only chance. 

If I could get to Lily’s house, I could—“NOOOOOOOO!” 

I slipped on a small rock, hidden under the snow. The guitar case flew 
from my hand and hit the snow with a soft thud. 

I was down. Facedown in the snow. 

“They’ve got me this time,” I moaned. “They’ve got me.” 



2 


Everything went white. 

I struggled to my knees, frantically brushing snow off my face with 
both hands. 

The dogs barked hungrily. 

“Scat! Get away! Get going!” Another voice. A familiar voice. “Get 
going, dogs! Get away!” 

The barking grew softer. 

I brushed the wet snow from my eyes. “Lily!” I cried happily. “How 
did you get here?” 

She swung a heavy snow shovel in the dogs’ direction. “Scat! Go 
away! Go!” 

The growls turned to low whimpers. The dogs backed up, started to 
retreat. The huge black dog with the black eyes lowered his head and loped 
slowly away. The others followed. 

“Lily—they’re listening to you!” I cried thankfully. I climbed slowly 
to my feet and brushed the snow off the front of my blue down parka. 

“Of course,” she replied, grinning. “I’m tough, Larry. I’m real tough.” 

Lily Vonn doesn’t exactly look tough. She’s twelve like me, but she 
looks younger. She’s short and thin and kind of cute. She has chin-length 
blond hair with bangs that go straight across her forehead. 

The strange thing about Lily is her eyes. One is blue and one is green. 
No one can really believe she has two different colors—until they see them. 

I brushed most of the snow off the front of my coat and the knees of 
my jeans. Lily handed me my guitar case. “Hope it’s waterproof,” she 
muttered. 

I raised my eyes to the street. The dogs were barking wildly again, 
chasing a squirrel through several front yards. 

“I saw you from my window,” Lily said as we started toward her 
house. “Why do they always chase after you?” 

I shrugged. “I was just asking myself the same question,” I told her. 
Our boots made crunching noises in the snow. Lily led the way. I stepped in 
her bootprints. 



We waited for a car to move past, its tires sliding on the slick road. 
Then we crossed the street and made our way up her driveway. 

“How come you’re late?” Lily asked. 

“I had to help my dad shovel the drive,” I replied. Some snow had 
caught inside my hood and was trickling down the back of my neck. I 
shivered. I couldn’t wait to get inside the house. 

The others were all hanging out in Lily’s living room. I waved hi to 
Manny, Jared, and Kristina. Manny was down on his knees, fiddling with 
his guitar amp. It made a loud squeal, and everybody jumped. 

Manny is tall and skinny and kind of goofy-looking, with a crooked 
smile and a mop of curly, black hair. Jared is twelve like the rest of us, but 
he looks eight. I don’t think I’ve ever seen him without his black-and-silver 
Raiders cap on. Kristina is a little chubby. She has curly, carrot-colored hair 
and wears glasses with blue plastic frames. 

I tugged off my wet coat and hung it on a peg in the front entryway. 
The house felt steamy and warm. I straightened my sweatshirt and joined 
the others. 

Manny glanced up from his amp and laughed. “Hey, look—Larry’s 
hair is messed up. Somebody take a picture!” 

Everybody laughed. 

They’re always teasing me about my hair. Can I help it if I have really 
good hair? It’s dark blond and wavy, and I wear it long. 

“Hairy Larry!” Lily declared. 

The other three laughed and then picked up the chant. “Hairy Larry! 
Hairy Larry! Hairy Larry!” 

I made an angry face and swept my hand back through my hair, 
pushing it off my forehead. I could feel myself blushing. 

I really don’t like being teased. It always makes me angry, and I 
always blush. 

I guess that’s why Lily and my other friends tease me so much. They 
tease me about my hair, and about my big ears, and about anything else they 
can think of. 

And I always get angry. And I always blush. Which makes them tease 
me even more. 

“Hairy Larry! Hairy Larry! Hairy Larry!” 

Great friends, huh? 



Well, actually, they are great friends. We have a lot of fun together. 
The five of us have a band. This week, it’s called The Geeks. Last week, we 
called ourselves The Spirit. We change the name a lot. 

Lily has a gold coin that she wears on a chain around her neck. Her 
grandfather gave the coin to her. He told her it’s real pirate gold. 

So Lily wants to call our band Pirate Gold. But I don’t think that’s cool 
enough. And Manny, Jared, and Kristina agree. 

At least our name—The Geeks—is a lot cooler than Howie and the 
Shouters. That’s the band who’s challenging us in the big Battle of the 
Bands contest at school. 

We still can’t believe that Howie Hurwin named the band after 
himself! He’s only the drummer. His stuck-up sister, Marissa, is the singer. 
“Why didn’t you call it Marissa and the Shouters?” I asked him one day 
after school. 

“Because Marissa doesn’t rhyme with anything,” he replied. 

“Huh? What does Howie rhyme with?” I asked him. 

“Zowie!” he said. Then he laughed and messed up my hair. 

What a creep. 

No one likes Howie or his sister. The Geeks can’t wait to blow the 
Shouters off the stage. 

“If only one of us played bass,” Jared moaned as we tuned up. 

“Or saxophone or trumpet or something,” Kristina added, pulling out a 
couple of pink guitar picks from her open case. 

“I think we sound great,” Manny said, still down on the floor, fiddling 
with the cord to his amp. “Three guitars is a great sound. Especially when 
we put on the fuzztone and crank them all the way up.” 

Kristina, Manny, and I all play guitar. Lily is the singer. And Jared 
plays a keyboard. His keyboard has a drum synthesizer with ten different 
rhythms on it. So we also have drums. Kind of. 

As soon as Manny got his amp working, we tried to play a Rolling 
Stones song. Jared couldn’t find the right drum rhythm on his synthesizer. 
So we played without it. 

As soon as we finished, I shouted, “Let’s start again!” 

The others all groaned. “Larry, we sounded great!” Lily insisted. “We 
don’t need to play it again.” 

“The rhythm was way off,” I said. 



“You’re way off!” Manny exclaimed, making a face at me. 

“Larry is a perfectionist,” Kristina said. “Did you forget that, Manny?” 

“How could I forget?” Manny groaned. “He never lets us finish one 
song!” 

I could feel myself blushing again. “I just want to get it right,” I told 
them. 

Okay. Okay. Maybe l am a perfectionist. Is that a bad thing? 

“The Battle of the Bands is in two weeks,” I said. “We don’t want to 
get onstage and embarrass ourselves, do we?” 

I just hate being embarrassed. I hate it more than anything in the 
world. More than steamed broccoli! 

We started playing again. Jared hit the saxophone button on his 
keyboard, and it sounded as if we had a saxophone. Manny took the first 
solo, and I took the second. 

I messed up one chord. I wanted to start again. 

But I knew they’d murder me if I stopped. So I kept on playing. 

Lily’s voice cracked on a high note. But she has such a sweet, tiny 
voice, it didn’t sound too bad. 

We played without taking a break for nearly two hours. It sounded 
pretty good. Whenever Jared found the right drum rhythm, it sounded really 
good. 

After we put our instruments back in their cases, Lily suggested we go 
outside and mess around in the snow. The afternoon sun was still high in a 
shimmery blue sky. The thick blanket of snow sparkled in the golden 
sunlight. 

We chased each other around the snow-covered evergreen shrubs in 
Lily’s front yard. Manny crushed a big, wet snowball over Jared’s Raiders 
cap. That started a snowball fight that lasted until we were all gasping for 
breath and laughing too hard to toss any more snow. 

“Let’s build a snowman,” Lily suggested. 

“Let’s make it look like Larry,” Kristina added. Her blue-framed 
glasses were completely steamed up. 

“Whoever heard of a snowman with perfect blond hair?” Lily replied. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered. 

They started to roll big balls of snow for the snowman’s body. Jared 
shoved Manny over one of the big snowballs and tried to roll him up in the 



ball. But Manny was too heavy. The whole thing crumbled to powder under 
him. 

While they worked on the snowman, I wandered down to the street. 
Something caught my eye at the curb next door. 

A pile of junk standing next to a metal trash Dumpster. 

I glanced up at the neighbors’ house. I could see that it was being 
remodeled. The pile of junk at the curb was waiting to be carted away. 

I leaned over the side of the Dumpster and began shuffling through the 
stuff. I love old junk. I can’t help myself. I just love pawing through piles of 
old stuff. 

Leaning into the Dumpster, I shoved aside a stack of wall tiles and a 
balled-up shower curtain. Beneath a small, round, shag rug, I found a white 
enamel medicine chest. 

“Wow! This is cool!” I murmured to myself. 

I pulled it up with both hands, moved away from the Dumpster, and 
opened the chest. To my surprise, I found bottles and plastic tubes inside. 

I started to examine them, moving them around with my hand, when 
an orange bottle caught my eye. “Hey, guys!” I shouted up to my friends. 
“Look what I found!” 



3 


I carried the orange bottle back up to Lily’s yard. “Hey, guys—look!” I 
called, waving the bottle. 

No one looked up. Manny and Jared were struggling to lift one big 
snowball and set it on the other one to form the snowman’s body. Lily was 
shouting encouragement. Kristina was wiping snow off her glasses with one 
of her gloves. 

“Hey, Larry—what’s that?” Kristina finally asked, putting her glasses 
back on. The others turned and saw the bottle in my hand. 

I read the label to them: “INSTA-TAN. Rub on a dark suntan in 
minutes.” 

“Cool!” Manny declared. “Let’s try it.” 

“Where did you find it?” Lily demanded. Her cheeks were bright red 
from the cold. There were white flecks of snow in her bangs. 

I pointed to the Dumpster. “Your neighbors threw it out. The bottle is 
full,” I announced. 

“Let’s try it!” Manny repeated, grinning his crooked grin. 

“Yeah. Let’s all go into school on Monday with dark suntans!” Kristina 
urged. “Can you see the look on Miss Shindling’s face? We’ll tell her we all 
went to Florida!” 

“No! The Bahamas!” Lily declared. “We’ll tell Howie Hurwin that The 
Geeks went to the Bahamas to practice!” 

Everyone laughed. 

“Do you think the stuff works?” Jared asked, adjusting his cap and 
staring at the bottle. 

“It has to,” Lily said. “They couldn’t sell it if it didn’t work.” She 
grabbed the bottle from my hand. “It’s nearly full. We can all get great tans. 
Come on. Let’s do it. It’ll be so cool!” 

We all followed Lily back into the house, our boots crunching over the 
snow, our breath steaming up above our heads. 

I pulled off my coat and tossed it onto the pile with the others. As I 
made my way into the living room, I began to have second thoughts. What 
if the stuff doesn’t work? I asked myself. What if it turns us bright yellow 



or green instead of tan? 

I’d be so totally embarrassed if I had to show up at school with bright 
green skin. I couldn’t do it. I just couldn’t. Even if it took months, I’d hide 
in my house—in my closet—till the stuff wore off. 

The others didn’t seem to be worried. 

We jammed into the downstairs bathroom. Lily still had the bottle of 
INSTA-TAN. She twisted off the cap and poured a big glob of it into her 
hand. It was a creamy white liquid. 

“Mmmmm. Smells nice,” Lily reported, raising her hand to her face. 
“Very sweet-smelling.” 

She began rubbing it on her neck, then her cheeks, then her forehead. 
Tilting the bottle, she poured another big puddle into her palm. Then she 
mbbed the liquid over the backs of both hands. 

Manny took the INSTA-TAN bottle next. He splashed a big glob of it 
into his hand. Then he started rubbing it all over his face. 

“Leels cool and creamy,” Kristina reported when her turn came. Jared 
went next. He practically emptied the bottle as he rubbed the stuff on his 
face and neck. 

Linally it was my turn. I took the bottle and started to tilt it into my 
palm. 

But something made me stop. I hesitated. I could see that the others 
were all watching me, waiting for me to splash the liquid all over my skin, 
too. 

But, instead, I turned the bottle over and read the tiny print on the 
label. 

And what I read made me gasp out loud. 



4 


“Larry, what’s your problem?” Lily demanded. “Just pour a little in your 
hand and rub it on.” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

“Do I look darker?” Kristina asked Lily. “Is it working?” 

“Not yet,” Lily told her. She turned back to me. “What’s wrong, 
Larry?” 

“The 1-label,” I stammered. “It says ‘Do not use after February, 
1991.’” 

Everyone laughed. Their laughter rang off the tile walls in the narrow 
bathroom. 

“It can’t hurt you,” Lily said, shaking her head. “So what if the stuff is 
a little old? That doesn’t mean it will make your skin fall off!” 

“Don’t wimp out,” Manny said, grabbing the bottle and tilting the top 
toward my hand. “Go ahead. Pour it. We’ve all done it, Larry. Now it’s your 
turn.” 

“I think my skin is starting to tan,” Kristina said. She and Jared were 
admiring themselves in the mirror over the sink. 

“Go ahead, Larry,” Lily urged. “Those dates on the labels don’t mean 
anything.” She shoved my arm. “Put it on. What could happen?” 

I could see that they were all staring at me now. My face grew hot, and 
I knew that I was blushing. 

I didn’t want them to call me a wimp. I didn’t want to be the only one 
to chicken out. Sol tilted the bottle down and poured the last sticky glob of 
the liquid into the palm of my hand. 

Then I splashed it onto my face and rubbed it all over. I covered my 
face, my neck, and the back of my hands. It felt cool and creamy. And it did 
have a sweet smell, a little like my dad’s aftershave. 

The others cheered when I finished rubbing the cream in. “Way to go, 
Larry!” Jared clapped me on the back so hard, I nearly dropped the empty 
INSTA-TAN bottle. 

We all pushed and shoved, struggling to get a good view of ourselves 
in the small medicine chest mirror. Manny gave Jared a hard shove and sent 



him sprawling into the shower. 

“How long is it supposed to take?” Kristina asked. The bright ceiling 
light reflected off her glasses as she studied herself in the mirror. 

“I don’t think it’s working at all,” Lily said, letting out a disappointed 

sigh. 

I studied the label again. “It says we should have a dark, good-looking 
tan almost instantly,” I reported. I shook my head. “I knew this stuff was 
too old. I knew we shouldn’t have—” 

Manny’s shrill scream cut off my words. We all turned to him and saw 
his horrified expression. 

“My face!” Manny shrieked. “My face! It’s falling off!” 

He had his hands cupped. They trembled as he held them up. And I 
saw that he was holding a pale blob of his own skin! 



5 


“Ohhhh.” A weak moan escaped my lips. 

The others stared down at Manny’s hands in silent horror. 

“My skin!” he groaned. “My skin!” 

And then a grin burst out over his face, and he started to laugh. 

As he held up his hand, I saw that it wasn’t a piece of pale skin at all. 
It was a wet, wadded-up tissue. 

Laughing his head off, Manny let the tissue float down to the bathroom 
floor. 

“You jerk!” Lily cried angrily. 

We all began shouting and shoving Manny. We pushed him into the 
shower. Lily reached for the knobs to turn on the water. 

“No—stop!” Manny pleaded, laughing hard, struggling to break free. 
“Please! It was just a joke!” 

Lily changed her mind and backed away. We all took final glances into 
the mirror as we paraded out of the bathroom. 

No change. No tan. The stuff hadn’t worked at all. 

We grabbed our coats and hurried back outside to finish the snowman. 
I took the empty INSTA-TAN bottle with me and tossed it into the snow as 
Lily and Kristina rolled a snowball to make the head. Then they lifted it 
onto the snowman’s body. 

I found two dark stones for eyes. Manny grabbed Jared’s Raiders cap 
and placed it on the snowman’s head. It looked pretty good, but Jared 
quickly grabbed his cap back. 

“It looks a lot like you, Manny,” Jared said. “Except smarter.” 

We all laughed. 

A strong gust of wind whipped around the side of the house. The wind 
toppled the snowman’s head. It rolled off the body and crumbled to powder 
on the ground. 

“Now it really looks like you!” Jared told Manny. 

“Think fast!” Manny cried. He scooped up a big handful of snow and 
heaved it at Jared. 

Jared tried to duck. But the snow poured over him. He instantly bent 



down, scooped up an even bigger pile of snow, and dropped it over 
Manny’s head. 

This started a long, funny, snowball fight among the five of us. 
Actually, it turned out to be Lily and me against Manny, Jared, and Kristina. 

The two of us held our own for a while. Lily is the fastest snowball 
maker I ever saw. She can make one and throw it in the time it takes me to 
bend down and start rolling the snow between my gloves. 

The snowball fight quickly became a war. We weren’t even bothering 
to make snowballs. We were just heaving big handfuls of snow at each 
other. And then we started rolling in the snow. And then we chased each 
other to the next yard, where the snow was fresh—and started another 
heavy-duty snowball fight. 

What a great time! We were laughing and shouting, all breathing hard, 
all steaming hot despite the cold, swirling winds. 

And then suddenly I felt sick. 

I dropped to my knees, swallowing hard. The snow started to gleam 
brightly. Too brightly. The ground swayed and shook. 

I felt really sick. 

What’s happening to me? I wondered. 



6 


Dr. Murkin raised the long hypodermic needle. It gleamed in the light. A 
tiny droplet of green liquid spilled from the tip. 

“Take a deep breath and hold it, Larry,” the doctor instructed in his 
whispery voice. “This won’t hurt.” 

He said the same words every time I had to see him. 

I knew he was lying. The shot hurt. It hurt every time I got one, which 
was about every two weeks. 

He grabbed my arm gently with his free hand. He leaned close to me, 
so close I could smell the peppermint mouthwash on his breath. 

I took a deep breath and turned away. I could never bear to watch the 
long needle sink into my arm. 

“Ow!” I let out a low cry as the needle punctured the skin. 

Dr. Murkin tightened his grip on my arm. “That doesn’t hurt much, 
does it?” he asked, his voice just above a whisper. 

“Not too much,” I groaned. 

I glanced up at my mother. She was biting her lower lip, her face 
twisted in worry. She looked as if she were getting the shot! 

Finally, I felt the needle slide out. Dr. Murkin dabbed a cold, alcohol- 
soaked cotton ball against the puncture spot. “You’ll be okay now,” he said, 
patting my bare back. “You can put your shirt back on.” 

He turned and smiled reassuringly at my mother. 

Dr. Murkin is a very distinguished-looking man. I guess he’s about 
fifty or so. He has straight white hair that he slicks down and brushes 
straight back. He has friendly blue eyes behind square-shaped, black 
eyeglasses, and a warm smile. 

Even though he lies when he says the shot won’t hurt, I think he’s a 
really good doctor, and I like him a lot. He always makes me feel better. 

“Same old sweat gland problem,” he told my mother, writing some 
notes in my file. “He got overheated. And we know that’s not good—don’t 
we, Larry?” 

I muttered a reply. 

I have a problem with my sweat glands. They don’t work very well. I 



mean, I can’t sweat. So when I get really overheated, I start to feel sick. 

That’s why I have to see Dr. Murkin every two weeks. He gives me 
shots that make me feel better. 

Our snowball battle was a lot of fun. But out in the snow and cold 
wind, I didn’t even realize I was getting overheated. 

That’s why I started to feel weird. 

“Do you feel better now?” my mom asked as we made our way out of 
the doctor’s office. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I’m okay,” I told her. I stopped at the door and turned 
to face her. “Do I look any different, Mom?” 

“Huh?” She narrowed her dark eyes at me. “Different? How?” 

“Do I look like maybe I have a suntan or something?” I asked 
hopefully. 

Her eyes studied my face. “I’m a little worried about you, Larry,” she 
said quietly. “I want you to take a short nap when we get home. Okay?” 

I guessed that meant I didn’t look too tanned. 

I knew that INSTA-TAN wouldn’t work. The bottle was too old. And it 
probably didn’t work even when it was new. 

“It’s hard to get a suntan in the winter,” Mom commented as we 
headed across the snowy parking lot to the car. 

Tell me about it, I thought, rolling my eyes. 

Lily called me right after dinner. “I felt a little sick, too,” she admitted. “Are 
you okay?” 

“Yeah. I’m fine,” I replied. I held the cordless phone in one hand and 
flipped TV channels with the remote control in my other hand. 

It’s a bad habit of mine. Sometimes I flip channels for hours at a time 
and never really watch anything. 

“Howie and Marissa walked by after you left,” Lily said. 

“Did you massacre them?” I asked eagerly. “Did you bury them in 
snowballs?” 

Lily laughed. “No. We were all soaked and exhausted by the time 
Howie and Marissa showed up. We all just sort of stood there, shivering.” 

“Did Howie say anything about their band?” I asked. 

“Yeah,” Lily replied. “He said he bought an Eric Clapton guitar book. 
He said he’s learning some new songs that will blow us away.” 



“Howie should stick to drums. He is the worst guitar player in the 
world,” I muttered. “When he plays, the guitar actually squeaks ! I don’t 
know how he does it. How do you make a guitar squeak?” 

Lily laughed. “Marissa squeaks, too. But she calls it singing!” 

We both laughed. 

I cut my laughter short. “Do you think Howie and the Shouters are any 
good?” 

“I don’t know,” Lily replied thoughtfully. “Howie brags so much, you 
can’t really believe him. He says they’re good enough to make a CD. He 
says his dad wants them to make a demo tape so he can send it to all the big 
CD companies.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” I muttered sarcastically. “We should sneak over to 
Howie’s house some afternoon when they’re all practicing,” I suggested. 
“We could listen at the window. Check them out.” 

“Marissa is actually a pretty good singer,” Lily said. “She has a nice 
voice.” 

“But she’s not as good as you,” I said. 

“Well, I think we’re getting better,” Lily commented. Then she added, 
“It’s a shame we don’t have a real drummer.” 

I agreed. “Jared’s drum machine doesn’t always play the same song we 
play!” 

Lily and I talked about the Battle of the Bands a while longer. Then I 
said good night, turned off the phone, and sat down at my desk to start my 
homework. 

I didn’t finish until nearly ten. Yawning, I went downstairs to tell Mom 
and Dad I was going to sleep. Back upstairs, I changed into pajamas and 
crossed the hall to the bathroom to brush my teeth. 

Under the bright bathroom light, I studied my face in the mirror over 
the sink. No tan. My face stared back at me, as pale as ever. 

I picked up my toothbrush and spread a small line of blue toothpaste 

on it. 

I started to raise the toothbrush to my mouth—and then stopped. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. 

The toothbrush dropped into the sink as I gazed at the back of my 
hand. 

At first I thought the hand was covered by a dark shadow. 



But as I raised it closer to my face, I saw to my horror that it was no 
shadow. 

I let out a loud gulping sound as I stared at the back of my hand. 

It was covered by a patch of thick, black hair. 



7 


Staring down in shock, I shook the hand hard. I think I expected the black 
hair to fall off. 

I grabbed at it with my other hand and tugged it. 

“Ow!” 

The hair really was growing from the back of my hand. 

“How can this be?” I cried to myself. Holding the hand in the light, I 
struggled to stop it from trembling so that I could examine it. 

The hair was nearly half an inch high. It was shiny and black. Very 
spikey. Very prickly. It felt kind of rough as I rubbed my other hand over it. 

“Hairy Larry.” 

That dumb name Lily called me suddenly popped back into my head. 

“Hairy Larry.” 

In the mirror I could see my face turning red. They’ll call me Hairy 
Larry for the rest of my life, I thought unhappily, if they ever see this black 
hair growing out of my hand! 

I can’t let anyone see this! I told myself, feeling my chest tighten in 
panic. I can’t ! It would be so embarrassing! 

I examined my left hand. It was as smooth and clear as ever. 

“Thank goodness it’s only on one hand!” I cried. 

I tugged frantically at the patch of black hair again. I pulled at it until 
my hand ached. But the hair didn’t come out. 

My mouth suddenly felt dry. I gripped the edge of the sink with both 
hands, struggling to stop my entire body from trembling. 

“What am I going to do?” I murmured. 

Do I have to wear a glove for the rest of my life? 

I can’t let my friends see this. They’ll call me Hairy Larry forever. 
That’s how I’ll be known for the rest of my life! 

A panicky sob escaped my throat. 

Got to calm down, I warned myself. Got to think clearly. 

I was gripping the sink so tightly, my hands ached. I lifted them, then 
rolled up both pajama sleeves. 



Were my arms covered in black hair, too? 

No. 

I let out a long sigh of relief. 

The square patch of prickly hair on the back of my right hand seemed 
to be the only hair that had grown. 

What to do? What to do? 

I could hear my parents climbing the stairs, on their way to their 
bedroom. Quickly, I closed the bathroom door and locked it. 

“Larry—are you still up? I thought you went to bed,” I heard my mom 
call from out in the hall. 

“Just brushing my hair!” I called out. 

I brush my hair every night before I go to bed. 

I know it doesn’t make any sense. I know it gets messed up the instant 
I put my head down on the pillow. 

It’s just a weird habit. 

I raised my eyes to my hair. My dark blond hair, so soft and wavy. 

So unlike the disgusting patch of spikey black hair on my hand. 

I felt sick. My stomach hurtled up to my throat. 

I forced back my feeling of nausea and pulled open the door to the 
medicine chest. My eyes slid desperately over the bottles and tubes. 

Hair Remover. I searched for the words Hair Remover. 

There is such a thing—isn’t there? 

Not in our medicine cabinet. I read every jar, every bottle. No Hair 
Remover. 

I stared down at the black patch on my hand. Had the hair grown a 
little bit? Or was I imagining it? 

Another idea flashed into my mind. 

I pulled down my dad’s razor. On the bottom shelf of the medicine 
cabinet, I found a can of shaving cream. 

I’ll shave it all off, I decided. It will be easy. 

I’d watched my dad shave a million times. There was nothing to it. I 
started the hot water running in the sink. I splashed some onto the back of 
my hand. Then I rubbed the bar of soap over the bristly black hair until it 
got all lathery. 

My hands were wet and slippery, and the can of shaving cream nearly 
slid out of my grip. But I managed to push the top and spray a pile of white 



shaving cream onto the back of my hand. 

I smoothed it over the ugly black hair. Then I picked up the razor in 
my left hand, held it under the hot water, the way I’d seen Dad do it. 

And I started to shave. It was so hard to shave with my left hand. 

The razor blade slid over the thick patch. The bristly hair came right 
off. 

I watched it flow down the sink drain. 

Then I held my hand under the faucet and let the water rinse away the 
rest of the shaving cream lather. 

The water felt warm and soothing. I dried off my hand and then 
examined it carefully. 

Smooth. Smooth and clean. 

Not a trace of the disgusting black hair. 

Feeling a lot better, I put my dad’s razor and shaving cream back in the 
medicine chest. Then I crept across the hall to my bedroom. 

Rubbing the back of my hand, enjoying its cool smoothness, I clicked 
off the ceiling light and climbed into bed. 

My head sank heavily into the pillow. I yawned, suddenly feeling 
really sleepy. 

What had caused that ugly hair to grow? The question had been 
nagging at me ever since I discovered it. 

Was it the INSTA-TAN? Was it that old bottle of tanning lotion? 

I wondered if any of my friends had grown hair, too? I had to giggle as 
I pictured Manny covered in hair, like a big gorilla. 

But it wasn’t funny. It was scary. 

I rubbed my hand. Still smooth. The hair didn’t seem to be growing 
back. 

I yawned again, drifting to sleep. 

Oh, no. I’m itchy, I suddenly realized, half-awake, half-asleep. My 
whole body feels itchy. 

Is spikey black hair growing all over my body? 



8 


“Did you sleep?” Mom asked as I dragged myself into the kitchen for 
breakfast. “You look pale.” 

Dad lowered his newspaper to check me out. A white mug of coffee 
steamed in front of him. “He doesn’t look pale to me,” he muttered before 
returning to his newspaper. 

“I slept okay,” I said, sliding on to the stool at the breakfast counter. I 
studied my hand, keeping it under the counter just in case. 

No hair. It looked perfectly smooth. 

I had jumped out of bed the instant Mom called from downstairs. I 
turned on the light and studied my entire body in front of my dresser mirror. 

No black hair. 

I was so happy, I felt like singing. I felt like hugging Mom and Dad 
and doing a dance on the breakfast table. 

But that would be embarrassing. 

So I happily ate my Frosted Flakes and drank my orange juice. 

Mom sat down beside Dad and started to crack open a hard-boiled egg. 
She had a hard-boiled egg every morning. But she threw away the yellow 
and only ate the white. She said she didn’t want the cholesterol. 

“Mom and Dad, I have to tell you something. I did a pretty stupid 
thing yesterday. I found an old bottle of a cream called INSTA-TAN in a 
trash Dumpster. And my friends and I all rubbed it on ourselves. You know. 
So we’d have tans. But the date had run out on the bottle. And... well... 
last night, I suddenly grew some really gross black hair on the back of my 
hand.” 

That’s what I wanted to say. 

I wanted to tell them about it. I even opened my mouth to start telling 
them. But I couldn’t do it. 

I’d be so embarrassed. 

They would just start yelling at me and telling me what a jerk I was. 
They’d probably drag me off to Dr. Murkin and tell him what I had done. 
And then he would tell me how stupid I had been. 

So I kept my mouth shut. 



“You’re awfully quiet this morning,” Mom said, sliding a sliver of egg 
white into her mouth. 

“Nothing much to talk about,” I muttered. 

I ran into Lily on the way to school. She had her coat collar pulled up and a 
red-and-blue wool ski cap pulled down over her short blond hair. 

“It isn’t that cold!” I said, jogging to catch up with her. 

“Mom said it’s going down to ten,” Lily replied. “She made me bundle 

up.” 

The morning sun floated low over the houses, a red ball in the pale 
sky. The wind felt sharp. We leaned into it as we walked. A hard crust had 
formed over the snow, and our boots crunched loudly. 

I took a deep breath. I decided to ask Lily the big question on my 
mind. “Lily,” I started hesitantly. “Did any... uh... well... did any strange 
hair grow on the back of your hands last night?” 

She stopped walking and stared at me. A solemn expression darkened 
her face. “Yes,” she confessed in a hushed whisper. 



9 


“Huh?” I gasped. My heart skipped a beat. “You grew hair on your hand?” 

Lily nodded grimly. She moved closer. Her blue eye and her green eye 
stared at me from under the wool ski cap. 

“Hair grew on my hands,” she whispered, her breath steaming up the 
cold air as she talked. “Then it grew on my arms, and my legs, and my 
back.” 

I let out a choked cry. 

“Then my face changed into a wolf’s face,” Lily continued, still 
staring hard at me. “And I ran out to the woods and howled at the moon. 
Like this.” She threw back her head and uttered a long, mournful howl. 

“Then I found three people in the woods, and I ate them!” Lily 
declared. “Because I’m a werewolf !” 

She growled at me and snapped her teeth. And then she burst out 
laughing. 

I could feel my face turning red. 

Lily gave me a hard, playful shove. I lost my balance and nearly fell 
on to my back. 

She laughed even harder. “You believed me—didn’t you, Larry!” she 
accused. “You actually believed that dumb story!” 

“No way!” I cried. My face felt red-hot. “No way, Lily. Of course I 
didn’t believe you!” 

But I had believed her story. Up to the part where she said she ate 
three people. 

Then I finally figured out that she was joking, that she was teasing me. 

“Hairy Larry!” Lily chanted. “Hairy Larry!” 

“Stop it!” I insisted angrily. “You’re not funny, you know? You’re not 
funny at all!” 

“Well, you are!” she shot back. “Funny-looking!” 

“Ha-ha,” I replied sarcastically. I turned and crossed the street, taking 
long strides, trying to get away from her. 

“Hairy Larry!” she called, chasing after me. “Hairy Larry!” 

I slid on a patch of ice. I quickly caught my balance, but my backpack 



slid off my shoulder and dropped with a thud onto the street. 

As I bent to pick it up, Lily stood over me. “Did you grow hair last 
night, Larry?” she demanded. 

“Huh?” I pretended not to hear her. 

“Did you grow hair on the back of your hand? Is that why you asked 
me?” Lily asked, leaning over me. 

“No way,” I muttered. I hoisted the backpack onto my shoulder and 
started walking again. “No way,” I repeated. 

Lily laughed. “Are you a werewolf?” 

I pretended to laugh, too. “No. I’m a vampire,” I replied. 

I wished I could tell Lily the truth. I really wanted to tell her about the 
patch of ugly hair. 

But I knew she could never keep it a secret. I knew she would spread 
the story over the whole school. And then everyone I knew would call me 
Hairy Larry for the rest of my life! 

I felt bad about lying to her. I mean, she is my best friend. 

But what could I do? 

We walked the rest of the way to school without saying much. I kept 
glancing over at Lily. She had the strangest smile on her face. 

“Are you ready to present your book reports?” Miss Shindling asked. 

The classroom erupted with sounds—chairs scraping, Trapper-Keepers 
being opened, papers being rustled, throats being cleared. 

Standing in front of the entire class and reciting a book report makes 
everyone nervous. It makes me very nervous! I just hate having everyone 
stare at me. 

And if I goof up a word or forget what I want to say next, I always turn 
bright red. And then everyone laughs and makes fun of me. 

The night before, I had practiced my book report standing in front of 
the mirror. And I had done pretty well. Only a few tiny mistakes. 

Of course, I hadn’t been nervous giving the report to myself in my 
room. Now, my knees were shaking—and I hadn’t even been called on yet! 

“Howie, would you give your report first?” Miss Shindling asked, 
motioning for Howie Hurwin to come to the front of the class. 

“It’s a shame to have the best go first!” Howie replied, grinning. 

A few kids laughed. Other kids groaned. 



I knew that Howie wasn’t joking. He really thought he was the best at 
everything. 

He stepped confidently to the front of the room. Howie is a big guy, 
sort of chubby, with thick, brown hair that he never brushes, and a big, 
round face with freckles on his cheeks. 

He always has a smirk on his face. A stuck-up look that says, “I’m the 
best—and you’re an insect.” 

He usually wears baggy faded denim jeans about five sizes too big, 
and a long-sleeved T-shirt with a shiny black vest opened over it. 

He held up the book he was reporting on. One of the Matt Christopher 
baseball books. 

I groaned to myself. I knew in advance exactly what Howie was going 
to say: “I recommend this book to anyone who likes baseball.” 

That’s how Howie always started his book reports. So boring! 

But Howie always got A’s anyway. I never understood why Miss 
Shindling thinks he’s so terrific. 

Howie cleared his throat and grinned at Miss Shindling. Then he 
turned to the class and started his report in a loud, steady voice. “I 
recommend this book to anyone who likes baseball,” he began. 

Told you. 

I yawned loudly. No one seemed to notice. 

Howie droned on. “This is a very exciting book with a very good 
plot,” he said. “If you like a lot of excitement, you’ll like this book. 
Especially if you’re a baseball fan.” 

I didn’t hear the rest of it. I kept silently going over and over my own 
book report. 

A few minutes later, when Miss Shindling announced, “Larry, you’re 
next!” I almost didn’t hear her. 

I took a deep breath and climbed to my feet. Stay cool, Larry, I told 
myself. You’ve practiced and practiced your report. There’s nothing to be 
nervous about. 

Clearing my throat loudly, I started up the aisle to the front of the 
room. I was halfway up the aisle when Howie stuck out his foot. 

I saw his big grin—but I didn’t see his foot. 

“Oh!” I cried out in surprise as I stumbled over it—and went sprawling 
on the floor. 



The classroom exploded with laughter. 

My heart pounding, I started to pull myself up. 
But I stopped when I saw my hands. 

Both of them were bristling with thick, black hair. 



10 


“Larry, are you okay?” I heard Miss Shindling call from her desk. 

“Uh..I was too stunned to answer. 

“Larry, are you hurt?” 

“Uh... well...” I couldn’t speak at all. I couldn’t move. I couldn’t 
think. 

Crouched on the floor, I stared in horror at my hairy hands. 

Above me, I could hear kids still laughing about how Howie had 
tripped me. I glanced up to see the kid next to Howie slapping him a high- 
five. 

Ha-ha. Very funny. 

Usually, I’d be totally embarrassed. But I didn’t have time to be 
embarrassed. I was too scared. 

Had anyone seen my hairy hands? 

Still down on the floor, I glanced quickly around the room. 

No one was pointing in horror or crying out. 

Maybe no one had caught a glimpse of them yet. 

Quickly, I jammed both hands deep into my jeans pockets. 

When I was sure that both hands were completely hidden, I climbed 
slowly to my feet. 

“Look! Larry is blushing!” someone called from the back row. The 
room exploded with more laughter. 

Of course, that made me blush even redder. But blushing wasn’t 
exactly my biggest problem. 

There was no way I could stand in front of the class with these two 
hairy hands. I’d rather die! 

Without even thinking about it, I started hurrying back up the aisle to 
the classroom door. With my hands jammed into my jeans, it wasn’t easy to 
walk fast. 

“Larry—what’s wrong?” Miss Shindling called from the front of the 
room. “Where are you going?” 

“Uh... I’ll be right back,” I managed to choke out. 



“Are you sure you’re okay?” the teacher asked. 

“Yeah. Fine,” I mumbled. “Be right back. Really.” 

I knew everyone was staring at me. But I didn’t care. I just had to get 
out of there. I had to figure out what to do about my hands. 

As I reached the door, I heard Miss Shindling scold Howie. “You 
could have hurt Larry. You shouldn’t trip people, Howie. I’ve warned you 
before.” 

“But, Miss Shindling—it was an accident,” Howie lied. 

I slipped out the door. Into the long, empty hall. 

I checked to make sure no one was around to see me. Then I pulled my 
hands from my pockets. 

I had a dim hope that maybe my hands would be back to normal. But 
that hope vanished as soon as I raised them to the light. 

Thick, black hair—nearly an inch high!—covered both hands. How 
could it grow so fast? I wondered. 

The backs of my hands were hairy. And my palms were hairy, too. 
Hair poked up from the knuckles of my fingers. And clumps of black hair 
grew in the space between my fingers. 

I rubbed my hands together, as if trying to rub the ugly hair away. But 
of course it didn’t come off. 

“Nooooooo. Please—noooooo!” I moaned out loud without realizing 
it. 

What could I do? 

I couldn’t go back to class with these hairy monster hands. They would 
make everyone sickl 

I would be embarrassed for the rest of my life. Whenever anyone 
would see me coming, they’d say, “Here comes Hairy Larry Boyd. 
Remember that day the black hair grew all over his hands?” 

I’ll run home, I decided. I’ll get away from here. 

No. How could I leave school in the middle of the morning? Miss 
Shindling was waiting for me to return and give my book report. 

I stood frozen, my back against the tile wall, gazing at the hideous 
hands. 

And I suddenly realized that I wasn’t alone in the hallway. 

I glanced up—and gasped when I saw Mr. Fosburg, the principal. 

He was carrying a stack of textbooks. But he had stopped a few feet 



away from me. 

And he was staring in shock at my hairy hands. 



11 


I swung my hands down and tucked them behind my back. 

But it was too late. Mr. Fosburg had already seen them. His blue eyes 
narrowed as he studied me. 

I shuddered. 

What was he going to say? What was he going to do now? 

“Is it too cold in the building?” the principal asked. 

“Huh?” I replied. What was he asking? 

I leaned back against my hands, pressing them against the wall. Even 
through my shirt, I could feel the prickly hair all over them. 

“Should I have the furnace turned up, Larry?” Mr. Fosburg asked. “Is 
it too cold? Is that why you’re wearing gloves to class?” 

“G-gloves?” I stammered. 

He thought I was wearing gloves! 

“Yes. I... uh... was a little cold,” I told him, starting to feel a little 
better. “That’s why I went to my locker. For gloves.” 

He stared at me thoughtfully. Then he turned and headed the other 
way, balancing the stack of textbooks in both hands. “I’ll talk to the 
custodian about it,” he called back. 

I breathed a sigh of relief as he disappeared around the corner. That 
had been a close call. 

But he had given me a good idea. Gloves. 

I hurried to my locker. Turning the dial on the combination lock felt 
strange with my hairy fingers. But I opened the locker easily and pulled my 
black leather gloves from the pockets of my parka. 

A few seconds later, I stepped back into the classroom. Lily stood at 
the front of the class, giving her book report. She glanced at me curiously as 
I slid back into my seat. 

When Lily finished, Miss Shindling called me to the front of the room. 
“Are you okay now, Larry?” she asked. 

“Yes,” I replied. “My... uh... hands were cold.” I climbed out of my 
seat and stepped quickly to the front of the room. 

Some kids started to giggle and point at my gloves. But I didn’t care. 



At least no one could see my hands with the ugly black fur sprouting 
all over them. 

I took a deep breath and started my report. “The book I read is by 
Bruce Coville,” I began. 

“And I would recommend it to anyone who likes funny science fiction 
stories....” 

After school, I hurried to my locker. I kept my head down and tried to avoid 
everyone. 

I had worn the gloves all day. They were hot and uncomfortable. And 
they seemed to grow tighter and tighter. 

I wondered if the black hair on my hands was growing. But I was 
afraid to take off the gloves to check it out. 

I tugged on my parka and slung my backpack over one shoulder. I 
have to get out of here and think, I told myself. 

A few steps from the front exit, I heard Lily calling my name. I turned 
and saw her chasing after me. She was wearing an oversized yellow sweater 
pulled down over bright green tights. 

I kept walking. “Catch you later!” I called back to her. “I’m in a 
hurry.” 

But she came running up and stepped in front of me. “Aren’t you 
coming to band practice?” she asked. 

I was so upset about my hairy hands that I’d completely forgotten. 

“It’s at my house again this afternoon—remember?” Lily continued, 
walking backwards as I made my way to the doors. 

“I—I can’t,” I stammered. “I don’t feel very well.” 

That was the truth. 

She stared hard at me. “What’s your problem, Larry? How come 
you’ve been so weird all day?” 

“I just don’t feel well,” I insisted. “Sorry about the practice. Can we do 
it tomorrow?” 

“I guess,” she replied. She said something else, but I didn’t hear it. I 
pushed open the door and hurried out of the school. 

I ran all the way home. The sun beamed down on the snow, making it 
gleam like silver. It was beautiful, but I couldn’t enjoy it. I was lost in my 
own troubled thoughts. 



Thinking about hair. Thick patches of black, spikey hair. 

I burst into the house and tossed my backpack onto the floor. I started 
up the stairs to my room—but stopped when I heard Mom call my name. 

I found her in the living room, on the chair by the front window. She 
had Jasper, our cat, in her lap and the cordless phone up to her ear. She said 
something into it, then lowered it as she raised her eyes to me. 

“Larry, you’re home early. Don’t you have band practice?” 

“Not today,” I lied. “I have a lot of homework, so I came straight 
home.” Another lie. 

I didn’t want to tell her the truth. I didn’t want to tell her that I had 
mbbed INSTA-TAN all over myself and now I was sprouting disgusting 
black hair. 

I didn’t want to tell her. But it suddenly burst out of me. The whole 
story. I just couldn’t hold it in any longer. 

“Mom, you won’t believe this,” I started in a tiny, choked voice. “I’m 
growing hair, Mom. Really gross black hair. On my hands. You see, my 
friends and I—we found this old bottle of tanning lotion. And I know it was 
really stupid. But we all poured it on ourselves. I rubbed it all over my face, 
and hands, and neck. And now I’m growing hair, Mom. In school today, I 
looked down. And both of my hands were covered in black hair. I’m so 
embarrassed. And I’m scared, too. I’m really scared.” 

I was breathing hard as I finished the story. I had been staring down at 
the floor as I told it. But now I raised my eyes to see my mom’s reaction. 

What would she say? Could she help me? 



12 


I heard her mumble something. But I couldn’t understand the words. 

Then I realized that she wasn’t talking to me. 

She had the phone pressed to her ear, and she was talking into it. 

Mom had gone back to her telephone conversation. She was 
concentrating so hard, she hadn’t heard a word I had said! 

I let out an annoyed groan. Then I spun around and hurried up the 
stairs to my room. I closed the door behind me and tore off the hot, 
uncomfortable gloves. 

Jasper had run upstairs and perched on the window seat. She spent 
most of the day on the window seat in my room, staring down at the front 
yard. 

As I tossed the gloves onto a chair, she turned to me. Her bright yellow 
eyes glowed happily. 

I crossed the room and picked her up. Then I sat down on the window 
seat and hugged her. 

“Jasper, you’re the only real friend I have,” I whispered, petting her 
back. 

To my surprise, the cat let out a squawk, arched her back, and jumped 
to the floor. She ran halfway across the room, then turned back, her yellow 
eyes glaring at me. 

It took me a few seconds to realize the problem. I held up my hands. 
“It’s these hairy paws, isn’t it, Jasper?” I said sadly. “They frightened you— 
didn’t they?” 

The cat tilted her head, as if trying to understand me. 

“Well, they frighten me, too,” I told her. 

I jumped up and hurried across the hall to the bathroom. Once again, I 
pulled my dad’s shaving equipment from the medicine cabinet. 

I set to work, shaving off the thick hair. 

It wasn’t easy. Especially trying to shave off the tufts of hair that had 
grown in the spaces between my fingers. That hair was really hard to reach. 

The hair was stiff and tough. Like the bristles on a hairbrush. I cut 
myself twice, on the palm and the back of my right hand. 



As I rinsed the shaving cream off, I glanced down and saw Jasper 
staring up at me from the bathroom doorway. “Don’t tell Mom and Dad,” I 
whispered. 

She blinked her yellow eyes and yawned. 

The next morning, I awoke before Mom and Dad. Most mornings, I lie 
in bed and wait for Mom to shout that it’s time to get up. 

But this morning I jumped out of bed, turned on all the lights, and 
stepped up to my dresser mirror. 

Would I find new hair? 

I held up my hands and checked them out first. My eyes were still 
heavy from sleep. But I could see clearly that the hair had not grown back. 

“Yes!” I cried happily. 

The razor cuts on my right hand still hurt. But I didn’t care. Both 
hands were smooth and hairless. 

I turned them over and gazed at them for a long while. I was so glad 
they looked normal. 

I had dreamed about hair during the night. It had started out as 
spaghetti. In the dream, I was sitting in the kitchen, starting to eat a big 
plate of spaghetti. 

But as I started to twirl the noodles on my fork, they instantly turned to 
hair. Long, black hairs. 

I was twirling long, black hairs onto my fork. The plate was piled high 
with long strands of black hair. 

Then I raised the forkful of hair to my mouth. I opened my mouth. I 
brought the hairy fork up closer, closer. 

And then I woke up. 

Yuck! What a gross dream. 

I had felt really sick to my stomach. And it had been hard getting back 
to sleep. 

Now at last it was morning, and I continued my inspection. I leaned 
over and checked my feet. Then my legs. No black clumps of hair. 

No weird fur growing anywhere. 

I guess it’s safe to go to school, I told myself happily. But I’ll be sure 
to keep my gloves handy. 

After breakfast, I pulled on my coat, grabbed my backpack, and 
headed out of the house. 



It was a bright, warm day. The snow glistened wetly. The sunshine had 
started to melt it. I stepped carefully around puddles of slush as I walked 
along the sidewalk. 

I was feeling better. A lot better. In fact, I was feeling really good. 

Then I turned and saw that pack of dogs. Snarling dogs. Heading right 
for me. 



13 


My heart jumped up to my throat. The dogs were running full speed, their 
heads bobbing up and down, their eyes trained on me. They barked and 
growled furiously with each bounding step. 

My legs suddenly felt as if they weighed a thousand pounds. But I 
whirled around and forced myself to run. 

If they catch me, they’ll tear me to pieces! I told myself. They must 
smell Jasper on me, I decided. That’s why they always chase me. 

I loved my cat. But why did she have to get me in so much trouble? 

Who owned these vicious dogs, anyway? Why were they allowed to 
run wild like this? 

Questions, questions. They flew through my mind as I ran. Across 
front yards. Then across the street. 

A car horn blared. I heard the squeal of brakes. 

A car skidded toward the opposite curb. 

I had forgotten to check the traffic before I crossed. 

“Sorry!” I called. And kept running. 

A sharp pain in my side forced me to slow down. I turned and saw the 
yapping dogs racing steadily toward me. They crossed the street and kept 
moving over the snowy ground. Closer. Closer. 

“Hey, Larry!” Two kids stepped on to the sidewalk ahead of me. 

“Run!” I screamed breathlessly. “The dogs—” 

But Lily and Jared didn’t move. 

I stepped up to them, holding my side. It ached so hard, I could barely 
breathe. 

Lily turned to stare down the dogs, as she had done before. Jared 
stepped up to meet them. All three of us watched the dogs approach. 

Seeing the three of us standing together, the dogs slowed to a stop. The 
snarls and growls stopped instantly. They stared back at us uncertainly. 
They were panting hard, their tongues drooping down nearly to the snow. 

“Go home!” Lily shouted. She stamped her shoe hard on the sidewalk. 

The big black dog, the leader, uttered a low whimper and hung his 
head. 



“Go home! Go home!” All three of us chanted. 

The pain in my side started to fade. I felt a little better. The dogs 
weren’t going to attack, I could see. They didn’t want to tangle with all 
three of us. 

They turned and started to trot away, following the big black dog. 

Suddenly Jared started to laugh. “Look at that one!” he cried. He 
pointed to a long, scrawny dog with black, curly fur. 

“What’s so funny about that one?” I demanded. 

“He looks just like Manny!” Jared declared. 

Lily started to laugh. “You’re right! He does!” 

All three of us laughed. The dog had Manny’s curly hair. And he had 
Manny’s dark, soulful eyes. 

“Come on. We’ll be late,” Lily said. She kicked a hard clump of snow 
off the sidewalk. Jared and I followed her toward school. 

“Why were those dogs chasing you?” Jared asked. 

“I think because they smelled my cat,” I replied. 

“Those dogs are mean,” Lily said, a few steps ahead of us. “They 
shouldn’t let them run wild like that.” 

“Tell me about it,” I replied, rolling my eyes. 

A sharp gust of wind nearly blew us backwards over the slippery 
sidewalk. Jared’s Raiders cap went flying into the street. A station wagon 
rumbled past, nearly running it over. 

Jared darted into the street and snatched the cap back. “I’ll be glad 
when winter is over,” he muttered. 

We met Kristina in front of the school. Her red hair blew wildly 
around her head in the swirling wind. “Do we have band practice this 
afternoon?” she asked. She was chewing a Snickers bar. 

“Great breakfast,” I said sarcastically. 

“Mom didn’t have time to make eggs,” Kristina replied, chewing. 

“Yes. Practice at my house,” Lily said. “We’ve got to get to work, 
guys. We don’t want Howie to win the contest.” 

Kristina turned to me. “Where were you yesterday?” 

“I... uh... didn’t feel too well,” I replied. 

That reminded me of the INSTA-TAN lotion. Were any of my friends 
growing hair, too, because of that suntan gunk? I had to know. I had to ask. 

But if they weren’t growing hair—if I was the only one—then I’d be 



totally embarrassed. 

“Uh... remember that INSTA-TAN stuff?” I asked quietly. 

“Great stuff,” Jared replied. “I think it made me paler!” 

Kristina laughed. “It didn’t work at all. You were right, Larry. That 
bottle was too old.” 

“Look at us,” Lily added. “We’re all as pale as the snow. That stuff 
didn’t do anything.” 

But are you growing weird black patches of hair now? 

That’s what I was dying to ask. 

But none of them said anything about growing hair. 

Were they like me? Were they too embarrassed to admit it? 

Or was I the only one? 

I took a deep breath. Should I ask? Should I ask if anyone was 
sprouting hair? 

I opened my mouth to ask. But I stopped when I realized that the 
subject had changed. They were talking about our band again. 

“Can you bring your amp to my house?” Lily asked Kristina. “Manny 
will bring his. But it only has jacks to plug in two guitars.” 

“Maybe I can bring mine—” I started to say. 

But a gust of wind blew my parka hood back. 

I reached up to pull the hood back on my head. 

But my hand brushed the back of my neck—and I gasped. 

The back of my neck was covered with thick hair. 



14 


“Larry—what’s wrong?” Lily demanded. 

“Uh... uh...” I couldn’t speak. 

“What’s wrong with your scarf?” Jared asked. “Is it too tight?” He 
tugged at the wool scarf around my neck. 

The scratchy scarf my mom made me wear because my great-aunt 
Hildy had knitted it. 

I had forgotten I was wearing it. When my hand brushed against it, I’d 
thought... 

“You looked scared to death!” Lily exclaimed. “Are you okay, Larry?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I’m okay,” I muttered, feeling my face go red. “The 
scarf was choking me, I guess.” What a lame lie. 

But I had to say something. I couldn’t say that I had mistakenly 
thought that my neck had sprouted fur! 

Larry, you’ve got to stop thinking about hair! I scolded myself. If you 
don’t, you’ll drive yourself crazy! 

I shivered. “Let’s go inside,” I said, wrapping the wool scarf tightly 
around my neck. 

I hurried to the boys’ room to brush my hair before the bell rang. Gazing at 
my wavy, blond hair in the mirror as I brushed it, I had a horrifying thought. 

What if my real hair suddenly fell out? And the gross, prickly black 
hair grew in its place? 

What if I woke up one morning, and my entire head was covered in the 
disgusting black fur? 

I took a long look at myself in the mirror. Someone had smeared soap 
over the glass, and my reflection appeared to stare back through hazy, white 
streaks. 

“Shape up,” I told myself. 

I pointed a finger at my reflection. A smooth, hairless finger. 

“Stop thinking about hair, Larry,” I instructed my reflection. “Stop 
thinking about it. You’re going to be okay.” 

The INSTA-TAN lotion has worn off, I decided. 



It had been several days since my friends and I had splashed it on 
ourselves. I had taken at least three showers and two baths. 

It wore off, I told myself. It’s all gone. Stop worrying about it. 

I took one last glance at my hair. It was getting pretty long, but I liked 
it that way. I liked brushing the sides back over my ears. 

Maybe I’ll let it grow really long, I thought. I tucked the hairbrush into 
my backpack and headed to class. 

I had a pretty good day until Miss Shindling handed back the history term 
papers. 

It wasn’t the grade that upset me. She gave me a ninety-four, which is 
really good. I knew that Lily would probably brag that she got a ninety- 
eight or a ninety-nine. But Lily was great at writing. 

A ninety-four was really excellent for me. 

The grade made me happy. But when I flipped through the pages, 
glancing over Miss Shindling’s comments on my writing, I found a black 
hair on page three. 

Was it my black hair? I wondered. Was it one of the disgusting black 
hairs that had sprouted on my hands? 

Or was it Miss Shindling’s? Miss Shindling had short, straight black 
hair. It could be one of hers. 

Or else... 

I squinted at the hair, afraid to touch it. 

I knew I was starting to get weird. I knew I had made a solemn vow 
that I was going to stop thinking about hair. 

But I couldn’t help it. 

Seeing this one, stubby little black hair stuck to the third page of my 
term paper gave me the shudders. Finally, I raised the term paper close to 
my face—and blew the hair away. 

I didn’t hear a word Miss Shindling said for the rest of the class. I was 
glad when the bell rang and it was time to go to gym. 

It will feel good to run around and get some exercise, I decided. 

“Basketball today!” Coach Rafferty shouted as we filed into the 
brightly lit gym. “Basketball today! Change into your shorts! Come on— 
hustle!” 

I usually don’t like basketball that much. There’s so much running 



back and forth. Back and forth the entire length of the floor. Also, I don’t 
have a very good shooting eye. And I get really embarrassed when a 
teammate passes me the ball and I miss an easy shot. 

But, today, basketball sounded just right. A chance to run and get rid of 
a lot of my nervous energy. 

I followed the other guys into the locker room. We all opened our gym 
lockers and pulled out our shorts and T-shirts. 

At the end of the row of lockers, Howie Hurwin kept shouting, “In 
your face! In your face!” 

Another guy snapped a towel at Howie. 

Serves him right, I thought. Howie is such a jerk. 

“In your face!” I heard Howie chant. Someone shouted to him to shut 
up. 

“In your face, man! In your face!” 

I sat down on the bench and pulled off my sneakers. Then I stood up 
and started to pull off my jeans. 

I stopped when I got the jeans about halfway down. 

I stopped and let out a low cry when I saw my knees. 

Bushy clumps of furry black hair had sprouted from both knees. 



15 


“How come you kept your jeans on in gym?” Jared asked. 

“Huh?” His question caught me by surprise. It was the next day, and 
we were walking along the slushy sidewalks, lugging our instruments to 
Lily’s house for another band practice. 

“You refused to change into gym shorts, remember?” Jared said, 
swinging his keyboard case at his side. 

“I... was just cold,” I told him. “My legs got cold. That’s all. I don’t 
know why Coach Rafferty gave me such a hard time.” 

Jared laughed. “Rafferty nearly swallowed his whistle when you sank 
that three-point jump shot from midcourt!” 

I laughed, too. I am the worst shot in school. But I was so crazed about 
my hairy knees, so totally pumped, that I played better than I’d ever played 
in my life. 

“Maybe you should wear jeans all the time!” Coach Rafferty had 
joked. 

But, of course, it was no joke. 

I ran all the way home after school and spent nearly half an hour 
locked in the upstairs bathroom, shaving the clumps of black hair off my 
knees. 

When I finally finished, both knees were red and sore. But at least they 
were smooth again. 

I spent the rest of the afternoon closed up in my room, thinking hard 
about what was happening to me. Unfortunately, all I came up with were 
questions. Dozens of questions. 

But no answers. 

Sprawled on my stomach on top of the bed, my knees throbbed as I 
thought. Why did my knees grow hair? I asked myself. I didn’t spread any 
INSTA-TAN on my knees. So why did the ugly black hair sprout there? 

Had the INSTA-TAN worked itself into my system? Had the strange 
liquid seeped into my pores? Had it spread through my entire body? 

Was I going to turn into some kind of big, hairy creature? Was I soon 
going to look like King Kong or something? 



Questions—but no answers. 

The questions still troubled me as I crossed the street with Jared, and 
Lily’s white-frame house came into view on the corner. 

The sun beamed down above the two bare maple trees that leaned over 
Lily’s driveway. The air felt warm, almost like spring. The snow had melted 
a lot in one day. Patches of wet grass poked up through the white. 

In the yard across the street from Lily’s house, a half-melted snowman 
looked sad and droopy. My hightops splashed through the slushy puddles as 
Jared and I carried our instruments up the driveway. 

Lily opened the door for us. She and Kristina had already been 
practicing. Lily was wearing a bright red-and-blue ski sweater pulled down 
over pale blue leggings. Kristina wore faded jeans and a green-and-gold 
Notre Dame sweatshirt. 

“Where’s Manny?” Lily asked, closing the front door behind Jared and 
me. 

“Haven’t seen him,” I replied, scraping my wet sneakers on the floor 
mat. “Isn’t he here?” 

“He wasn’t in school again today,” Kristina reported. 

“We’ve got to get serious,” Lily said, biting her lower lip. “Did you 
talk to Howie today? Did he tell you what his dad bought him?” 

“Anew synthesizer?” I replied, bending to open my guitar case. “Yeah. 
Howie told me all about it. He says it can sound like an entire orchestra.” 

“Who wants to sound like an orchestra?” Jared asked. He had a wet 
leaf stuck to his shoe. He pulled it off, but then didn’t know where to throw 
it away. So he jammed it in his jeans pocket. 

“If Howie sounds like an orchestra, and we sound like three guitars 
and a kiddie keyboard, we’re in major trouble,” Lily warned. 

“It’s not a kiddie keyboard!” Jared protested. 

I laughed. “Just because you wind a crank at the side of it doesn’t 
make it a kiddie keyboard!” 

“It’s small—but it has all the notes,” Jared insisted. He set the 
keyboard on the coffee table and bent down to plug it in. 

“Let’s stop messing around and get to work,” Kristina said, moving 
her fingers over the frets of her shiny red Gibson. “What song do you want 
to practice first?” 

“How can we practice without Manny?” I asked. “I mean, what’s the 



point?” 

“I tried calling him,” Lily said. “But his phone is messed up or 
something. It didn’t even ring.” 

“Let’s go to his house and get him,” I suggested. 

“Yeah. Good idea!” Kristina agreed. 

All four of us started for the front entryway to get our coats. But Lily 
stopped at the door. “Larry and I will go,” she announced to Kristina. “You 
and Jared should stay and practice. Why should we all go?” 

“Okay,” Jared agreed quickly. “Besides, someone should be here in 
case Manny shows up.” 

With that settled, Lily and I pulled on our coats and headed out the 
front door. Lily’s Doc Martens splashed through a wide puddle as we made 
our way along the sidewalk. 

“I hate it when the snow gets all gray and slushy,” she said. “Listen. 
All you can hear is dripping. Water dripping from the trees, dripping from 
the houses.” 

She stuck out her arm to block my path and stop me from walking. We 
listened in silence to the dripping sounds. 

“It’s deafening—isn’t it?” Lily asked, smiling. The sunlight reflected 
in her eyes. One blue eye, one green eye. 

“Deafening,” I repeated. Lily can be pretty weird sometimes. She once 
told me that she writes poetry. Long poems about nature. But she’s never 
shown any of them to me. 

We trudged through the slush. The sun felt warm on my face. I 
unzipped my parka. 

Manny’s house came into view as we turned the corner. Manny lives in 
a square-shaped brick house on top of a hill. It’s a great sledding hill. There 
were two little kids sledding down it now on blue plastic discs. They were 
going pretty slow since most of the snow had melted. 

We walked past them and made our way up to Manny’s front stoop. 
Lily rang the doorbell, and I knocked. “Hey, Manny—open up!” I shouted. 

No reply. 

No sounds at all. Just the drip drip drip of water from the gutter. 

“Hey, Manny!” I called. We rang and knocked again. 

“No one home,” Lily said quietly. She stepped off the stoop and 
moved to the front window. Edging up on tiptoes, she tried to peer in. 



“See anything?” I called. 

She shook her head. “No. The sun is reflecting on the glass. It looks 
dark inside.” 

“There’s no car in the driveway,” I said. I knocked one more time, as 
hard as I could. To my surprise, the front door swung in a little. 

“Hey—the door is open!” I called to Lily. She hurried back to the 
stoop. I pushed the door open a little further. “Anyone home?” I called in. 

No reply. 

“Hey—your door is open!” I shouted. 

Lily pushed the door all the way, and we stepped inside. “Manny?” she 
called, cupping her hands around her mouth. “Manny?” 

I stepped into the living room—and gasped. 

I tried to speak. But I couldn’t. I couldn’t believe what I saw. 



16 


Lily grabbed my arm as we both stared around the living room. 

The room was totally bare. No furniture. No curtains. No paintings or 
posters on the wall. Even the carpet had been removed, leaving shiny dark 
floorboards. 

“Wh-where did they go?” I managed to choke out. 

Lily made her way through the back hall to the kitchen. Also empty. 
Everything gone. An empty hole where the refrigerator had stood. 

“They moved!” Lily exclaimed. “I don’t believe it!” 

“But why didn’t Manny tell us?” I demanded, my eyes moving around 
the deserted room. “Why didn’t he tell us his family was moving away?” 

Lily shook her head and didn’t reply. The house was silent. I could 
hear water dripping from the gutter outside. 

“Maybe they had to move suddenly,” Lily said finally. 

“Suddenly? Why?” I demanded. 

It was a question that neither of us could answer. 

I love to run. 

Not when I’m running from snarling dogs. But I do love to run. 

I like the way it gets my heart pounding. And I like the thud of my 
sneakers on the ground, and the feeling of my muscles all working together. 

On Saturday mornings I like to go jogging with my dad. He always 
jogs at Miller Woods, along a path that curves around a small lake. 

It’s really pretty there. The air is always fresh-smelling. And it’s a very 
quiet place. 

Dad is tall and lean and pretty athletic. He used to be blond like me, 
but now his hair is mostly gray, and he has a big bald spot on top. 

He jogs every morning before work. I think he usually jogs pretty fast. 
But on Saturdays, he slows down so that we can run side by side. 

We usually jog without talking. That way we can concentrate on the 
scenery and the fresh air. 

But this Saturday morning, I felt like talking. I had decided to tell Dad 
everything. About the bottle of INSTA-TAN. And about the black hair that 



kept sprouting. 

As I talked, I kept my eyes straight ahead. I saw two big crows float 
down from the clear blue sky and perch side by side on the bare limb of a 
tree. The crows cawed loudly, as if talking to us. 

The lake sparkled brightly as Dad and I followed the curving path 
around it. Small patches of ice bobbed in the blue-green water. 

I started at the beginning and told the whole story. Dad slowed down a 
little more to listen. But we kept jogging as I talked. 

I told him about finding the bottle of tanning lotion and how we all 
splashed it on ourselves as a joke. Dad nodded but kept his eyes straight 
ahead. “I guess it didn’t work,” he said, sounding a little breathless from 
running. “You don’t look too tan, Larry.” 

“No, it didn’t work,” I continued. “The bottle was really old, Dad. It 
had expired a long time ago.” 

I took a deep breath. The next part was the hardest to tell. “It didn’t 
give me a tan, Dad. But something really weird started happening to me.” 

He kept jogging. We both leaped over a fallen tree branch. I slipped 
over a pile of wet leaves, but quickly caught my balance. 

“This weird hair started growing on me,” I told him in a shaky voice. 
“First on the back of my hand. Then on both hands. Then on my knees.” 

Dad stopped. He turned to me with a worried expression on his face. 
“Hair?” 

I nodded, breathing hard. “Black hair. Thick clumps of it. Very rough 
and spikey.” 

Dad swallowed hard. His eyes grew wide. With surprise? With fear? 
With disbelief? 

I couldn’t tell. 

But to my surprise, he grabbed my arm and started to pull me. “Come 
on, Larry. We’ve got to go.” 

“But, Dad—” I started, holding back. 

He tightened his grip and pulled harder. “I said we’ve got to go!” he 
insisted through gritted teeth. “Now!” 

He tugged so hard, he nearly pulled me off my feet! 

“Dad—what’s wrong?” I demanded in a high, shrill voice. “What is 

it?” 

He didn’t answer. He pulled me back along the path toward the street. 



His eyes were wild. His whole face was twisted into a tight, frightened 
scowl. 

“Dad—what’s wrong?” I cried. “Where are you taking me? Where?” 



17 


Dr. Murkin raised the hypodermic needle and examined it in the light. 
“Turn away, Larry,” he said softly. “I know you don’t like to watch. This 
won’t hurt at all.” 

Pain shot through my arm as the needle sank in. I shut my eyes and 
held my breath until he pulled out the needle. 

“I know it’s early,” he said, rubbing my arm with a cotton ball dipped 
in alcohol. “But since you were here, I thought I’d give you your shot.” 

My dad sat tensely in a folding chair against the wall of the small 
examining room. He had his arms crossed tightly over the front of his 
sweatshirt. 

“Wh-what about the hair?” I stammered to Dr. Murkin. “Did the 
INSTA-TAN—” 

The doctor shook his head. “I really don’t think tanning lotion can 
cause hair to grow, Larry. Those lotions work on the pigments of the skin. 
They—” 

“But it was a very old bottle!” I insisted. “Maybe the ingredients 
turned sour or something!” 

He waved his hand, as if to say, “No way.” 

Then he turned and started scribbling notes in my file. “I’m sorry, 
Larry,” he said, writing rapidly in a tiny handwriting. “It wasn’t the tanning 
lotion. Trust me.” 

He turned his head to me, his eyes studying me. “I’ve examined you 
from head to foot. You passed every test. You seem fine to me.” 

“Whew! That’s a relief!” Dad said, sighing. 

“But the hair—!” I insisted. 

“Let’s wait and see,” Dr. Murkin replied, his eyes on my dad. 

“Wait and see?” I cried. “You’re not going to give me any medicine or 
anything to stop it?” 

“Maybe it won’t happen again,” Dr. Murkin said. He closed my file. 
Then he motioned for me to jump down from the examining table. 

“Try not to worry, Larry,” he said, handing my coat to me. “You’ll be 
okay.” 



“Thank you, Dr. Murkin,” Dad said, climbing to his feet. He flashed 
the doctor a smile, but I could see that it was forced. Dad still looked really 
tense. 

I followed Dad out to the parking lot. We didn’t say anything until we 
were in the car and on the way home. “Feel better?” Dad asked, his eyes 
narrowed straight ahead on the road. 

“No,” I replied glumly. 

“What’s wrong?” Dad asked impatiently. “Dr. Murkin said you 
checked out fine.” 

“What about the ugly black hair?” I demanded angrily. “What about it? 
Why didn’t he do anything about it? Do you think he didn’t believe me?” 

“I’m sure he believed you,” Dad said softly. 

“Then why didn’t he do anything to help me?” I wailed. 

Dad didn’t reply for the longest time. He stared straight through the 
windshield, chewing his lower lip. Then, finally, he said in a hushed voice, 
“Sometimes the best thing is to wait.” 

We met at Lily’s house for band practice that afternoon. We sounded pretty 
good—but it wasn’t the same without Manny. 

We were all really upset that he had moved away without saying good¬ 
bye. Lily asked her mom to call some friends who were friendly with 
Manny’s parents. She wanted to find out where Manny and his family had 
moved. 

But the friends turned out to be as surprised as we were. 

We couldn’t find anyone who knew that Manny’s family planned to 
move from our town. 

I have to admit that our songs sounded better with two guitars instead 
of three. Lily has a very light singing voice—not much power. And three 
guitars nearly always drowned her out. 

With Manny gone, we could actually hear Lily some of the time. 

I kept messing up the Beatles song we were rehearsing—“I Want to 
Hold Your Hand.” I played the wrong chords and couldn’t get the rhythm 
right. 

I knew what the trouble was. I couldn’t stop thinking about Dr. Murkin 
and how he didn’t believe me about the hair. He said it wasn’t the INSTA- 
TAN. But maybe he was wrong. 



I felt so angry—and so... alone. 

Glancing around Lily’s living room as we started “I Want to Hold Your 
Hand” for the twentieth time, I studied my friends. Were they having the 
same problem? Were they growing ugly, black hair, too, and afraid to tell 
anyone? 

The first time I had asked, Lily had laughed at me and called me Hairy 
Larry. But I had to ask again. I couldn’t think about anything else. I had to 
know the truth. 

I waited till practice was over. Kristina was tucking her guitar into its 
case. Jared went into the kitchen to get a Coke from the fridge. Lily was 
standing beside the couch, one hand twirling the gold pirate coin at her 
throat. 

“I—I have to ask you something,” I said nervously when Jared 
returned to the room. 

He popped the top on the can, and a spray of Coke hit him in the face. 

Everyone laughed. 

“Can’t you work a Coke can?” Lily joked. “Do you need an instruction 
book?” 

“Ha-ha,” Jared replied sarcastically, wiping his face with his sleeve. 
“You deliberately shook the cans, Lily, so people would get squirted. Admit 
it.” 

Kristina laughed as she snapped her guitar case shut. “Maybe you 
should stick to juice boxes, Jared.” 

He stuck out his tongue at her. 

I cleared my throat loudly. “I want to ask you guys something,” I 
repeated in a shaky voice. 

They were all in a great mood, laughing and kidding around. They all 
seemed totally normal. 

Why was I the only one who felt worried and afraid? 

“Remember the INSTA-TAN stuff?” I started. “Have any of you been 
growing hair since we put that stuff on?” I could feel my face turning red. 
“I mean, really ugly patches of black hair?” 

Jared started to laugh, and Coke spurted out of his nose. He started to 
choke. Kristina hurried over to slap him on the back. 

“Hairy Larry!” Jared cried when he stopped choking. He pointed the 
Coke can at me and started chanting. “Hairy Larry! Hairy Larry!” 



“Come on, guys!” I pleaded. “I’m serious!” 

That made Kristina and Jared laugh even harder. 

I turned to Lily, who was still standing beside the couch. She had a 
troubled expression on her face. She definitely wasn’t laughing. She 
lowered her eyes to the floor as I continued to stare at her. 

“Larry is a werewolf!” Jared declared. 

“I hope The Geeks don’t have to play when there’s a full moon!” 
Kristina exclaimed. 

“Maybe Larry’s howling is better than his guitar playing!” Jared said. 
They both laughed. 

“I—I was just making a joke!” I stammered. I wanted a hole to open 
up in the floor so that I could disappear into it. 

I’m the only one, I realized. I’m the only one who is growing the ugly 

hair. 

That’s why Jared and Kristina thought it was so funny. It wasn’t 
happening to them. They didn’t have to worry about it. 

But Lily wasn’t joining in with the jokes. She turned away and started 
picking up music sheets from the floor and straightening the room. 

Lily always enjoys teasing me and making me blush. I stared at her, 
wondering if she had the same secret I did. 

I packed up my guitar slowly and waited for Jared and Kristina to 
leave. Then I put on my coat and baseball cap and followed Lily to the front 
door. 

On the front stoop, I turned back to her. “Lily, tell me the truth,” I 
insisted, studying her face. “Have you been growing weird patches of black 
hair on your hands and knees?” 

She hesitated, chewing her bottom lip. “I... I don’t want to talk about 
it,” she replied in a whisper. 

Then she slammed the front door. 

I didn’t move from the concrete stoop. I kept picturing her troubled 
expression. I kept hearing her whispered voice. 

Was it happening to Lily? If it was, why wouldn’t she admit it to me? 
Was she too embarrassed? 

Or was she embarrassed for me? 

Maybe it wasn’t happening to her, I realized. Maybe she just thinks 
I’m crazy. Maybe she feels bad for me because I keep acting like such a 



jerk. 

Feeling totally confused, I turned and headed for the street. The sun 
was still high in the sky, but the air felt cold. A sharp wind blew at my face 
as I started toward home. 

Leaning into the wind, I reached up and tugged down my cap to keep 
it from blowing away. To my surprise, I couldn’t pull it down. 

The cap suddenly felt tight. Too tight. 

I removed it and held it close to my face to study it. Had someone 
adjusted the back to make it tighter? 

No. 

A chill of dread ran down my back as I raised a hand to my forehead. 
And discovered why my cap didn’t fit. 

My entire forehead was covered with thick, bristly hair. 



18 


I burst through the back door, into the kitchen. “Mom—look at this!” I 
cried. “Look at my head!” 

My eyes darted around the room. “Mom?” 

Not there. 

I ran through the house, calling for her. I decided it was time to show 
my parents what was happening to me. Time to make them believe me. 

The stripe of hair would totally gross them out, would finally convince 
them this was serious. 

“Mom! Dad? Anybody home?” 

No. 

When I returned to the kitchen, I found a note on the refrigerator: WE 
WENT SHOPPING IN BROOKESDALE VILLAGE. HOME LATE. FIX 
YOURSELF A SNACK. 

With a cry of disgust, I tossed my cap across the room. Then I pulled 
off my parka and let it fall to the floor. 

My heart pounding, I made my way to the mirror in the front hall and 
studied myself. I looked like some kind of comic book mutant! 

My pale face stared back at me. It appeared exactly the same. Except 
that I had a thick, black stripe of fur across my forehead. 

Looks like I’m wearing a bandanna, I thought miserably. Like one of 
those headbands that skiers wear. Except this one is made of disgusting hair. 

I ran a trembling hand over the thick hair. 

My chest heaved up and down. I felt like crying and screaming 
furiously at the same time. I felt like grabbing the stripe of fur and ripping it 
out of my head. 

I couldn’t bear to look at myself. The hair was so gross, so disgusting. 

I decided there was no way I could wait for Mom and Dad to get 
home. I couldn’t leave that horrible hair on my face. Spinning away from 
the mirror, I ran upstairs to shave it off. 

I lathered up the strip of hair with shaving cream. Then I began to 
scrape my dad’s razor over it. 

“Ow!” It hurt, but I didn’t care. I had to cut it off. Every thick, bristly 



strand of it. 

Watching the hair fall into the sink, I suddenly knew what I had to do. 
I had to find the INSTA-TAN bottle. I had to find it and take it to Dr. 
Murkin. 

“If I bring him the bottle, I can make him believe me!” I told myself. 
Then Dr. Murkin can do tests on it. He can figure out why it’s making hair 
grow on me. 

And once he knows that it’s the INSTA-TAN that’s growing hair, Dr. 
Murkin will give me a cure, I decided. 

But where did we toss the bottle? 

I shut my eyes and struggled to remember. 

After I discovered the bottle, we had all run into Lily’s house to splash 
the stuff on. Then we had gone back outside to mess around in the snow. 

Did we toss the INSTA-TAN bottle back in the trash Dumpster next 
door? 

I had to find out. 

I scribbled a note to my parents, telling them I left something at Lily’s 
and would be back soon. Then I grabbed my coat and hurried out the door. 

The air had become a lot colder. Clouds had rolled over the sun, 
making the evening sky gray. I zipped up my parka and pulled the hood 
over my head. My forehead still tingled from where I had shaved it. 

The three blocks to Lily’s house seemed like three miles! As I turned 
the corner, her house came into view. 

I don’t want her to see me, I realized. If she sees me poking around 
that trash Dumpster, she’ll want to know why. And I’m not ready to tell her 
the whole story. 

She wouldn’t tell me the truth, I thought bitterly. Instead, she slammed 
the door on me. 

So I’m not ready to tell her the truth, either. 

I felt glad that it had become so dark out. Maybe Lily wouldn’t see me. 

I kept my eyes on her house as I approached. The lights were on in the 
dining room. Maybe her family was having an early dinner. 

Good, I thought. I’ll dig into the trash Dumpster, pull out the bottle, 
and disappear before they finish, before anyone has a chance to glance out 
the window. 

I stopped short when I saw that there was just one little problem. 



The trash Dumpster was gone. 

The workers must have hauled it away. 

I let out a long sigh and nearly slumped to my knees. “Now what?” I 
murmured out loud. 

Now how do I prove to Dr. Murkin that the INSTA-TAN is making me 
grow hair? 

The cold wind swirled around me as I stared at the curb where the 
Dumpster had stood. Fat brown leaves, blown by the twisting wind, 
fluttered around my legs. 

I shivered. 

Turning to leave, a memory flashed through my mind. 

The INSTA-TAN bottle. We hadn’t dropped it back into the Dumpster. 
We had tossed it into the woods on the other side of the neighbors’ house. 

“Yes!” I cried happily. “Yes!” 

We had chased each other across the neighbors’ yard—and I’d heaved 
the bottle into the trees. 

It will still be there, I told myself. It has to be there. 

I darted past Lily’s house, glancing up at the front windows. I couldn’t 
see anyone looking out. 

Past the neighbors’ house, dark and empty. The remodeling work not 
finished. 

Into the woods. The dead leaves wet and slippery under my shoes. The 
bare tree branches shook and rattled in the shifting, sharp wind. 

Where had the bottle landed? I asked myself. Where? 

It hadn’t gone far, I remembered. Just past the first trees. 

It had to be nearby, I knew. Somewhere near where I stood. 

A blanket of deep shadow had fallen over the woods. I kicked at a pile 
of dead leaves. My shoe hit something hard. 

Bending quickly, I tossed leaves away with both hands. 

Only a tree branch. 

I moved deeper into the woods, pushing my way through clumps of 
tall, dead weeds. 

I stopped. 

It has to be around here, I knew. My eyes desperately searched the 
shadows. 

There it is. No. Just a smooth stone. 



I kicked it away. Then I turned slowly, making a complete circle, my 
eyes sweeping the dark ground. 

Where is the bottle? Where? 

I sucked in my breath when I heard the sound. 

The crack of a twig. 

I listened hard. I heard the crackle of leaves. The brush of a leg against 
a winter-dry shrub. 

Another twig cracking. 

Swallowing hard, I realized I was no longer alone. 

“Wh-who’s there?” I called. 



19 


“Who’s there?” 

No reply. 

Frozen as still as a statue, I listened. I heard the scrape of feet moving 
rapidly over the ground. I heard heavy breathing. 

“Hey—who is it?” I called. 

I glanced down—and saw the bottle. Lying on its side, nestled in a pile 
of leaves right in front of me. 

I bent quickly, reached eagerly for the bottle with both hands. But I 
jerked back up to my feet in fright as a dark figure lumbered out from the 
trees. 

Panting hard. Its long tongue flapping from its open mouth. 

A tall, brown dog. Even in the dim light, I could see how scraggly and 
tangled its fur was. I could see large burrs stuck in its heaving side. 

I took a step back. “Are you alone, boy?” I called in a frightened 
whisper. “Huh? Are you alone, doggie?” 

The animal lowered its head and let out a whimper. 

I searched the woods for other dogs. Was he part of a pack? Part of the 
pack of stray dogs that liked to chase me, growling and snapping? 

I didn’t see any others. 

“Good dog,” I told him, keeping my voice low and calm. “Good 
doggie.” 

He stared up at me, still panting. His scraggly, brown tail wagged 
once, then drooped. 

I bent slowly, keeping my eyes on the dog, and picked up the bottle. It 
felt surprisingly cold. I held it up and tried to see if any of the liquid 
remained inside. 

But it was too dark to see. 

I’m pretty sure I didn’t use every last drop, I thought, struggling to 
remember. There has to be a little left. Enough for Dr. Murkin to test. 

I shook the bottle close to my ear, listening for the splash of liquid 
inside. Please, please, let there be a drop left! I pleaded silently. 

The trees shivered in a sharp, swirling gust. Leaves rustled and scraped 



against each other. 

The dog let out another soft whimper. 

I grasped the bottle tightly in my right hand and started to back away. 
“Bye-bye, doggie.” 

He tilted his head and stared up at me. 

I took another step back. “Bye, doggie,” I repeated softly. “Go home. 
Go home, boy.” 

He didn’t move. He let out another whimper. Then his tail began to 

wag. 

I took another step back, grasping the INSTA-TAN bottle tightly. 
Then, as I started to turn away from the staring dog, I saw the others. 

They poked out quickly, silently, from the dark trees. Five or six big 
dogs, their eyes glowing angrily. Then five or six more. 

As they lumbered nearer, moving quickly, steadily, I could hear their 
growls, low and menacing. They pulled back their lips and bared their teeth. 

I froze, staring in terror at their darkly glowing eyes, listening to their 
menacing, low growls. 

Then I spun around awkwardly. Started to run. 

“Ohh!” I let out a shrill cry as I stumbled over a fallen tree branch. 

The bottle flew out of my hand. 

As I fell, I reached out for it, grasping desperately. 

Missed. 

I watched in horror as it hit a sharp rock—and shattered. The jagged 
pieces flew in all directions. A tiny puddle of brown liquid washed over the 
rock. 

I landed hard on my knees and elbows. Pain shot through my body. 
But I ignored it and scrambled to my feet. 

I whirled around to face the dogs. 

But to my surprise, they were running in a different direction. Through 
the trees, I glimpsed a frightened rabbit, scrabbling over the leafy ground. 
Barking and growling, the dogs chased after it. 

My heart pounding, my knees still throbbing, I walked over to the rock 
and stared down at the jagged pieces of orange glass. I picked one up and 
examined it closely. 

“Now what do I do?” I asked myself out loud. I could still hear the 
excited barking of the dogs in the distance. “Now what?” 



The bottle was shattered into a dozen pieces. My evidence was gone. I 
had nothing to show Dr. Murkin. Nothing at all. 

With an angry cry, I tossed the piece of glass at the trees. Then I 
wearily slunk toward home. 

Mom and Dad hurried to a school meeting after dinner. I went upstairs to 
my room to do my homework. 

I didn’t feel like being alone. 

I took Jasper in my lap and petted her for a while. But she wasn’t in 
the mood. She glared at me with those weird yellow eyes. When that didn’t 
work, she scratched my hand, jumped away, and disappeared out of the 
room. 

I tried calling Lily, but no one answered at her place. 

Outside, the wind howled around the corner of the house. It made my 
bedroom windows rattle. 

A chill ran down my back. 

I leaned my elbows on my desk and hunched over my government 
textbook. But I couldn’t concentrate. The words on the page became a gray 
blur. 

I walked across the room and picked up my guitar. Then I bent down 
and plugged it into my amp. 

Lots of times when I’m feeling nervous or upset, I play my guitar for a 
while. It always calms me down. 

I cranked the amp up really high and started to play a loud blues 
melody. There was no one else home, no one to tell me to turn it down. I 
wanted to play as loud as I could—loud enough to drown out my troubled 
thoughts. 

But I had played for only three or four minutes when I realized that 
something was wrong. 

I kept missing notes. Messing up the chords. 

What’s wrong with me? I wondered. I’ve played this tune a million 
times. I can play it in my sleep. 

When I glanced down at my fingers, I saw the problem. 

“Ohh!” I uttered a weak groan. That disgusting hair had sprouted over 
both of my hands. My fingers were covered in thick, black hair. 

I turned my hands over. Both palms were covered, too. 



The guitar fell heavily to the floor as I jumped to my feet. 

My arms began to itch. 

With trembling hands, I tore at the cuffs. Pulled up the sleeves. 

My arms were covered, too! The thick, bristly hair swept over both 
arms and hands. 

I stood there, swallowing hard, staring down at my hairy arms and 
hands. My legs were trembling. I felt weak. 

My mouth suddenly felt dry. My throat ached. 

I tried to swallow. 

Was the disgusting hair growing on my tongue ? 

Feeling a jolt of nausea, I lurched across the hall to the bathroom. 
Clicking on the ceiling light, I leaned over the sink. I brought my face up 
close to the mirror and stuck out my tongue. 

No. 

My tongue was okay. 

But my face—my cheeks and chin—were covered with black hair. 

It’s spreading so fast! I realized. The mirror reflected my horror. 

It’s spreading so fast now—all over me. 

What am I going to do? 

Isn’t there anything I can do? 



20 


I got to school early on Monday morning and waited for Lily at her locker. 

It had taken hours to shave off all the bristly clumps of hair. But I did 
it. 

This morning I wore a sweater with extra-long sleeves, and I pulled a 
baseball cap down low on my head in case the hair grew back during the 
day. 

“Lily, where are you?” I murmured impatiently. I paced nervously 
back and forth in front of the row of green lockers. 

Lily and I have to face this problem together, I told myself. I 
remembered the frightened expression on Lily’s face when I asked her if 
she had been growing weird hair. 

I knew the same thing was happening to Lily. I just knew it. 

And I knew that Lily must be embarrassed like me, too embarrassed to 
admit it, to talk about it. 

But the two of us can figure out what to do, I decided. 

If the two of us go to Dr. Murkin and tell him about the INSTA-TAN 
lotion and the hair, he’ll have to believe us. 

But where was Lily? 

Kids jammed the hall, slamming lockers, laughing and talking. I 
glanced at my watch. Only three minutes till the bell rang. 

“How’s it going, Larry?” a voice called. 

I turned and saw Howie Hurwin grinning at me. His sister, Marissa, 
stood beside him. Her braid was caught in her backpack strap, and she was 
struggling to free it. 

“Hi, Howie,” I said, sighing. He was the last person I wanted to see 
this morning! 

“Ready for tomorrow?” he asked. Why did he have to grin like that 
when he talked? That grin just made me want to punch him. 

“Tomorrow?” I glanced down the crowded hall, searching for Lily. 

Howie laughed. “Did you forget about the Battle of the Bands?” 

“Ow!” Marissa cried. She finally managed to tug her braid free. “Is 
your band still going to play?” she asked. “We heard about Manny leaving.” 



“Yeah. We’ll be there,” I told her. “We sound pretty good.” 

“We do, too!” Howie replied, grinning even wider. “We might be on 
TV. My uncle knows a woman who works on Star Search. He thinks maybe 
he can get us on.” 

“Great,” I replied, without any enthusiasm. 

Where was Lily? 

“If we get on that show, we’ll probably win,” Marissa added, still 
fiddling with her long braid. “And then we’ll be famous.” 

“They asked us to play at the next school dance,” Howie said. “They 
didn’t ask your band, did they?” 

“No,” I replied. “No one asked us.” 

That made Howie’s grin practically burst off his face. “Too bad,” he 

said. 

The bell rang. “I’ve got to go,” I said, hurrying toward Miss 
Shindling’s room. 

“See you at the contest tomorrow,” Marissa called. 

“We’re going first,” Howie shouted. “I guess they’re saving the best 
for first]” 

I heard the two of them laughing as I stepped into the classroom. I 
made my way to my seat, searching for Lily. Had she slipped past me while 
I was talking with Howie and Marissa? 

No. No sign of her. 

I sank into my seat, feeling worried and disappointed. Was Lily sick 
today? I hoped not. She can’t get sick the day before the Battle of the 
Bands, I told myself. She just can’t. 

“Larry, would you hand out the tests?” Miss Shindling asked, dropping 
a heavy stack of papers into my arms. 

“Huh? Test?” 

I had totally forgotten. 

Lily didn’t come to school. I tried phoning her at lunchtime. The phone 
rang and rang, but no one answered. 

After school, I decided to go to Lily’s house to see what had happened 
to her. But as I walked out of the school building, I remembered that my 
mom had asked me to come straight home after school. She had some 
chores she wanted me to help her with. 



It was a clear, cold day. Puffy, white clouds floated high in the 
afternoon sky. All the snow had finally melted, but the ground was still soft 
and wet. 

I waited for several cars to pass. Then I crossed the street and headed 
for home. 

I had walked nearly a block when I realized I was being followed. 

A dog brushed softly against my leg. Startled, I stopped and stared 
down at it. 

The dog had light brown fur, almost red, with a white patch at its 
throat. It was a medium-sized dog, a little bigger than a cocker spaniel. It 
had long, floppy brown ears and a long, furry tail that swept slowly back 
and forth as it gazed up at me. 

“Who are you?” I asked it. “I’ve never seen you before.” 

I glanced around, making sure there weren’t a dozen other dogs 
lurking in the bushes, getting ready to chase after me. 

Then I turned and started walking again. 

The dog brushed my leg again and kept on going. As I walked, it 
stayed a few yards ahead of me, glancing back to make sure I was 
following. 

“Are you following me —or am I following you?” I called to it. 

The dog’s tail gave a single wag in reply. 

It followed me all the way home. 

My mom was waiting for me in the driveway. She had a long green 
sweater pulled down over her jeans. “Nice day,” she commented, glancing 
up at the sunny sky. 

“Hi, Mom,” I greeted her. “This dog followed me home.” 

The dog sniffed at the low evergreen shrubs that lined the front walk. 

“She’s kind of pretty,” Mom said. “What a nice color. Who does she 
belong to?” 

I shrugged. “Beats me. I’ve never seen her before.” 

The dog came over and stared up at Mom. 

“At least she’s friendly,” I said, setting my heavy backpack down on 
the driveway. “Maybe we should keep her.” 

“No way,” Mom replied sharply. “No dogs. Not with Jasper in the 
house.” 

I bent down and petted the top of the dog’s head. 



“She has a tag on her collar,” Mom said, pointing. “Check it out, Larry. 
Maybe it says the owner’s name.” 

The dog’s tail wagged furiously as I petted her head. “Good dog,” I 
said softly. 

“Come on, Larry. See what the tag says,” Mom insisted. 

“Okay, okay.” I reached for the round, gold tag hanging down from the 
dog’s collar. Then I dropped to my knees and lowered my face so that I 
could see it clearly. 

“Huh?” 

I recognized it instantly. 

It wasn’t a dog tag. It was Lily’s gold pirate coin. 



21 


I nearly fell over. I felt as if someone had kicked me in the stomach. 

“M-mom!” I stammered. But my voice came out as a gasp. 

“Larry—what are you doing?” Mom called. She had wandered to the 
side of the driveway and was pulling up some dead weeds. “What does the 
tag say?” 

“It—it isn’t a tag,” I finally managed to choke out. 

She turned her head back to me. “Huh?” 

“It isn’t a dog tag,” I repeated, still holding it between my fingers. “It’s 
Lily’s gold pirate coin.” 

Mom laughed. “Why would Lily give her coin to a dog? Didn’t her 
grandfather give her that coin?” 

“I—I don’t know why,” I stammered. “I don’t get it, Mom.” 

The dog’s hot breath brushed over my hand. She pulled away from me, 
settled back, and started scratching her long, floppy ear with her back paw. 

“Are you sure it’s a gold coin, Larry?” Mom asked, crossing the drive, 
standing right behind me. 

I nodded and reached for the coin again. “Yeah. It’s Lily’s gold coin, 
Mom.” 

“It must be some other gold coin,” Mom suggested. “I’m sure it isn’t 
the same coin.” 

Mom must be right, I decided. 

I let go of the coin and raised my hand to pet the dog’s head. 

But my hand stopped in midair when I saw the dog’s eyes. 

She had one blue eye and one green eye. 



22 


“It’s Lily! It’s Lily!” I shrieked, jumping to my feet. 

My shouts frightened the dog. She uttered a shrill yip, turned, and 
bolted from the front yard. 

“Lily—come back!” I called after her. “Come back! Lily!” 

“Larry—wait!” Mom cried. “Please—!” 

I didn’t hear the rest of what she said. Jumping over my backpack, I 
darted toward the street. I hurtled across without slowing to look for cars— 
and kept running toward Lily’s house. 

It is Lily! I told myself. That dog has a green eye and a blue eye. And 
it’s wearing Lily’s coin! 

It is Lily! I know it! 

I could hear my mom calling for me to come back. But I ignored her 
and kept running. 

Lily’s house was three blocks away. I ran at full speed the whole way. 
By the time her house came into view, I was gasping for breath, and I had a 
sharp pain in my side. 

But I didn’t care. 

I had to see Lily. I had to know for sure that the dog wasn’t Lily. 

Such a crazy thought! As I crossed the street, I started to realize how 
crazy it was. 

Lily, a dog? 

Larry, are you totally losing it? I asked myself. Mom must think I’m 
totally wacko! I realized. 

Lily, a dog? 

I slowed down, rubbing the pain at my side, trying to massage it away. 

I spotted Lily’s parents in the driveway. The trunk of their blue Chevy 
was open. Mr. Vonn was lifting a suitcase into it. 

“Hi!” I called breathlessly. “Hey—hi!” 

“Hello, Larry,” Mrs. Vonn said as I stepped up to the car. I saw two 
other suitcases and some smaller bags waiting to be loaded into the car. 

“Going on a trip?” I asked, struggling to catch my breath. The pain in 
my side kept throbbing, refusing to go away. 



They didn’t answer. Mr. Vonn groaned as he hoisted a heavy suitcase 
into the trunk. 

“Where’s Lily?” I asked. I handed him one of the smaller bags. “She 
wasn’t in school today.” 

“We’re going away,” Mrs. Vonn said quietly from behind me. 

“Well, where’s Lily?” I repeated. “Is she inside?” 

Mr. Vonn frowned, but didn’t reply. 

I turned to Lily’s mom. “Can I see her?” I asked impatiently. “Is Lily 
inside?” 

“You must have the wrong house,” she replied softly. 

My mouth dropped open. “Wrong house? Mrs. Vonn—what do you 
mean?” 

“There’s no one here named Lily,” she said. 



23 


For some reason, I burst out laughing. 

Startled laughter. Frightened laughter. 

Mrs. Vonn’s sad expression cut my laughter short—and sent a chill 
down my back. 

“Is Lily—?” I started to say. 

Mrs. Vonn grabbed my shoulder and squeezed it. She lowered her face 
close to mine. “Listen to what I’m telling you, Larry,” she said through 
gritted teeth. 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“There is no Lily,” she repeated, squeezing my shoulder hard. “Just 
forget about her.” She had tears in her eyes. 

Mr. Vonn slammed the car trunk. I jumped out of Mrs. Vonn’s grasp, 
my heart pounding. 

“You’d better go,” Mr. Vonn said firmly, coming over to join his wife. 

I took a step back. My legs felt weak and shaky. 

“But, Lily—” I started. 

“You’d better go,” Mr. Vonn repeated. 

At the side of the garage, I spotted the red-brown dog. She whimpered 
sadly, her head hung low. 

I whirled around and ran, as fast as I could. 

Mom and Dad acted so strange at dinner. They refused to discuss Lily or 
the dog or Lily’s parents. 

Mom and Dad kept glancing at each other, giving each other 
meaningful looks that I wasn’t supposed to see. 

They think I’m crazy! I realized. That’s why they’re refusing to talk 
about it. They think I’m losing my mind. They don’t want to say anything 
to me until they decide how they’re going to handle me. 

“I’m not crazy!” I shouted suddenly, dropping my fork and knife onto 
the table. I hadn’t touched my spaghetti and meatballs. 

How could I eat? 

“I’m not crazy! I’m not making this up!” 



“Can’t we talk about it another time?” Mom pleaded, glancing at Dad. 

“Let’s just finish our dinner,” Dad added, keeping his eyes on his plate. 

After dinner, I called Jared and Kristina over to give them the bad 
news. I didn’t want them to think that I was crazy. So I simply told them 
that Lily had gone away. 

“But what about tomorrow?” Jared cried. 

“Yeah. What about the Battle of the Bands?” Kristina demanded. 
“How could Lily leave on the day before the contest?” 

I shrugged. We were sitting in the living room. Kristina and I sat on 
opposite ends of the couch. Jared was sprawled in the chair across from me. 

Jasper brushed over my feet. I leaned down and lifted her into my lap. 
Her yellow eyes stared up at me. Then she closed them and settled against 
me, purring softly. 

“Where did Lily go?” Kristina asked angrily, drumming her fingers on 
the couch arm. “On vacation? Why didn’t she tell us she was going to miss 
the contest?” 

“Howie Hurwin will jump for joy when he hears this news,” Jared 
muttered glumly, shaking his head. 

“I don’t know where Lily went,” I told them. “I saw her parents 
loading suitcases into the car. Now they’re gone. That’s all I know. I’m sure 
Lily is very unhappy. I know Lily wanted to be with us. I don’t think she 
had a choice.” 

I had a sudden urge to tell them everything that had happened. But I 
didn’t want them to start laughing at me. Or worrying about me. 

I felt so mixed up. I didn’t know what I wanted to do. 

I wanted Lily back. And Manny. That I knew. 

And I wanted the ugly hair to stop sprouting all over my body. 

If only I had never found that bottle of INSTA-TAN. 

This was all my fault. All of it. 

“So I guess The Geeks have to pull out of the band contest tomorrow,” 
I said glumly. 

“I guess,” Jared repeated, shaking his head. 

“No way!” Kristina cried, surprising both of us. She jumped to her feet 
and stood between Jared and me. She balled both hands into fists. “No 
way!” she repeated. 

“But we don’t have a singer—” Jared protested. 



“I can sing,” Kristina replied quickly. “I’m a pretty good singer.” 

“But you haven’t rehearsed any of the songs,” Jared said. “Do you 
know the words?” 

Kristina nodded. “All of them.” 

“But, Kristina—” I started. 

“Listen, guys,” she said sharply, “we have to go onstage tomorrow. 
Even if it’s just the three of us. We can’t let Howie Hurwin win tomorrow— 
can we?” 

“I’d like to wipe that grin off Howie’s face,” I muttered. 

“Me, too,” Jared agreed. “But how can we? Two guitars and a 
keyboard? Howie has his full band. He’ll blast us out of the auditorium.” 

“Not if we play our hearts out!” Kristina exclaimed with emotion. 
“Not if we give it our best.” 

“Let’s do it for Lily!” I blurted out. The words just tumbled from my 
mouth. As soon as I said it, I felt embarrassed. 

But Kristina and Jared picked right up on it. “Let’s do it for Lily!” they 
both cried. “We can win! We really can! Let’s win it for Lily!” 

So it was decided. The Geeks would go onstage tomorrow afternoon. 
Could we win? Could we beat Howie and the Shouters? 

Probably not. 

But we’d give it our best shot. 

“Let’s go up to my room and practice a little,” I suggested. 

Jared started toward the stairs. But Kristina didn’t move. 

I turned and found her staring at my face in horror. 

“Larry—!” she cried, pointing. “What’s that on your forehead?” 



24 


I gasped in horror. 

My hand shot up to my forehead. 

The ugly black hair—it had grown back, I knew. And now Kristina 
and Jared were both staring at it. They both saw it—saw that I was 
becoming some kind of hairy monster. 

I rubbed my forehead with a trembling hand. 

Smooth. 

My forehead was smooth! 

“It’s right there.” Kristina pointed. 

I hurried over to the hallway mirror and gazed up at my forehead. I 
discovered an orange smear near my right temple. 

“It’s spaghetti sauce,” I moaned. “I must have rubbed my face during 
dinner.” 

I rubbed off the orange spot. My entire body was shaking. Kristina had 
scared me to death! Over a dumb spot of spaghetti sauce! 

“Larry, are you okay?” she asked, standing behind me and staring at 
my reflection in the mirror. “You look kind of weird.” 

“I’m okay,” I replied quickly, trying to force my body to stop shaking 
and quaking. 

“Hey—don’t get sick,” Jared warned. “Kristina and I can’t go on the 
stage by ourselves tomorrow.” 

“I’ll be there,” I told them. “Don’t worry, guys. I’ll be there.” 

The next afternoon, the whole school jammed into the auditorium to watch 
the Battle of the Bands. 

Feeling really nervous, I stood backstage and peeked out through the 
curtain. The lights in the auditorium were all on, and Mr. Fosburg, the 
principal, stood in front of the curtain, both arms raised, trying to get 
everyone quiet. 

Behind me, Howie Hurwin and his band were tuning up, adjusting the 
amps, making sure the sound was right. Marissa was wearing a very short, 
sparkly red dress over black tights. She caught me staring at her and flashed 



me a smug smile. 

The Geeks should have dressed up, I realized, watching Marissa. We 
didn’t even think of it. The three of us were wearing T-shirts and jeans, our 
normal school clothes. 

I turned and gazed at Howie’s new synthesizer keyboard. It was about 
a mile long, and it had a thousand buttons and dials on it. It made Jared’s 
keyboard look like a baby toy. 

Howie caught me staring at it. “Cool, huh?” he called, grinning that 
gruesome grin of his. “Hey, Larry—after we win the contest, you can have 
my autograph!” 

Howie laughed. So did Marissa and the rest of the Shouters. 

I turned and slumped away to join Jared and Kristina at the side of the 
stage. “We’re total losers,” I moaned, shaking my head. 

“Good attitude, Larry,” Jared replied sarcastically. 

“Maybe Howie’s giant keyboard will blow out all the fuses,” I said 
glumly. “That’s our only chance.” 

Kristina rolled her eyes. “They can’t be that good,” she muttered. 

But they were. 

The auditorium lights darkened. The curtain slid open. Howie and the 
Shouters stepped into the red-and-blue stage lights. And began blasting out 
the old Chuck Berry rock-and-roll song “Johnny B. Goode.” 

They sounded great. And they looked great. 

Marissa’s dress sparkled in the light. They had worked out dance 
moves, and they all danced and moved as they played. 

We should have thought of that, I told myself glumly, watching from 
the side of the stage. When we play, the three of us just stand around—like 
geeks ! 

The kids in the auditorium went crazy. They all jumped to their feet 
and began clapping along, moving and dancing. 

They stayed on their feet for all four of the Shouters’ songs. Each song 
came louder and faster than the last. The old auditorium rocked and shook 
so hard, I thought the floor might cave in! 

Then, as Howie and Marissa and the others took their bows, the 
auditorium erupted in wild cheers and shouts of, “More! Moooore! 
Mooooore!” 

So Howie and the Shouters did two more songs. 



Jared, Kristina, and I kept casting tense glances at each other as they 
played. This wasn’t doing a whole lot for our confidence! 

Finally, Howie and Marissa took several more bows and ran off the 
stage, waving their fists high above their heads in triumph. 

“Your turn!” Howie called to me as he ran past. He grinned. “Hey, 
Larry—where’s the rest of your band?” 

I started to reply angrily. But Jared gave me a hard shove, and the three 
of us moved uncertainly onto the stage. 

I bent down and plugged my guitar into the amp. Jared worked quickly 
to adjust the sound level of his little keyboard. 

Howie’s giant keyboard had been pushed to the back of the stage. It 
seemed to stare at us, reminding us how good—and loud—the Shouters had 
sounded. 

Kristina stood tensely at the microphone, her arms crossed in front of 
her T-shirt. I played a few chords, testing the level of the amp. My hands 
felt cold and sweaty. They slipped over the strings. 

The audience was talking and laughing, restless, waiting for us to start. 

“Are we ready?” I whispered to Jared and Kristina. “Let’s do T Want 
to Hold Your Hand’ first. Then go into the Rolling Stones song.” 

They nodded. 

I took a deep breath and steadied my hands on my guitar. 

Jared leaned over the keyboard. Kristina uncrossed her arms and 
stepped to the microphone, jamming both hands into her jeans pockets. 

We started the Beatles song. 

Shaky at first. All three of us sang on this one. And the harmony was 
off. 

My guitar was too loud. It was drowning out our voices. I wanted to 
stop and turn it down. But of course I couldn’t. 

The audience sat quietly, listening. They didn’t jump to their feet and 
start dancing. 

They applauded loudly as we finished the song. But it was polite 
applause. No loud cheering. No real enthusiasm. 

At least we got through it! I told myself, wiping my sweaty hands on 
my jeans legs. 

I stepped forward as we started the Rolling Stones song. 

I had a really long guitar solo in this number. I was praying I didn’t 



mess up. 

I nodded to Jared and Kristina. Kristina grabbed the floor microphone 
with both hands, leaning close to it. Jared started the song on the keyboard. 

I started my solo. Badly. I messed up the first chords. 

My heart started to thump. My mouth was suddenly too dry to 
swallow. 

I closed my eyes and tried to shut out everything—to concentrate on 
my fingers, on the music. 

As I played, the audience started to cheer. A few shouts at first. Some 
scattered applause. 

But then the cheering grew louder and louder. 

Happily, I opened my eyes. Several kids were on their feet, shouting 
and laughing. 

I bent my knees and let my fingers move over the frets, the pick 
moving automatically now over the strings. 

I was starting to feel good—really good. 

The cheers grew louder. I realized that several kids were pointing at 
me. 

What’s going on? I wondered. 

And I suddenly knew that something was wrong. The cheers were too 
loud. The laughter was too loud. Too many kids were jumping up and 
pointing fingers at me. 

“Great special effects!” I heard a boy shout from the first row. 

“Yeah. Great special effects!” 

Huh? I thought. What special effects? 

It didn’t take me long to figure it out. 

As Kristina started to sing, I reached my hand up and rubbed it over 
my face. 

I cried out in horror as I felt the stiff, prickly hair. 

My face was covered in it. My chin, my cheeks, my forehead. 

The thick, black hair had sprouted over my entire face. 

And the whole school was staring at it, staring at me. 

The whole school knew my horrible, embarrassing secret. 



25 


“We won! We won!” I heard Jared and Kristina shouting gleefully behind 
me. 

But I set my guitar on the stage floor, turned away from them, and 
started to run. 

The kids in the auditorium were still shouting and cheering. 

We had won the contest because of my amazing hairy transformation. 
“Great special effects!” that kid had shouted. The “special effects” had won 
the day. 

But I wasn’t feeling like a winner. 

I felt like an ugly freak. 

The bushy hair had covered my face, then spread down to my neck and 
shoulders. Both hands were covered in bristly fur, and I could feel it 
growing up my arms. My back began to itch. Was it growing on my back, 
too? 

“Hey, Larry—Larry!” I heard Kristina and Jared calling. “The trophy! 
Come get your trophy!” 

But I was out the stage door, the wild cheers of the audience ringing in 
my ears. Out the back door of the school. Into a chilly, gray afternoon. Dark 
clouds low over the trees. 

Running now. Running blindly, my heart thudding. 

Running home. Covered in thick, black fur. 

Running in panic, in shame. In fear. 

The houses and trees passed in a gray blur. As I turned up my 
driveway, I saw Mom and Dad back by the garage. They both turned to me, 
surprise on their faces. 

“Look at me!” I shrieked. “Look!” My voice burst out, hoarse and 
terrified. “Now do you believe me?” 

They gaped at me, their mouths wide open in shock and horror. 

I held my hands up so they could see my arms. “Do you see my face?” 
I wailed. “See my arms? My hands?” 

They both gasped. Mom grabbed Dad’s arm. 

“Now do you believe me?” I cried. “Now do you believe that the 



INSTA-TAN lotion makes hair grow?” 

I stood staring at them, my chest heaving, panting loudly, tears in my 
eyes. I stood waiting, waiting for them to say something. 

Finally, Mom broke the silence. “Larry, it isn’t the tanning lotion,” she 
said softly, holding tightly onto Dad. “We tried to keep it from you. But we 
can’t any longer.” 

“Huh? Keep what from me?” I demanded. 

They exchanged glances. Mom let out a sob. Dad slipped his arm 
around her. 

“It isn’t the tanning lotion,” Dad said in a trembling voice. “Larry, you 
have to know the truth now. You’re growing all that hair because you’re not 
a human. You’re a dog.” 



26 


I bent down and lapped up some water from the plastic water bowl Mom 
and Dad put on the front stoop for me. It’s so hard to drink without 
splashing water all over my snout. 

Then I bounded down the steps on all fours and joined Lily over by the 
evergreen shrubs. We sniffed the shrubs for a while. Then we loped off to 
the next yard to see if there was anything interesting to sniff. 

It’s been two weeks since my human body vanished and I turned back 
into my real dog identity. Luckily, before I changed back, Mom and Dad— 
or, I should say, Mr. and Mrs. Boyd—were nice enough to explain to me 
what had happened. 

They work for Dr. Murkin, you see. In fact, everyone in town works 
for Dr. Murkin. The whole town is kind of an experimental testing lab. 

A few years ago, Dr. Murkin found a way to change dogs into children. 
He discovered a serum that made us dogs look and think and act like 
people. That’s what my shots were. He gave me fresh serum every two 
weeks. 

But after a while, the serum doesn’t work anymore. It wears off. And 
the children go back to being dogs. 

“Dr. Murkin has decided to stop testing the serum on dogs,” Mom told 
me. “It just doesn’t work. And it causes the families too much pain when 
the children turn back into dogs.” 

“He’s never going to work with dogs again,” Dad explained. “The 
serum just doesn’t last long enough with dogs. So, no more dogs.” 

It was nice of the Boyds to explain to me what had happened. I felt so 
grateful, I licked their hands. Then I ran off to find Lily and show her that I 
was a dog, too. 

Lily and I roam around together all the time. Sometimes Manny joins 
us. There are so many dogs roaming around in this town. I guess they all 
were human for a while. 

I’m glad Dr. Murkin isn’t using dogs for his tests anymore. Dogs 
should be dogs, in my humble opinion. 

Lily and I found some good dirt to sniff in the neighbors’ flower 



garden. There aren’t any flowers to dig up yet. But the dirt smells really 
great. 

Then I saw the Boyds’ car roll up the driveway. They’d been gone all 
afternoon. I went running up eagerly to the car, wagging my tail happily. 

I jumped up and barked out a greeting. 

To my surprise, Mrs. Boyd was carrying a baby. A tiny baby, tightly 
wrapped in pink blankets. 

She held the baby in both arms, and carried it carefully up the walk 
toward the house. Mr. Boyd had a big smile on his face as he caught up to 
her. 

“What a good little girl,” Mrs. Boyd cooed to the baby. “Yes, you are. 
You’re a good little girl. Welcome to your new home, Jasper.” 

Huh? I thought. Isn’t Jasper a funny name for a little girl? 

Then I stared up at the baby and saw her bright yellow eyes. 



A NIGHT IN  TERROR TOWER 
Goosebumps - 27 
R.L. Stine 


1 


“I’m scared,” Eddie said. 

I shivered and zipped my coat up to my chin. “Eddie, this was your idea,” I 
told my brother. “I didn’t beg and plead to see the Terror Tower. You did.” 

He raised his brown eyes to the tower. A strong gust of wind fluttered his 
dark brown hair. “I have a strange feeling about it, Sue. A bad feeling.” 

I made a disgusted face. “Eddie, you are such a wimp! You have a bad 
feeling about going to the movies!” 

“Only scary movies,” he mumbled. 

“You’re ten years old,” I said sharply. “It’s time to stop being scared of your 
own shadow. It’s just an old castle with a tower,” I said, gesturing toward it. 
“Hundreds of tourists come here every day.” 

“But they used to torture people here,” Eddie said, suddenly looking very 
pale. “They used to lock people in the Tower and let them starve to death.” 

“Hundreds of years ago,” I told him. “They don’t torture people here 
anymore, Eddie. Now they just sell postcards.” 

We both gazed up at the gloomy old castle built of gray stones, darkened 
over time. Its two narrow towers rose up like two stiff arms at its sides. 

Storm clouds hovered low over the dark towers. The bent old trees in the 
courtyard shivered in the wind. It didn’t feel like spring. The air was heavy and 
cold. I felt a raindrop on my forehead. Then another on my cheek. 

A perfect London day, I thought. A perfect day to visit the famous Terror 
Tower. 

This was our first day in England, and Eddie and I had been sight-seeing all 
over London. Our parents had to be at a conference at our hotel. So they signed 
us up with a tour group, and off we went. 

We toured the British Museum, walked through Harrods department store, 
visited Westminster Abbey and Trafalgar Square. 

For lunch, we had bangers and mash (sausages and mashed potatoes) at a 
real English pub. Then the tour group took a great bus ride, sitting on top of a 
bright red double-decker bus. 

London was just as I had imagined it. Big and crowded. Narrow streets 
lined with little shops and jammed with those old-fashioned-looking black taxis. 



The sidewalks were filled with people from all over the world. 

Of course my scaredy-cat brother was totally nervous about traveling 
around a strange city on our own. But I’m twelve and a lot less wimpy than he 
is. And I managed to keep him pretty calm. 

I was totally surprised when Eddie begged to visit the Terror Tower. 

Mr. Starkes, our bald, red-faced tour guide, gathered the group together on 
the sidewalk. There were about twelve of us, mostly old people. Eddie and I 
were the only kids. 

Mr. Starkes gave us a choice. Another museum—or the Tower. 

“The Tower! The Tower!” Eddie pleaded. “I’ve got to see the Terror 
Tower!” 

We took a long bus ride to the outskirts of the city. The shops gave way to 
rows of tiny redbrick houses. Then we passed even older houses, hidden behind 
stooped trees and low, ivy-covered walls. 

When the bus pulled to a stop, we climbed out and followed a narrow street 
made of bricks, worn smooth over the centuries. The street ended at a high wall. 
Behind the wall, the Terror Tower rose up darkly. 

“Hurry, Sue!” Eddie tugged my sleeve. “We’ll lose the group!” 

“They’ll wait for us,” I told my brother. “Stop worrying, Eddie. We won’t 
get lost.” 

We jogged over the old bricks and caught up with the others. Wrapping his 
long, black overcoat around him, Mr. Starkes led the way through the entrance. 

He stopped and pointed at a pile of gray stones in the large, grass-covered 
courtyard. “That wall was the original castle wall,” he explained. “It was built by 
the Romans in about the year 400. London was a Roman city then.” 

Only a small section of the wall still stood. The rest had crumbled or fallen. 
I couldn’t believe I was staring at a wall that was over fifteen hundred years old! 

We followed Mr. Starkes along the path that led to the castle and its towers. 
“This was built by the Romans to be a walled fort,” the tour guide told us. “After 
the Romans left, it became a prison. That started many years of cruelty and 
torture within these walls.” 

I pulled my little camera from my coat pocket and took a picture of the 
Roman wall. Then I turned and snapped a few pictures of the castle. The sky had 
darkened even more. I hoped the pictures would come out. 

“This was London’s first debtor prison,” Mr. Starkes explained as he led the 
way. “If you were too poor to pay your bills, you were sent to prison. Which 



meant that you could never pay your bills! So you stayed in prison forever.” 

We passed a small guardhouse. It was about the size of a phone booth, 
made of white stones, with a slanted roof. I thought it was empty. But to my 
surprise, a gray-uniformed guard stepped out of it, a rifle perched stiffly on his 
shoulder. 

I turned back and gazed at the dark wall that surrounded the castle grounds. 
“Look, Eddie,” I whispered. “You can’t see any of the city outside the wall. It’s 
as if we really stepped back in time.” 

He shivered. I don’t know if it was because of my words or because of the 
sharp wind that blew through the old courtyard. 

The castle cast a deep shadow over the path. Mr. Starkes led us up to a 
narrow entrance at the side. Then he stopped and turned back to the group. 

I was startled by the tense, sorrowful expression on his face. “I am so sorry 
to give you this bad news,” he said, his eyes moving slowly from one of us to the 
next. 

“Huh? Bad news?” Eddie whispered, moving closer to me. 

“You will all be imprisoned in the north tower,” Mr. Starkes announced 
sternly. “There you will be tortured until you tell us the real reason why you 
chose to come here.” 



2 


Eddie let out a startled cry. Other members of the tour group uttered shocked 
gasps. 

Mr. Starkes began to chuckle as a grin spread over his round, red face. “Just 
a little Terror Tower joke,” he said brightly. “Eve got to have some fun, you 
know.” 

We all laughed, too. Except Eddie. He still seemed shaken. “That guy is 
crazy!” Eddie whispered. 

Actually, Mr. Starkes was a very good tour guide. Very cheerful and 
helpful, and he seemed to know everything about London. My only problem was 
that sometimes I had trouble understanding his British accent. 

“As you can see, the castle consists of several buildings,” Mr. Starkes 
explained, turning serious. “That long, low building over there served as a 
barracks for the soldiers.” He pointed across the broad lawn. 

I snapped a picture of the old barracks. It looked like a long, low hut. Then 
I turned and snapped a picture of the gray-uniformed guard standing at attention 
in front of the small guardhouse. 

I heard several gasps of surprise behind me. Turning back, I saw a large 
hooded man creep out of the entrance and sneak up behind Mr. Starkes. He wore 
an ancient-looking green tunic and carried an enormous battle-axe. 

An executioner! 

He raised the battle-axe behind Mr. Starkes. 

“Does anyone here need a very fast haircut?” Mr. Starkes asked casually, 
without turning around. “This is the castle barber!” 

We all laughed. The man in the green executioner’s costume took a quick 
bow, then disappeared back into the building. 

“This is fun,” Eddie whispered. But I noticed he was clinging very close to 
me. 

“We are going to enter the torture chamber first,” Mr. Starkes announced. 
“Please stick together.” He raised a red pennant on a long stick. “I’ll carry this 
high so you can find me easily. It’s so easy to get lost inside. There are hundreds 
of chambers and secret passages.” 

“Wow. Cool!” I exclaimed. 



Eddie glanced at me doubtfully. 

“You’re not too scared to go into the torture chamber, are you?” I asked 

him. 

“Who? Me?” he replied shakily. 

“You will see some very unusual torture devices,” Mr. Starkes continued. 
“The wardens had many ways to inflict pain on their poor prisoners. We 
recommend that you do not try them at home.” 

A few people laughed. I couldn’t wait to get inside. 

“I ask you again to stick together,” Mr. Starkes urged as the group began to 
file through the narrow doorway into the castle. “My last tour group was lost 
forever in there. Most of them are still wandering the dark chambers. My boss 
really scolded me when I got back to the office!” 

I laughed at his lame joke. He had probably told it a thousand times. 

At the entrance, I raised my eyes to the top of the dark tower. It was solid 
stone. No windows except for a tiny square one near the very top. 

People were actually imprisoned here, I thought. Real people. Hundreds of 
years ago. I suddenly wondered if the castle was haunted. 

I tried to read the serious expression on my brother’s face. I wondered if 
Eddie was having the same chilling thoughts. 

We stepped up to the dark entranceway. “Turn around, Eddie,” I said. I took 
a step back and pulled my camera from my coat pocket. 

“Let’s go in,” Eddie pleaded. “The others are getting ahead of us.” 

“I just want to take your picture at the castle entrance,” I said. 

I raised the camera to my eye. Eddie made a dumb face. I pressed the 
shutter release and snapped the picture. 

I had no way of knowing that it was the last picture I would ever take of 
Eddie. 



3 


Mr. Starkes led the way down a narrow stairway. Our sneakers squeaked on the 
stone floor as we stepped into a large, dimly lit chamber. 

I took a deep breath and waited for my eyes to adjust to the darkness. The 
air smelled old and dusty. 

It was surprisingly warm inside. I unzipped my coat and pulled my long 
brown hair out from under the collar. 

I could see several display cases against the wall. Mr. Starkes led the way to 
a large wooden structure in the center of the room. The group huddled closely 
around him. 

“This is the Rack,” he proclaimed, waving his red pennant at it. 

“Wow. It’s real!” I whispered to Eddie. I’d seen big torture devices like this 
in movies and comic books. But I never thought they really existed. 

“The prisoner was forced to lie down here,” Mr. Starkes continued. “His 
arms and legs were strapped down. When that big wheel was turned, the ropes 
pulled his arms and legs, stretching them tight.” He pointed to the big wooden 
wheel. 

“Turn the wheel more, and the ropes pulled tighter,” Mr. Starkes said, his 
eyes twinkling merrily. “Sometimes the wheel was turned and the prisoner was 
stretched and stretched—until his bones were pulled right out of their sockets.” 

He chuckled. “I believe that is what is called doing a long stretch in 
prison!” 

Some of the group members laughed at Mr. Starkes’ joke. But Eddie and I 
exchanged solemn glances. 

Staring at the long wooden contraption with its thick ropes and straps, I 
pictured someone lying there. I imagined the creak of the wheel turning. And the 
ropes pulling tighter and tighter. 

Glancing up, my eye caught a dark figure standing on the other side of the 
Rack. He was very tall and very broad. Dressed in a long black cape, he had 
pulled a wide-brimmed hat down over his forehead, hiding most of his face in 
shadow. 

His eyes glowed darkly out from the shadow. 

Was he staring at me? 



I poked Eddie. “See that man over there? The one in black?” I whispered. 
“Is he in our group?” 

Eddie shook his head. “Eve never seen him before,” he whispered back. 
“He’s weird! Why is he staring at us like that?” 

The big man pulled the hat lower. His eyes disappeared beneath the wide 
brim. His black cape swirled as he stepped back into the shadows. 

Mr. Starkes continued to talk about the Rack. He asked if there were any 
volunteers to try it out. Everyone laughed. 

I’ve got to get a picture of this thing, I decided. My friends will really think 
it’s cool. 

I reached into my coat pocket for my camera. 

“Hey—!” I cried out in surprise. 

I searched the other pocket. Then I searched my jeans pockets. 

“I don’t believe this!” I cried. 

The camera was gone. 



4 


“Eddie—my camera!” I exclaimed. “Did you see—?” 

I stopped when I saw the mischievous grin on my brother’s face. 

He held up his hand—with my camera in it—and his grin grew wider. “The 
Mad Pickpocket strikes again!” he declared. 

“You took it from my pocket?” I wailed. I gave him a hard shove that sent 
him stumbling into the Rack. 

He burst out laughing. Eddie thinks he’s the world’s greatest pickpocket. 
That’s his hobby. Really. He practices all the time. 

“Fastest hands on Earth!” he bragged, waving the camera at me. 

I grabbed it away from him. “You’re obnoxious,” I told him. 

I don’t know why he enjoys being a thief so much. But he really is good at 
it. When he slid that camera from my coat pocket, I didn’t feel a thing. 

I started to tell him to keep his hands off my camera. But Mr. Starkes 
motioned for the group to follow him into the next room. 

As Eddie and I hurried to keep up, I glimpsed at the man in the black cape. 
He was lumbering up behind us, his face still hidden under the wide brim of his 
hat. 

I felt a stab of fear in my chest. Was the strange man watching Eddie and 
me? Why? 

No. He was probably just another tourist visiting the Tower. So why did I 
have the frightening feeling he was following us? 

I kept glancing back at him as Eddie and I studied the displays of torture 
devices in the next room. The man didn’t seem interested in the displays at all. 
He kept near the wall, his black cape fading into the deep shadows, his eyes 
straight ahead—on us! 

“Look at these!” Eddie urged, pushing me toward a display shelf. “What are 
these?” 

“Thumbscrews,” Mr. Starkes replied, stepping up behind us. He picked one 
up. “It looks like a ring,” he explained. “See? It slides down over your thumb 
like this.” 

He slid the wide metal ring over his thumb. Then he raised his hand so we 
could see clearly. “There is a screw in the side of the ring. Turn the screw, and it 



digs its way into your thumb. Keep turning it, and it digs deeper and deeper.” 
“Ouch!” I declared. 

“Very nasty,” Mr. Starkes agreed, setting the thumbscrew back on the 
display shelf. “This is a whole room of very nasty items.” 

“I can’t believe people were actually tortured with this stuff,” Eddie 
murmured. His voice trembled. He really didn’t like scary things—especially 
when they were real. 

“Wish I had a pair of these to use on you!” I teased. Eddie is such a wimp. 
Sometimes I can’t help myself. I have to give him a hard time. 

I reached behind the rope barrier and picked up a pair of metal handcuffs. 
They were heavier than I imagined. And they had a jagged row of metal spikes 
all around on the inside. 

“Sue—put those down!” Eddie whispered frantically. 

I slipped one around my wrist. “See, Eddie, when you clamp it shut, the 
jagged spikes cut into your wrist,” I told him. 

I let out a startled gasp as the heavy metal cuff clicked shut. 

“Ow!” I screamed, tugging frantically at it. “Eddie—help! I can’t get it off! 
It’s cutting me! It’s cutting me!” 



5 


“Ohhhh.” A horrified moan escaped Eddie’s throat as he gaped at the cuff around 
my wrist. His mouth dropped open, and his chin started to quiver. 

“Help me!” I wailed, thrashing my arm frantically, tugging at the chain. 
“Get me out of this!” 

Eddie turned as white as a ghost. 

I couldn’t keep a straight face any longer. I started to laugh. And I slid the 
handcuff off my wrist. 

“Gotcha back!” I jeered. “That’s for stealing my camera. Now we’re even!” 

“I—I—I—” Eddie sputtered. His dark eyes glowered at me angrily. “I 
really thought you were hurt,” he muttered. “Don’t do that again, Sue. I mean it.” 

I stuck my tongue out at him. I know it wasn’t very mature. My brother 
doesn’t always bring out the best in me. 

“Follow me, please!” Mr. Starkes’ voice echoed off the stone walls. Eddie 
and I moved closer as our tour group huddled around Mr. Starkes. 

“We’re going to climb the stairs to the north tower now,” the tour guide 
announced. “As you will see, the stairs are quite narrow and steep. So we will 
have to go single file. Please watch your step.” 

Mr. Starkes ducked his bald head as he led the way through a low, narrow 
doorway. Eddie and I were at the end of the line. 

The stone stairs twisted up the Tower like a corkscrew. There was no 
handrailing. And the stairs were so steep and so twisty, I had to hold on to the 
wall to keep my balance as I climbed. 

The air grew warmer as we made our way higher. So many feet had 
climbed these ancient stones, the stairs were worn smooth, the edges round. 

I tried to imagine prisoners being marched up these stairs to the Tower. 
Their legs must have trembled with fear. 

Up ahead, Eddie made his way slowly, peering up at the soot-covered stone 
walls. “It’s too dark,” he complained, turning back to me. “Hurry up, Sue. Don’t 
get too far behind.” 

My coat brushed against the stone wall as I climbed. I’m pretty skinny, but 
the stairway was so narrow, I kept bumping the sides. 

After climbing for what seemed like hours, we stopped on a landing. 



Straight ahead of us was a small dark cell behind metal bars. 

“This is a cell in which political prisoners were held,” Mr. Starkes told us. 
“Enemies of the king were brought here. You can see it was not the most 
comfortable place in the world.” 

Moving closer, I saw that the cell contained only a small stone bench and a 
wooden writing table. 

“What happened to these prisoners?” a white-haired woman asked Mr. 
Starkes. “Did they stay in this cell for years and years?” 

“No,” Mr. Starkes replied, rubbing his chin. “Most of them were beheaded.” 

I felt a chill at the back of my neck. I stepped up to the bars and peered into 
the small cell. 

Real people stood inside this cell, I thought. Real people held on to these 
bars and stared out. Sat at that little writing table. Paced back and forth in that 
narrow space. Waiting to meet their fate. 

Swallowing hard, I glanced at my brother. I could see that he was just as 
horrified as I was. 

“We have not reached the top of the Tower yet,” Mr. Starkes announced. 
“Let us continue our climb.” 

The stone steps became steeper as we made our way up the curving 
stairway. I trailed my hand along the wall as I followed Eddie up to the top. 

And as I climbed, I suddenly had the strangest feeling—that I had been here 
before. That I had followed the twisting stairs. That I had climbed to the top of 
this ancient tower before. 

Of course, that was impossible. 

Eddie and I had never been to England before in our lives. 

The feeling stayed with me as our tour group crowded into the tiny chamber 
at the top. Had I seen this tower in a movie? Had I seen pictures of it in a 
magazine? 

Why did it look so familiar to me? 

I shook my head hard, as if trying to shake away the strange, troubling 
thoughts. Then I stepped up beside Eddie and gazed around the tiny room. 

A small round window high above our heads allowed a wash of gloomy 
gray light to filter down over us. The rounded walls were bare, lined with cracks 
and dark stains. The ceiling was low, so low that Mr. Starkes and some of the 
other adults had to duck their heads. 

“Perhaps you can feel the sadness in this room,” Mr. Starkes said softly. 



We all huddled closer to hear him better. Eddie stared up at the window, his 
expression solemn. 

“This is the tower room where a young prince and princess were brought,” 
Mr. Starkes continued, speaking solemnly. “It was the early fifteenth century. 
The prince and princess—Edward and Susannah of York—were locked in this 
tiny tower cell.” 

He waved the red pennant in a circle. We all followed it, gazing around the 
small, cold room. “Imagine. Two children. Grabbed away from their home. 
Locked away in the drab chill of this cell in the top of a tower.” Mr. Starkes’ 
voice remained just above a whisper. 

I suddenly felt cold. I zipped my coat back up. Eddie had his hands shoved 
deep in his jeans pockets. His eyes grew wide with fear as he gazed around the 
tiny, dark room. 

“The prince and princess weren’t up here for long,” Mr. Starkes continued, 
lowering the pennant to his side. “That night while they slept, the Lord High 
Executioner and his men crept up the stairs. Their orders were to smother the 
two children. To keep the prince and princess from ever taking the throne.” 

Mr. Starkes shut his eyes and bowed his head. The silence in the room 
seemed to grow heavy. 

No one moved. No one spoke. 

The only sound was the whisper of wind through the tiny window above 
our heads. 

I shut my eyes, too. I tried to picture a boy and a girl. Frightened and alone. 
Trying to sleep in this cold, stone room. 

The door bursts open. Strange men break in. They don’t say a word. They 
msh to smother the boy and girl. 

Right in this room. 

Right where I am standing now, I thought. 

I opened my eyes. Eddie was gazing at me, his expression troubled. “This 
is... really scary,” he whispered. 

“Yeah,” I agreed. Mr. Starkes started to tell us more. 

But the camera fell out of my hand. It clattered noisily on the stone floor. I 
bent to pick it up. “Oh, look, Eddie—the lens broke!” I cried. 

“Ssshhh! I missed what Mr. Starkes said about the prince and princess!” 
Eddie protested. 

“But my camera—!” I shook it. I don’t know why. It’s not like shaking it 



would help fix the lens. 

“What did he say? Did you hear?” Eddie demanded. 

I shook my head. “Sorry. I missed it.” 

We walked over to a low cot against the wall. A three-legged wooden stool 
stood beside it. The only furniture in the chamber. 

Did the prince and princess sit here? I wondered. 

Did they stand on the bed and try to see out the window? 

What did they talk about? Did they wonder what was going to happen to 
them? Did they talk about the fun things they would do when they were freed? 
When they returned home? 

It was all so sad, so horribly sad. 

I stepped up to the cot and rested my hand on it. It felt hard. 

Black markings on the wall caught my eye. Writing? 

Had the prince or the princess left a message on the wall? 

I leaned over the cot and squinted at the markings. 

No. No message. Just cracks in the stone. 

“Sue—come on,” Eddie urged. He tugged my arm. 

“Okay, okay,” I replied impatiently. I ran my hand over the cot again. It felt 
so lumpy and hard, so uncomfortable. 

I gazed up at the window. The gray light had darkened to black. Dark as 
night out there. 

The stone walls suddenly seemed to close in on me. I felt as if I were in a 
dark closet, a cold, frightening closet. I imagined the walls squeezing in, choking 
me, smothering me. 

Is that how the prince and princess felt? 

Was I feeling the same fear they had known over five hundred years ago? 

With a heavy sigh, I let go of the cot and turned to Eddie. “Let’s get out of 
here,” I said in a trembling voice. “This room is just too frightening, too sad.” 

We turned away from the cot, took a few steps toward the stairs—and 
stopped. 

“Hey—!” We both cried out in surprise. 

Mr. Starkes and the tour group had disappeared. 



6 


“Where did they go?” Eddie cried in a shrill, startled voice. “They left us here!” 

“They must be on their way back down the stairs,” I told him. I gave him a 
gentle push. “Let’s go.” 

Eddie lingered close to me. “You go first,” he insisted quietly. 

“You’re not scared—are you?” I teased. “All alone in the Terror Tower?” 

I don’t know why I enjoy teasing my little brother so much. I knew he was 
scared. I was a little scared, too. But I couldn’t help it. 

As I said, Eddie doesn’t always bring out the best in me. 

I led the way to the twisting stairs. As I peered down, they seemed even 
darker and steeper. 

“Why didn’t we hear them leave?” Eddie demanded. “Why did they leave 
so fast?” 

“It’s late,” I told him. “I think Mr. Starkes was eager to get everyone on the 
bus and back to their hotels. The Tower closes at five, I think.” I glanced at my 
watch. It was five-twenty. 

“Hurry,” Eddie pleaded. “I don’t want to be locked in. This place gives me 
the creeps.” 

“Me, too,” I confessed. 

Squinting into the darkness, I started down the steps. My sneakers slid on 
the smooth stone. Once again, I pressed one hand against the wall. It helped me 
keep my balance on the curving stairs. 

“Where are they?” Eddie demanded nervously. “Why can’t we hear the 
others on the stairs?” 

The air grew cooler as we climbed lower. A pale yellow light washed over 
the landing just below us. 

My hand swept through something soft and sticky. Cobwebs. 

Yuck. 

I could hear Eddie’s rapid breathing behind me. “The bus will wait for us,” 
I told him. “Just stay calm. Mr. Starkes won’t drive off without us.” 

“Is anybody down there?” Eddie screamed. “Can anybody hear me?” 

His shrill voice echoed down the narrow stone stairwell. 

No reply. 



“Where are the guards?” Eddie demanded. 

“Eddie—please don’t get worked up,” I pleaded. “It’s late. The guards are 
probably closing up. Mr. Starkes will be waiting for us down there. I promise 
you.” 

We stepped into the pale light of the landing. 

The small cell we had seen before stood against the wall. 

“Don’t stop,” Eddie pleaded, breathing hard. “Keep going, Sue. Hurry!” 

I put my hand on his shoulder to calm him. “Eddie, we’ll be fine,” I said 
soothingly. “We’re almost down to the ground.” 

“But, look—” Eddie protested. He pointed frantically. 

I saw at once what was troubling him. There were two stairways leading 
down—one to the left of the cell, and one to the right. 

“That’s strange,” I uttered, glancing from one to the other. “I don’t 
remember a second stairway.” 

“Wh-which one is the right one?” he stammered. 

I hesitated. “I’m not sure,” I replied. I stepped over to the one on the right 
and peered down. I couldn’t see very far because it curved so sharply. 

“Which one? Which one?” Eddie repeated. 

“I don’t think it matters,” I told him. “I mean, they both lead down —right?” 

I motioned for him to follow me. “Come on. I think this is the one we took 
when we were climbing up.” 

I took one step down. 

Then stopped. 

I heard footsteps. Heavy footsteps. Coming up the stairs. 

Eddie grabbed my hand. “Who’s that?” he whispered. 

“Probably Mr. Starkes,” I told him. “He must be coming back up to get us.” 

Eddie breathed a long sigh of relief. 

“Mr. Starkes—is that you?” I called down. 

Silence. Except for the approaching footsteps. 

“Mr. Starkes?” I called in a tiny voice. 

When the dark figure appeared on the stairway below, I could see at once 
that it wasn’t our tour guide. 

“Oh!” I uttered a startled cry as the huge man in the black cape stepped into 

view. 

His face was still hidden in darkness. But his eyes glowed like burning 
coals as he glared up at Eddie and me from under the black, wide-brimmed hat. 



“Is—is this the way down?” I stammered. 

He didn’t reply. 

He didn’t move. His eyes burned into mine. 

I struggled to see his face. But he kept it hidden in the shadow of the hat, 
pulled low over his forehead. 

I took a deep breath and tried again. “We got separated from our group,” I 
said. “They must be waiting for us. Is—is this the way down?” 

Again, he didn’t reply. He glared up at us menacingly. 

He’s so big, I realized. He blocks the entire stairway. 

“Sir—?” I started. “My brother and I—” 

He raised a hand. A huge hand, covered in a black glove. 

He pointed up at us. 

“You will come with me now,” he growled. 

I just stared at him. I didn’t understand. 

“You will come now,” he repeated. “I do not want to hurt you. But if you 
try to escape, I will have no choice.” 



7 


Eddie let out a sharp gasp. 

My mouth dropped open as the man edged closer. 

And then I realized who he was. “You’re a guard here—right?” I asked. 

He didn’t reply. 

“You—you scared me,” I said, letting out a shrill laugh. “I mean, that 
costume and everything. You work here—right?” 

He stepped forward, bringing his black-gloved hands up in front of him, 
moving the fingers. 

“I’m sorry we’re here so late,” I continued. “We lost our group. I guess you 
want to close up so you can go home.” 

He took another step closer. His eyes flared darkly. “You know why I am 
here,” he snarled. 

“No. I don’t. I—” My words were cut off as he grabbed me by the shoulder. 

“Hey—let go of her!” Eddie cried. 

But the caped man grabbed my brother, too. 

His gloved fingers dug sharply into my shoulder. “Hey—!” I cried out in 

pain. 

He backed us against the cold stone wall. 

I caught a glimpse of his face, a hard, angry face. A long, sharp nose, thin 
lips twisted in a snarl. And the eyes. The cold, glowing eyes. 

“Let us go!” Eddie demanded bravely. 

“We have to meet our group!” I told the man shrilly. “We’re leaving now. 
You can’t keep us here!” 

He ignored our pleas. “Do not move,” he uttered in a low growl. “Stand 
there. Do not try to escape.” 

“Listen, sir—if we’ve done something wrong...” My voice trailed off. 

I watched him reach into the folds of his black cape. He struggled for a 
moment, then pulled something out. 

At first I thought they were rubber balls. Three of them. 

But as he clicked them together, I realized he was holding smooth, white 
stones. 



What is going on here? I asked myself. 

Is he crazy? 

Crazy and dangerous ? 

“Listen, sir—” Eddie started. “We have to go now.” 

“Don’t move!” the caped man screamed. He shoved his cape violently 
behind him. “Don’t move—and don’t make a sound. You have my final 
warning!” 

Eddie and I exchanged frightened glances. My back against the stone wall, I 
tried edging slowly toward the nearest stairway. 

Mumbling to himself, the man concentrated on the three smooth white 
stones. He piled one on top of the other. 

He let out an angry cry as one of the stones fell to the floor. It bounced once 
and slid across the smooth floor. 

This is our chance! I thought. 

I shoved Eddie toward the other stairwell. “Run!” I screamed. 



8 


“Do not move!” the man bellowed, grabbing up the stone. He had a booming 
voice that thundered off the stone walls. “I warned you. You cannot escape me!” 

My brother’s eyes were bugging out of his head. But he didn’t have to be 
told twice to run! 

“Stop!” the caped man bellowed. The booming voice followed us as we 
scrambled down, stumbling on the twisting, curving stairs, our hands trailing 
against the cold stone of the tower wall. 

Down, down. 

Turning so fast, my head spun. But I squinted into the dim light and forced 
myself not to be dizzy, not to fall, not to give in to the terror that rose up over 
me. 

My camera fell out of my coat pocket. It clattered down the stairs. I didn’t 
stop to pick it up. It was broken, anyway. 

“Keep going,” I urged Eddie. “Keep going! We’re almost out of here!” 

Or were we? 

The climb down seemed so much longer. 

Our sneakers slapped against the stone steps. But even louder were the 
heavy footsteps of the caped man behind us. His bellowed cries boomed down 
the narrow tower, echoed all around us—as if we were being chased by a 
hundred frightening men instead of one. 

Who is he? 

Why is he chasing us? 

Why is he so angry? 

The questions bounced through my mind as I scrambled frantically down, 
following the twisting stairs. 

No time for answers. 

The big, gray door rose up in front of us before we could stop. 

Eddie and I both ran right into it. 

“The exit! We—we’re here!” I stammered. I could hear the rumble of the 
man’s footsteps above us on the stairway. Coming closer. Closer. 

We’re out! I thought. We’re safe! 

Eddie shoved the door hard with his shoulder. Shoved it again. 



He turned to me, his chin quivering in fright. “It’s locked. We’re locked in!” 
“No!” I screamed. “Push!” 

We both lowered our shoulders and pushed with all our strength. 

No. 

The door didn’t budge. 

The man lumbered closer. So close, we could hear his muttered words. 
We’re trapped, I realized. 

He’s caught us. 

Why does he want us? What is he going to do? 

“One more try,” I managed to choke out. 

Eddie and I turned back to the door. 

“Stay there!” the caped man commanded. 

But Eddie and I gave the door one more desperate shove. 

And it finally moved, scraping the stone floor as it slid open partway. 

Eddie sucked in his breath and pushed through the opening first. Then I 
squeezed through. 

Panting hard, we shoved the door shut behind us. The door had a long metal 
bar on the outside. I slid it all the way, bolting it. Locking the caped man inside. 
“We’re safe!” I cried, spinning away from the door. 

But we weren’t outside. We were in a huge, dark room. 

And a cruel voice—in the room with us—a man’s voice, laughing softly— 
told me that we weren’t out of trouble. 



9 


The laughter rose up in front of us, making us both gasp. 

“You have entered the king’s dungeon. Abandon all hope,” the man 
declared. 

“Who—who are you?” I cried. 

But more laughter was the only reply. 

A single beam of pale green light from the low ceiling broke the darkness. 
Huddled close to Eddie, I squinted in the eerie glow, desperate to find a way to 
escape. 

“Over there! Look!” Eddie whispered, pointing. 

Across the room, I could see a barred cell against the wall. 

We crept forward a few steps. Then we saw it. 

A bony hand reaching out from between the bars. 

“No!” I gasped. 

Eddie and I jumped back. 

The pounding on the door behind us made us both jump again. “You cannot 
escape!” the caped man raged from the other side of the door. 

Eddie grabbed my hand as the man furiously pounded on the door. The 
sound boomed louder than thunder. 

Would the bolt hold? 

Ahead of us, two bony hands reached out from another dungeon cell. 

“This can’t be happening!” Eddie choked out. “There aren’t any dungeons 
today!” 

“Another doorway!” I whispered, trembling with fright as I stared at the 
hands poking out from the dark cells. “Find another doorway.” 

My eyes frantically searched the darkness. Off in a distant corner, I 
glimpsed a slender crack of light. 

I started to run toward it—and tripped over something. Something chained 
to the floor. 

It was a body. A body of a man sprawled on the floor. And I landed on his 
chest with a sickening thud. 

The chains rattled loudly as my foot tangled in them. 



My knees and elbows hit the stone floor hard. Pain shot through my entire 
body. 

The old man didn’t move. 

I scrambled up. Stared down at him. 

And realized he was a dummy. 

Not real. Just a dummy, chained to the floor. 

“Eddie—it’s not real!” I cried. 

“Huh?” He stared at me, his face twisted in confusion, in fright. 

“It’s not real! None of it!” I repeated. “Look! The hands in the dungeon 
cells—they’re not moving! It’s all a display, Eddie. Just a display!” 

Eddie started to reply. But the cruel laughter interrupted him. 

“You have entered the king’s dungeon. Abandon all hope,” the voice 
repeated. Then more evil laughter. 

Just a tape. Just a recording. 

There wasn’t anyone in the room with us. No dungeon keeper. 

I let out a long sigh. My heart was still pounding like a bass drum. But I felt 
a little better knowing that we weren’t trapped in a real dungeon. 

“We’re okay,” I assured Eddie. 

And then the door burst open with a loud crack. And the big man roared 
into the room, his cape fluttering behind him, his dark eyes glowing in victory. 



10 


Eddie and I froze in the middle of the floor. 

The caped man froze, too. The only sound was his harsh, raspy breathing. 

We stared through the dim light at each other. Frozen like the dummies in 
the cells. 

“You cannot escape,” the man growled once again. “You know you will not 
leave the castle.” 

His words sent a cold shiver down my back. 

“Leave us alone!” Eddie pleaded in a tiny voice. 

“What do you want?” I demanded. “Why are you chasing us?” 

The big man pressed his gloved hands against his waist. “You know the 
answer,” he replied flatly. He took a step toward Eddie and me. “Are you ready 
to come with me now?” he demanded. 

I didn’t reply. Instead, I leaned close to Eddie and whispered, “Get ready to 

run.” 

Eddie continued to stare straight ahead. He didn’t blink or nod his head. I 
couldn’t tell if he had even heard me. 

“You know you have no choice,” the man said softly. He reached both 
hands into the folds of his cape. Once again, he pulled out the mysterious white 
stones. And once again, I caught a glimpse of his dark eyes, saw the cold sneer 
on his lips. 

“You—you’ve made a mistake!” Eddie stammered. 

The man shook his head. The wide brim of the black hat cast tilting 
shadows on the floor. “I have made no mistake. Do not run from me again. You 
know you must come with me now.” 

Eddie and I didn’t need a signal. 

Without saying a word to each other, without glancing at each other, we 
spun around—and started to run. 

The man shouted in protest and took off after us. 

The room seemed to stretch on forever. It must be the entire basement of 
the castle, I realized. 

Beyond the beam of light, the darkness rose up like fog. 

My fear weighed me down. My legs felt as if they were a thousand pounds 



each. 

I’m moving in slow motion, I thought, struggling to speed up. Eddie and I 
are crawling like turtles. 

He’ll catch us. He’ll catch us in two seconds. 

I glanced back when I heard the caped man cry out. He had tripped over the 
same dummy chained to the floor. He had fallen heavily. 

As he scrambled to his feet, my eyes searched the far wall for a door. Or a 
hallway. Or any kind of opening. 

“How—how do we get out of here?” Eddie cried. “We’re trapped, Sue!” 

“No!” I cried. I spotted a worktable against the wall. Cluttered with tools. I 
searched for something to use as a weapon. Didn’t see anything. Grabbed a 
flashlight, instead. 

Frantically pushed the button. 

Would it work? 

Yes. 

A white beam of light darted over the floor. I raised it to the far wall. “Eddie 
—look!” I whispered. 

A low opening in the wall. Some kind of tunnel? A tunnel we could escape 
through? 

In another second, we were ducking our heads and stepping into the dark 
opening. 

I kept my light ahead of us, down at our feet. We had to stoop as we ran. 
The tunnel was curved at the top, and not high enough for us to stand. 

The tunnel ran straight for a while, then curved down and to the right. The 
air felt damp and cool. I could hear the trickle of water nearby. 

“It’s an old sewer,” I told Eddie. “That means it has to lead us out 
somewhere.” 

“I hope so,” Eddie replied breathlessly. 

Running hard, we followed the curve of the sewer. My light leaped about, 
jumping from the low ceiling to the damp stone floor. 

The light revealed wide metal rungs hanging from the ceiling. Eddie and I 
had to duck even lower to keep from smashing our heads against them. 

The light from my flashlight bounced wildly from the floor to the rungs 
along the top of the sewer. Eddie and I splashed through puddles of dirty water. 

We both gasped when we heard the footsteps behind us. 

Heavy, ringing footsteps. Thundering in the low tunnel. Growing louder. 



Louder. 

I glanced back. But the caped man was hidden by the curve of the sewer 
tunnel. 

His footsteps boomed steadily, rapidly. I could tell he wasn’t far behind. 

He’s going to catch us, I told myself in a panic. 

This tunnel is never going to end. 

Eddie and I can’t run much farther. 

He’s going to catch us in this dark, damp sewer. 

And then what? 

What does he want? 

Why did he say that we knew what he wanted? 

How could we know? 

I stumbled forward. The flashlight bumped against the wall and fell from 
my hand. 

It clattered to the tunnel floor and rolled in front of me. 

The light shone back into the tunnel, back toward the caped man. 

I saw him move into view, bent low, running hard. 

“Ohhh.” A frightened moan escaped my lips. 

I bent to pick up the flashlight. It slid out of my trembling hand. 

That was all the time the caped man needed. 

He grabbed Eddie with both hands. He pulled the black cape around my 
brother, trapping him. 

Then he reached for me. “I told you—there is no escape,” he rasped. 



11 


I ducked out of the caped man’s grasp. 

With another frightened groan, I grabbed the flashlight off the floor. 

I planned to use it as a weapon. To shine it in the caped man’s eyes. Or 
swing it at his head. 

But I didn’t get a chance. 

I froze in horror as the beam of light bounced down the tunnel—and I saw 
the rats. 

Hundreds of them. Hundreds of chittering gray rats. 

The darting light made their eyes glow red as fire. The rats came scrabbling 
over the sewer floor. Snapping their jaws hungrily, gnashing their jagged teeth as 
they came charging at us. 

Their shrill whistling and chittering echoed through the tunnel. The 
terrifying sound made my breath catch in my throat. 

The tiny red eyes glowed in the light as they scrabbled toward us. As they 
pulled their scrawny bodies over the hard floor, their tails slithered behind them 
like dark snakes. 

The caped man saw them, too. He leaped back in surprise. 

And Eddie came tearing out from under the cape. He gulped in shock as his 
eyes locked on the charging rats. 

“Jump!” I cried. “Eddie—jump!” 

Eddie didn’t move. We both gaped at the rats in horror. A churning sea of 
whistling, chewing, red-eyed rats. A living tidal wave of rats. 

“Jump! Jump—now!” I shrieked. 

I raised both hands. Jumped. 

Eddie jumped, too. We grabbed on to the metal bars imbedded in the sewer 

roof. 

Pulling myself up, I frantically lifted my feet as high as I could from the 
floor. 

Higher. Higher. As the rats charged underneath me. 

A foul odor rose up, nearly choking me as the rats ran past. 

I could hear the tap tap tap of their long toenails against the floor. Hear the 
swish of their sweeping tails. 



I couldn’t see the rats in the darkness. But I could hear them. And feel 
them. They jumped at my shoes. Scratched at my legs with their sharp claws. 
And kept coming. 

I turned to see the caped man start to run back. 

He stumbled with lurching steps as he tried to flee the thundering wave of 
rats. His arms shot forward as if reaching for safety. The black cape whipped up 
behind him. 

The wide-brimmed hat flew off his head and floated to the floor. A dozen 
rats pounced on it, climbed all over it, and began chewing it to pieces. 

The man’s footsteps echoed in the tunnel as he ran faster. Rats leaped up at 
his cape, clawing it, snapping their jaws, and shrieking excitedly. 

A second later, he disappeared around the curve of the sewer. 

The rats scrambled noisily after him. As they vanished around the curve, 
the sounds all blended together, became a roar, a roar that rang through the long 
sewer. 

A roar of horror. 

My arms were both aching, throbbing with pain. But I kept my feet high off 
the floor. I didn’t let go of the metal rung until I was sure all the rats had 
disappeared. 

The roar faded into the distance. 

I heard Eddie’s heavy breathing. He let out a sharp groan and dropped to 
the floor. 

I let go of the bar and lowered myself, too. I waited for my heart to stop 
pounding, for the blood to stop throbbing at my temples. 

“That was a close call,” Eddie murmured. His chin trembled. His face was 
as gray as the tunnel walls. 

I shuddered. I knew I’d see the hundreds of tiny red eyes in my dreams, 
hear the clicking of their long toenails and the swish of their scraggly tails. 

“Let’s get out of this disgusting sewer!” I cried. “Mr. Starkes must be 
frantic searching for us.” 

Eddie picked up the flashlight and handed it to me. “I can’t wait to get back 
on the tour bus,” he said. “I can’t wait to get away from this awful tower. I can’t 
believe we’ve been chased by a crazy person through a sewer. This can’t really 
be happening to us, Sue!” 

“It’s happening,” I declared, shaking my head. I suddenly had another 
thought. “Mom and Dad are probably out of their meeting,” I said. “They’re 



probably worried sick about us.” 

“Not as worried as lam!” Eddie exclaimed. 

I beamed the light ahead, keeping it down on the sewer floor, and we started 
walking. The tunnel floor rose up and curved to the left. We started to climb. 

“There’s got to be an end to this sewer,” I muttered. “It’s got to end 
somewhere! ” 

A faint roar up ahead made me cry out. 

More rats! 

Eddie and I both stopped. And listened. 

“Hey—!” I uttered excitedly when I realized it was a different sound. 

The sound of wind rushing into the tunnel. 

That meant we had to be close to the end. And that the sewer emptied 
somewhere outside. 

“Let’s go!” I cried excitedly. The beam of light bounced ahead of us as we 
started to run. 

The tunnel curved again. And then suddenly ended. 

I saw a metal ladder, reaching straight up. Straight up to a large, round hole 
in the tunnel ceiling. Gazing up at the hole, I saw the night sky. 

Eddie and I let out shouts of joy. He scrambled up the ladder, and I pulled 
myself up right behind him. 

It was a cold, damp night. But we didn’t care. The air smelled so fresh and 
clean. 

And we were out. Out of the sewer. Out of the Terror Tower. 

Away from that frightening man in the black cape. 

I gazed around quickly, trying to figure out where we were. The Tower 
tilted up toward us, a black shadow against the blue-black sky. 

The lights had all been turned off. The tiny guardhouse lay dark and empty. 
Not another soul in sight. 

I saw the low wall that divided the Tower from the rest of the world. And 
then I found the stone path that led to the exit and the parking lot. 

Our shoes thudded over the smooth stones as we hurried toward the parking 
lot. A pale half-moon slid out from behind wispy clouds. It cast a shimmering 
silver light over the whispering trees and the long stone wall. 

It all suddenly looked unreal. 

Without stopping, I glanced back at the old castle. The moonlight shone off 
the jutting towers, as if casting them in a pale spotlight. 



Real people walked on this path hundreds of years ago, I thought. 

And real people died up in that tower. 

With a shiver, I turned back and kept jogging. Eddie and I moved through 
the open gate and out past the wall. 

We’re back in modern times, I thought. Back where we are safe. 

But our happiness didn’t last long. 

The parking lot shimmered darkly in the pale moonlight. Empty. 

The tour bus was gone. 

Eddie and I both turned to search up and down the street. The long, empty 
street. 

“They left us,” Eddie murmured with a sigh. “How are we going to get back 
to the hotel?” 

I started to answer—but stopped when I saw the man. 

A tall, white-haired man, limping toward us, moving fast, pointing and 
calling, “You there! You there!” 

Oh, no, I thought wearily, feeling my body freeze in fear. 

Now what? 



12 


“You there! You there!” 

The man’s shoulder dipped in the big, gray overcoat he wore as he charged 
at us, limping with each step. 

Eddie and I huddled close together, staring back at him as he hurried across 
the empty parking lot. His white hair tumbled out from under a small gray cap. 
The overcoat hung down nearly to his ankles and bulged over his skinny frame. 

He stepped up in front of us and waited to catch his breath. His tiny eyes 
caught the moonlight as he narrowed them at us, studying Eddie, then me. 

“Are you the two kids that bus driver was looking for?” he asked in a shrill, 
high voice. He had a different accent from Mr. Starkes’. I think it was Scottish. 

Eddie and I nodded. 

“Well, I’m the night guard here,” the man told us. “There’s no one here but 
me after closing.” 

“Uh... where is our bus?” Eddie asked quietly. 

“It left,” the man replied sharply. “He searched all over for you. But he 
couldn’t wait any longer. What happened? Did you get lost in there?” He 
motioned back toward the Tower. 

“A man chased us,” Eddie replied breathlessly. “He said we had to come 
with him. He was really scary, and—” 

“Man? What man?” The night guard eyed us suspiciously. 

“The man in the black cape!” I replied. “And the black hat. He chased us. In 
the Tower.” 

“There’s no man in the tower,” the guard replied, shaking his head. “I told 
you. I’m the only one here after closing.” 

“But he’s in there!” I cried. “He chased us! He was going to hurt us! He 
chased us through the sewer and the rats—” 

“Sewer? What were you two doing in the sewer?” the guard demanded. 
“We have rules here about where tourists are allowed. If you break the rules, we 
can’t be responsible.” 

He sighed. “Now you come out here with a wild story about a man in a 
black cape. And running through the sewers. Wild stories. Wild stories.” 

Eddie and I exchanged glances. We could both see that this man wasn’t 



going to believe us. 

“How do we get back to our hotel?” Eddie asked. “Our parents will be 
really worried.” 

I glanced at the street. There were no cars or buses in sight. 

“Do you have any money?” the guard asked, replacing his cap. “There’s a 
phone box on the corner. I can call for a taxi.” 

I reached into my jeans pocket and felt the heavy coins my parents had 
given me before Eddie and I set out on the tour. Then I breathed a long sigh of 
relief. 

“We have money,” I told the guard. 

“It’ll cost you at least fifteen or twenty pounds from way out here,” he 
warned. 

“That’s okay,” I replied. “Our parents gave us British money. If we don’t 
have enough, my parents will pay the driver.” 

He nodded. Then he turned to Eddie. “You look all done in, lad. Did you 
get frightened up in that tower?” 

Eddie swallowed hard. “I just want to get back to our hotel,” he murmured. 

The guard nodded. Then, tucking his hands into the pockets of the big 
overcoat, he led the way to the phone booth. 

The black taxi pulled up about ten minutes later. The driver was a young man 
with long, wavy blond hair. “What hotel?” he asked, leaning out the passenger 
window. 

“The Barclay,” I told him. 

Eddie and I climbed into the back. It was warm in the taxi. It felt so great to 
sit down! 

As we pulled away from the Terror Tower, I didn’t glance back. I never 
wanted to see that old castle again. 

The car rolled smoothly through the dark streets. The taxi meter clicked 
pleasantly. The driver hummed to himself. 

I shut my eyes and leaned my head back against the leather seat. I tried not 
to think about the frightening man who had chased us in the Tower. But I 
couldn’t force him from my mind. 

Soon we were back in the center of London. Cars and taxis jammed the 
streets. We passed brightly lit theaters and restaurants. 

The taxi pulled up to the front of the Barclay Hotel and eased to a stop. The 



driver slid open the window behind his seat and turned to me. “That’ll be fifteen 
pounds, sixty pence.” 

Eddie sat up drowsily. He blinked several times, surprised to see that we 
had reached our destination. 

I pulled the big, heavy coins from my pocket. I held them up to the driver. 
“I don’t really know what is what,” I confessed. “Can you take the right amount 
from these?” 

The driver glanced at the coins in my hands, sniffed, then raised his eyes to 
me. “What are those?” he asked coldly. 

“Coins,” I replied. I didn’t know what else to say. “Do I have enough to pay 
you?” 

He stared back at me. “Do you have any real money? Or are you going to 
pay me with play money?” 

“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered. My hand started to tremble, and I 
nearly dropped the coins. 

“I don’t either,” the driver replied sharply. “But I do know that those aren’t 
real coins. We use British pounds here, miss.” 

His expression turned angry. He glared at me through the little window in 
the glass partition. “Now, are you going to pay me in British pounds, or are we 
going to have some major trouble? I want my money—now!” 



13 


I pulled the coins away from him and raised them close to my face. It was dark 
in the back of the taxi, and hard to see. 

The coins were large and round. They felt heavy, made of real gold or 
silver. It was too dark to read the words on them. 

“Why would my parents give me play money?” I asked the driver. 

He shrugged. “I don’t know your parents.” 

“Well, they will pay you the fifteen pounds,” I told him. I struggled to 
shove the big coins back into my pocket. 

“Fifteen pounds, sixty—plus tip,” the driver said, frowning at me. “Where 
are your parents? In the hotel?” 

I nodded. “Yes. They were at a meeting in the hotel. But they’re probably 
up in the room now. We’ll get them to come down and pay you.” 

“In real money, if you please,” the driver said, rolling his eyes. “If they’re 
not down here in five minutes, I’ll come in after you.” 

“They’ll be right down. I promise,” I told him. 

I pushed open the door and scrambled out of the cab. Eddie followed me 
onto the sidewalk, shaking his head. “This is weird,” he muttered. 

A red-uniformed doorman held the hotel door open for us, and we hurried 
into the huge, chandeliered lobby. Most people seemed to be heading the other 
way, going out for dinner, I guessed. 

My stomach grumbled. I suddenly realized I was starving. 

Eddie and I made our way past the long front desk. We were walking so 
fast, we nearly collided with a bellman pushing a big cart stacked high with 
suitcases. 

To our right, I could hear dishes clattering in the hotel restaurant. The 
aroma of fresh-baked bread floated in the air. 

The elevator doors opened. A red-haired woman in a fur coat stepped off, 
walking a white toy poodle. Eddie got tangled in the leash. I had to pull him free 
so we wouldn’t miss the elevator. 

We stumbled into the elevator. As the doors slid shut, I pushed Six. “What 
was wrong with that money?” Eddie asked. 

I shrugged. “I don’t know. I guess Dad made a mistake.” 



The doors slid open on six, and we hurried side by side down the long, 
carpeted hall to our room. 

I stepped around a room service tray on the floor. Someone had left half a 
sandwich and part of a bowl of fruit. My stomach rumbled again, reminding me 
how hungry I was. 

“Here we are.” Eddie ran up to the door to room 626 and knocked. “Hey, 
Mom! Dad! It’s us!” 

“Open up!” I called impatiently. 

Eddie knocked again, a little louder. “Hey—!” 

We pressed our ears close to the door and listened. 

Silence. No footsteps. No voices. 

“Hey—are you in there?” Eddie called. He knocked again. “Hurry up! It’s 

us!” 

He turned to me. “They must be out of that meeting by now,” he muttered. 

I cupped my hands around my mouth. “Mom? Dad? Are you there?” I 
called in. 

No reply. 

Eddie’s shoulders slumped, and he let out an unhappy sigh. “Now what?” 

“Are you having trouble?” a woman’s voice asked. 

I turned to see a hotel maid. She wore a gray uniform and a small white cap 
over her short, dark hair. She had been pushing a cart loaded with towels. She 
stopped across from Eddie and me. 

“Our parents are still at a meeting,” I told her. “My brother and I—we’re 
locked out.” 

She studied us for a moment. Then she stepped away from the cart and 
raised a large keychain filled with keys. 

“I’m not really supposed to do this,” she said, shuffling through the 
clattering keys. “But I guess it’s okay to let you kids in.” 

She put a key into the lock, turned it, and pushed open the door for us. 
Eddie and I both thanked her and told her she was a lifesaver. She smiled and 
moved on down the hall, pushing her towel cart. 

The room was dark. I clicked on the light as Eddie and I stepped in. 

“They’re not here,” I said softly. “No sign of them.” 

“They probably left a note,” Eddie replied. “Maybe they had to go out with 
people from the meeting. Or maybe they’re down in the restaurant, waiting for 



Our room was actually a suite. A front room and two bedrooms. 

Turning on lights as I went, I made my way to the desk in the corner. A 
writing pad and pen rested in the center of the desk. But the pad was blank. No 
message. 

No message from Mom or Dad on the bedtable, either. 

“That’s weird,” Eddie muttered. 

I crossed the room and stepped into their bedroom. I clicked on the ceiling 
light and glanced around. 

The room had been made up. The bed was smooth and unwrinkled. There 
was no message for us anywhere. The dressertop lay bare. No clothes tossed 
over a chair. No shoes on the floor. No briefcases or notepads from their 
meeting. 

No sign that anyone had even been in the room. 

I turned and saw that Eddie had moved to the closet. He pushed the sliding 
door open all the way. 

“Sue, look!” he shouted. “No clothes! Mom’s and Dad’s clothes—our 
clothes—they’re all gone!” 

A heavy feeling of dread started in my stomach and weighted down my 
entire body. “What is going on here?” I cried. 



14 


“They wouldn’t just leave!” I exclaimed. I walked over to the closet and checked 
it out for myself. I don’t know what I expected to see. It was clear from across 
the room that the closet was completely empty. 

“Are you sure we’re in the right room?” Eddie asked. He pulled open the 
top dresser drawer. Empty. 

“Of course this is the right room,” I replied impatiently. 

Eddie pulled out the rest of the dresser drawers. They were all empty. 

We searched every inch of the room. No sign of Mom or Dad. 

“We’d better go down to the desk,” I suggested, thinking hard. “We’ll find 
out what room the meeting is being held in. Then we’ll go there and talk to Mom 
and Dad.” 

“I can’t believe they’re still at the meeting,” Eddie murmured, shaking his 
head. “And why would they pack up and take all our clothes to the meeting with 
them?” 

“I’m sure there’s a good answer,” I said. “Come on. Let’s go downstairs.” 

We made our way back down the long hall and took the elevator to the 
lobby. 

We found a crowd around the front desk. A large woman, dressed in a green 
pantsuit, was arguing angrily about her room. “I was promised a view of the 
river,” she screamed at the red-faced man behind the desk. “And I want a view 
of the river!” 

“But, madam,” he replied softly, “the hotel is not located near the river. We 
do not have any river views from this hotel.” 

“I must have a river view!” the woman insisted. “I have it right here in 
writing!” She flashed a sheet of paper in front of the man’s face. 

The argument continued for a few minutes more. I quickly lost interest in it. 
I thought about Mom and Dad. I wondered where they were. I wondered why 
they hadn’t left us a note or a message. 

Eddie and I finally got up to the desk about ten minutes later. The clerk 
tucked some papers into a file, then turned to us with an automatic smile. “Can I 
help you?” 

“We’re trying to find our parents,” I said, leaning my elbows on the desk. 



“They’re in the meeting, I think. Can you tell us where the meeting is?” 

He stared at me for a long moment, his face blank, as if he didn’t 
understand. “What meeting is that?” he asked finally. 

I thought hard. I couldn’t remember what the meeting was called. Or what it 
was about. 

“It’s the big meeting,” I replied uncertainly. “The one people came from all 
over the world for.” 

He twisted his mouth into a thoughtful pout. “Hmmm...” 

“Avery big meeting,” Eddie chimed in. 

“We have a problem,” the clerk said, frowning. He scratched his right ear. 
“There aren’t any meetings in the hotel this week.” 

I stared back at him. My mouth dropped open. I started to say something, 
but the words just didn’t come out. 

“No meetings?” Eddie asked weakly. 

The clerk shook his head. “No meetings.” 

A young woman called to him from the office. He signaled to me that he’d 
be right back. Then he hurried over to see what she wanted. 

“Are we in the right hotel?” Eddie whispered to me. I could see the worry 
tighten his features. 

“Of course,” I said sharply. “Why do you keep asking me these dumb 
questions? I’m not an idiot, you know. Why do you keep asking, is this the right 
room? Is this the right hotel?” 

“Because nothing makes sense,” he muttered. 

I started to reply, but the clerk returned to the desk. “May I ask your room 
number?” he demanded, scratching his ear again. 

“Six twenty-six,” I told him. 

He punched several keys on his computer keyboard, then squinted at the 
green monitor. “I’m sorry. That room is vacant,” he said. 

“What?” I cried. 

The clerk studied me, narrowing his eyes. “There is no one in room 626 at 
the present,” he repeated. 

“But we are!” Eddie cried. 

The clerk forced a smile to his face. He raised both hands, as if to say, 
“Let’s all remain calm.” 

“We will find your parents,” he told us, leaving the smile frozen on his face. 
He punched a few computer keys. “Now, what is your last name?” 



I opened my mouth to answer. But no answer came to my mind. 

I glanced at Eddie. His face was knitted in concentration. 

“What is your last name, kids?” the clerk repeated. “If your parents are in 
the hotel, I’m sure we can track them down for you. But I need to know your last 
name.” 

I stared blankly at him. 

I had a strange, tingly feeling that started at the back of my neck and ran all 
the way down my body. I suddenly felt as if I couldn’t breathe, as if my heart 
had stopped. 

My last name. My last name... 

Why couldn’t I remember my last name? 

I could feel my body start to shake. Tears brimmed in my eyes. 

This was so upsetting! 

My name is Sue, I told myself. Sue... Sue... what? 

Shaking, tears running down my cheeks, I grabbed Eddie by the shoulders. 
“Eddie,” I demanded, “what’s our last name?” 

“I—I don’t know!” he sobbed. 

“Oh, Eddie!” I pulled my brother close and hugged him. “What’s wrong 
with us? What’s wrong with us?” 



15 


“We have to stay calm,” I told my brother. “If we take a deep breath and just 
relax, I’m sure we’ll be able to remember.” 

“I guess you’re right,” Eddie replied uncertainly. He stared straight ahead. 
He was gritting his teeth, trying hard not to cry. 

It was a few minutes later. The desk clerk had suggested that we go to the 
hotel restaurant. He promised he’d try to find our parents while we ate. 

That suggestion was fine with Eddie and me. We were both starving! 

We sat at a small table in the back of the restaurant. I gazed around the big, 
elegant room. Crystal chandeliers cast sparkling light over the well-dressed 
diners. On a small balcony overlooking the room, a string quartet played 
classical music. 

Eddie tapped his hands nervously on the white tablecloth. I kept picking up 
the heavy silverware and twirling it in my hand. 

The tables all around us were filled with laughing, happy people. Three 
children at the next table, very dressed up, were singing a song in French to their 
smiling parents. 

Eddie leaned over the table and whispered to me. “How are we going to pay 
for the food? Our money isn’t any good.” 

“We can charge it to the room,” I replied. “When we figure out what room 
we’re in.” Eddie nodded and slouched back in his high-backed chair. 

A waiter in a black tuxedo appeared beside the table. He smiled at Eddie 
and me. “Welcome to the Barclay,” he said. “And what may I bring you this 
evening?” 

“Could we see a menu?” I asked. 

“There is no menu right now,” the waiter replied, without changing his 
smile. “We are still serving tea.” 

“Only tea?” Eddie cried. “No food?” 

The waiter chuckled. “Our high tea includes sandwiches, scones, croissants, 
and an assortment of pastries.” 

“Yes. We’ll have that,” I told him. 

He gave a quick bow of his head, turned, and headed toward the kitchen. 

“At least we’ll get something to eat,” I murmured. 



Eddie didn’t seem to hear me. He kept glancing at the doorway at the front 
of the restaurant. I knew he was looking for Mom and Dad. 

“Why can’t we remember our last name?” he asked glumly. 

“I don’t know,” I confessed. “I’m very confused.” 

Every time I started to think about it, I felt dizzy. I kept telling myself I was 
just hungry. You’ll remember after you’ve had something to eat, I kept repeating. 

The waiter brought a tray of tiny sandwiches, cut into triangles. I 
recognized egg salad and tunafish. I didn’t know what the others were. 

But Eddie and I didn’t care. We started devouring the sandwiches as soon as 
the waiter set them down. 

We drank two cups of tea. Then our next tray arrived with scones and 
croissants. We loaded them up with butter and strawberry jam, and gobbled them 
down hungrily. 

“Maybe if we tell the man at the front desk what Mom and Dad look like, 
he can help us find them,” Eddie suggested. He grabbed the last croissant before 
I could get it. 

“Good idea,” I said. 

Then I let out a silent gasp. I had the dizzy feeling again. 

“Eddie,” I said, “I can’t remember what Mom and Dad look like!” 

He let the croissant fall from his hand. “I can’t either,” he murmured, 
lowering his head. “This is crazy, Sue! ” 

I shut my eyes. “Shhh. Just try to picture them,” I urged. “Force away all 
other thoughts. Concentrate. Try to picture then.” 

“I—I can’t!” Eddie stammered. I could hear the panic in his high-pitched 
voice. “Something is wrong, Sue. Something is very wrong with us.” 

I swallowed hard. I opened my eyes. I couldn’t conjure up any kind of 
picture of my parents. 

I tried thinking about Mom. Was she blond? Red-haired? Black-haired? 
Was she tall? Short? Thin? Fat? 

I couldn’t remember. 

“Where do we live?” Eddie wailed. “Do we live in a house? I can’t picture 
it, Sue. I can’t picture it at all.” 

His voice cracked. I could see he was having trouble holding back the tears. 

Panic choked my throat. I suddenly felt as if I couldn’t breathe. I stared at 
Eddie and couldn’t say a word. 

What could I say? 



My brain spun like a tornado. “We’ve lost our memory,” I finally uttered. 
“At least, part of our memory.” 

“How?” Eddie demanded in a trembling voice. “How could that happen to 
both of us?” 

I clasped my hands tightly in my lap. My hands were as cold as ice. “At 
least we still remember some things,” I said, trying not to despair completely. 

“We still remember our first names,” Eddie replied. “But not our last. And 
what else do we remember?” 

“We remember our room number,” I said. “Six twenty-six.” 

“But the desk clerk said we don’t belong in that room!” Eddie cried. 

“And we remember why we came to London,” I continued. “Because Mom 
and Dad had these important meetings.” 

“But there are no meetings at the hotel!” Eddie exclaimed. “Our memories 
are wrong, Sue. They’re all wrong!” 

I insisted on figuring out what we did remember. I had the feeling if I could 
list what we did remember, we wouldn’t feel so upset about what we had 
forgotten. 

I knew it was a crazy idea. But I didn’t know what else to do. 

“I remember the tour we took today,” I said. “I remember everywhere we 
went in London. I remember Mr. Starkes. I remember—” 

“What about yesterday?” Eddie interrupted. “What did we do yesterday, 
Sue?” 

I started to reply, but my breath caught in my throat. 

I couldn’t remember yesterday! 

Or the day before. Or the day before that. 

“Oh, Eddie,” I moaned, raising my hands to my cheeks, “something is 
terribly wrong.” 

Eddie didn’t seem to hear me. His eyes were locked on the front of the 
restaurant. 

I followed his gaze—and saw the slender, blond-haired man step into the 
room. 

The taxi driver. 

We had forgotten all about him! 



16 


I jumped up. The napkin fell off my lap, onto my shoe. I kicked it away and 
reached down to tug Eddie’s arm. “Come on—let’s get out of here.” 

Eddie gazed up at me uncertainly, then back at the taxi driver. The taxi 
driver had stopped just past the entrance. His eyes were searching each table. 

“Hurry,” I whispered. “He hasn’t seen us yet.” 

“But maybe we should just explain to him—” Eddie said. 

“Huh? Explain what?” I shot back. “That we can’t pay him because we lost 
our memory and don’t know our name? I really don’t think he’ll buy that—do 
you?” 

Eddie twisted his face in a frown. “Okay. How do we get out of here?” he 
demanded. 

The front door was blocked by the taxi driver. But I spotted a glass door on 
the back wall near our table. 

The door had a filmy, white curtain over it and a small sign that read: NO 
EXIT. 

But I didn’t care. Eddie and I had no choice. We had to leave—fast! 

I grabbed the knob and pulled the door open. Eddie and I slipped through, 
then tugged the door shut behind us. 

“I don’t think he saw us,” I whispered. “I think we’re okay.” 

We turned away from the door and found ourselves in a long, dark hallway. 
This must be an area used by the hotel workers, I thought. The floor had no 
carpet. The walls were dirty, stained, and unpainted. 

We turned a corner. I held out a hand to stop Eddie. 

We listened hard for footsteps. Had the taxi driver seen us duck out? Was he 
coming after us? 

I couldn’t hear a thing over the pounding of my heart. “What a horrible 
day!” I wailed. 

And then the day turned even more horrible. 

The man in the black cape stepped out from around the corner. “Did you 
really think I wouldn’t follow you?” he asked. “Did you really think you could 
escape from me?” 



17 


He moved forward quickly, his face hidden in the shadows. 

Eddie and I were trapped, our backs pressed against the curtained, glass 

door. 

As the caped man drew near, his features came into view. His eyes were 
dark and cold. His mouth was locked in a menacing snarl. 

He raised his palm to Eddie. “Give them back,” he demanded. 

Eddie’s eyes bulged in surprise. “Huh? Give what back?” he cried. 

The caped man kept his palm in front of Eddie’s face. “Give them back— 
now!” he bellowed. “Do not play games with me.” 

Eddie’s expression slowly changed. He glanced at me, then turned back to 
the caped man. “If I give them back, will you let us go?” 

I was totally confused. Give what back? What was Eddie talking about? 

The caped man uttered a short, dry laugh. It sounded more like a cough. 
“Do you dare to bargain with me?” he asked my brother. 

“Eddie—what is he talking about?” I cried. 

But Eddie didn’t reply. He kept his eyes locked on the shadowy face of the 
caped man. “If I give them back, will you let us go?” 

“Hand them back—now,” the big man replied sharply, leaning menacingly 
over Eddie. 

Eddie sighed. He reached into his pants pocket. And to my shock, he pulled 
out the three smooth, white stones. 

My brother the pickpocket had struck again. “Eddie—when did you take 
those?” I demanded. 

“In the sewer,” Eddie replied. “When he grabbed me.” 

“But, why?” I asked. 

Eddie shrugged. “I don’t know. They seemed important to him. So I thought 

“They are important!” the caped man bellowed. He grabbed the stones from 
Eddie’s hand. 

“Now will you let us go?” Eddie cried. 

“Yes. We will go now,” the man replied, concentrating on the stones. 



“That’s not what I said!” Eddie exclaimed. “Will you let us go?” 

The man ignored him. He piled the stones one on top of the other in his 
palm. Then he chanted some words, words in a foreign language that I didn’t 
recognize. 

As soon as he chanted the words, the hallway began to shimmer. The doors 
began to wiggle and bend, as if made of rubber. The floor buckled and swayed. 

The caped man began to shimmer and bend, too. 

The hallway throbbed with a blinding, white light. 

I felt a sharp stab of pain—as if I had been hit hard in the stomach. 

I couldn’t breathe. 

Everything went black. 



18 


Flickering orange light broke the darkness. 

I opened my eyes. Blinked several times. Took a deep breath. 

The caped man was gone. 

“Eddie—are you okay?” I asked in a quivering voice. 

“I—I think so,” he stammered. 

I gazed down the long hall, startled to find it lit by flickering candles. A 
candle was perched in a holder beside each door. 

“Sue, how did we get in this hallway?” Eddie asked softly. “Where is the 
caped man?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied. “I’m as confused as you are.” 

We stepped into the flickering light. “This has to be the old section of the 
hotel,” I guessed. “They must want it to look old-fashioned.” 

We walked past door after door. The long, narrow hallway was silent except 
for the thud of our shoes on the hardwood floor. The doors were all closed. No 
other people in sight. 

The flickering candlelight, the dark doorways, the eerie silence—all gave 
me a cold, tingly feeling. My entire body trembled. 

We kept walking through the dim, orangey light. 

“I—I want to go back to the room,” Eddie stammered as we turned another 
corner. “Maybe Mom and Dad have come back. Maybe they’re waiting for us up 
there.” 

“Maybe,” I replied doubtfully. 

We entered another silent hallway, glowing eerily in darting, dancing 
candlelight. “There’s got to be an elevator down here somewhere,” I muttered. 

But we passed only dark, closed doors. 

Turning another corner, we nearly bumped into a group of people. 

“Ohh!” I cried out, so startled to find others in these long, empty hallways. 

I stared at them as they passed. They wore long robes, and their faces were 
hidden under dark hoods. I couldn’t tell if they were men or women. 

They moved silently, making no sound at all. They paid no attention to 
Eddie or me. 



“Uh... can you tell us where the elevator is?” Eddie called after them. 

They didn’t turn back, didn’t reply. 

“Sirs?” Eddie called, chasing after them. “Please! Have you seen the 
elevator?” 

One of them turned back toward Eddie. The others continued moving 
silently down the hallway, their long robes swishing softly. 

I stepped up beside my brother and the robed figure. I could see the face 
under the hood. An old man with bushy white eyebrows. 

He peered out at Eddie, then at me. His eyes were dark and wet. His 
expression was sorrowful. 

“I smell evil around you,” he croaked in a dry whisper. 

“What?” I cried. “My brother and I—” 

“Do not leave the abbey,” the old man instructed. “I smell evil around you. 
Your time is near. So near. So very near...” 



19 


“What abbey?” I demanded. “Why are you saying that?” 

The old man didn’t reply. The candlelight glowed in his watery eyes. He 
nodded his head solemnly under the heavy hood. Then he turned away from us 
and glided silently after the others, the hem of his robe sweeping along the bare 
floor. 

“What did he mean?” Eddie demanded when the hooded man had vanished 
around a corner. “Why did he try to frighten us?” 

I shook my head. “It had to be some kind of a joke,” I replied. “They’re 
probably on their way to a party or something.” 

Eddie frowned thoughtfully. “They were creepy, Sue. They didn’t look like 
they were in a party mood to me.” 

I sighed. “Let’s find the elevator and get up to the room. I don’t like this old 
part of the hotel. It’s just too dark and scary.” 

“Hey, I’m the one who gets scared,” Eddie said, following me down the 
hall. “You’re supposed to be the brave one—remember?” 

We wandered down one long, candlelit hallway after another, feeling more 
and more lost. We couldn’t find an elevator or stairs or any kind of exit. 

“Are we going to walk forever?” Eddie whined. “There has to be a way out 
of here—doesn’t there?” 

“Let’s go back,” I suggested. “The taxi driver is probably gone by now. 
Let’s go back the way we came, and go out through the restaurant.” 

Eddie pushed his dark hair back off his forehead. “Good idea,” he muttered. 

We turned and started the long walk back. It was easy to keep in the right 
direction. We followed the hallways and made left turns instead of rights. 

We walked quickly without speaking. 

As we walked, I tried to remember our last name. Tried to remember Mom 
and Dad. Tried to picture their faces. 

Tried to remember something about them. 

Losing your memory is so terrifying. Much more frightening than being 
chased by someone. 

That’s because the problem is inside you. Inside your own mind. 

You can’t run away from it. You can’t hide from it. And you can’t solve it. 



You just feel so helpless. 

My only hope was that Mom and Dad would be waiting in the room. And 
that they could explain to Eddie and me what had happened to our memories. 
“Oh, no!” Eddie cried, startling me from my thoughts. 

We had reached the end of the final hallway. The hotel restaurant should be 
on the other side of the curtained glass door. 

But there was no door. 

No door back to the restaurant. No door at all. 

Eddie and I were staring at a solid wall. 



20 


“No!” Eddie wailed. “Let us out! Let us out of here!” He pounded furiously on 
the wall with his fist. 

I tugged him away. “This must be the wrong hallway,” I told him. “We 
made a wrong turn.” 

“No!” he protested. “It’s the right hallway! I know it is!” 

“Then where is the restaurant?” I replied. “They didn’t seal it up while we 
were walking the halls just now.” 

He stared up at me, his chin trembling, his dark eyes frightened. “Can’t we 
go outside and walk around to the front?” he asked wearily. 

“We could,” I replied thoughtfully. “If we could find a door that led to the 
outside. But so far—” 

I stopped when I heard voices. 

I turned and saw a narrow hallway leading off to our right. The voices 
seemed to be floating through this hall I hadn’t noticed before. Voices and 
laughter. 

“That must be the restaurant down there,” I told Eddie. “See? We just had 
one more turn to make. We’ll be out of here in a few seconds.” 

His face brightened a little. 

The voices and laughter grew louder as we made our way down the narrow 
corridor. Bright yellow light shone out from an open doorway at the end. 

As we stepped into the doorway, we both cried out in surprise. 

This was not the hotel restaurant we had our tea in. 

I grabbed Eddie’s arm as I stared in shock around the enormous room. Two 
blazing fireplaces provided the only light. People in strange costumes sat on low 
benches around long, wooden tables. 

A whole deer or an elk was turning on a spit, roasting over a fire in the 
center of the floor. 

The tables were piled high with food—meats, whole cabbages, green 
vegetables, fruits, whole potatoes, and foods I didn’t recognize. 

I didn’t see any plates or serving platters. The food was just strewn over the 
long tables. People reached in and pulled out what they wanted. 

They ate noisily, talking loudly, laughing and singing, taking long drinks 



from metal wine cups, slapping the cups on the tabletop and toasting each other 
merrily. 

“They’re all eating with their hands]” Eddie exclaimed. 

He was right. I didn’t see any silverware at the tables. 

Two chickens, squawking loudly, fluttered across the floor, chased by a 
large brown dog. A woman had two babies in her lap. She ignored them while 
she chewed on a large hunk of meat. 

“It’s a costume party,” I whispered to Eddie. We hadn’t the nerve to move 
from the doorway. “This must be where those guys in the hoods were going.” 

I gazed in amazement at the colorful costumes in the room. Long robes, 
loose-fitting pajama-type outfits of blue and green, leather vests worn over black 
tights. A lot of men and women wore animal furs around their shoulders— 
despite the blazing heat from the fireplaces. 

In one corner, a man appeared to be wearing an entire bearskin. He stood 
beside a giant wooden barrel, working a spigot, filling metal cups with a thick, 
brown liquid that oozed from the barrel. 

Two children in rags played tag under one of the long tables. Another child, 
dressed in green tights, chased after one of the squawking chickens. 

“What a party!” Eddie whispered. “Who are these people?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know. I can’t understand what they’re saying too well. 
Can you?” 

Eddie shook his head. “Their accents are too weird.” 

“But maybe someone in here can tell us how to get outside,” I suggested. 

“Let’s try,” Eddie pleaded. 

I led the way into the room. Even though I was walking slowly, timidly, I 
nearly tripped over a sleeping hound dog. 

Eddie followed close behind as I made my way up to one of the men 
turning the roasting deer on the spit. He wore only knee breeches of some rough 
brown cloth. His forehead and the top of his body glistened with sweat. 

“Excuse me, sir,” I said. 

He glanced up at me and his eyes bulged wide in surprise. 

“Excuse me,” I repeated. “Can you tell us how to get out of the hotel?” 

He stared at me without replying, stared as if he had never seen a twelve- 
year-old girl in jeans and a T-shirt before. 

Two little girls, wearing gray dresses down to the floor, walked up to Eddie 
and me, staring up at us with the same shocked expression as the man. Their 



streaky blond hair fell wild and tangled behind their backs. It looked as if it had 
never been brushed in their lives! 

They pointed at us and giggled. 

And I suddenly realized that the entire room had grown silent. 

As if someone had turned a knob and clicked off the sound. 

My heart started to pound. The strong smell of the roasting deer choked my 
nostrils. 

I turned to find everyone in the room gaping in open-mouthed wonder. 
Staring in silence at Eddie and me. 

“I—I’m sorry to interrupt the party,” I stammered in a tiny, frightened 
voice. 

I let out a cry of surprise as they all climbed noisily to their feet. Food 
toppled off the table. One of the long benches clattered to the floor. 

More children pointed and giggled. 

Even the chickens seemed to stop clucking and strutting. 

And then an enormous red-faced man in a long white gown raised his hand 
and pointed at Eddie and me. “It’s THEM!” he bellowed. “It’s THEM!” 



21 


“Do they know us?” Eddie whispered to me. 

We stared back at them. Everyone seemed to freeze in place. The man 
stopped turning the deer on the spit. The only sound in the huge dining hall was 
the crackle of the fires in the twin fireplaces. 

The man in the white gown slowly lowered his hand. His face darkened to a 
bright scarlet as he gaped at us in amazement. 

“We just want to find the way out,” I said. My voice sounded tiny and 
shrill. 

No one moved. No one replied. 

I took a deep breath and tried one more time. “Can anyone help us?” 

Silence. 

Who are these strange people? I wondered. Why are they staring at us like 
that? Why won’t they answer us ? 

Eddie and I took a step back as they began to move toward us. Some of 
them were whispering excitedly, muttering to each other, gesturing with their 
hands. 

“Eddie—we’d better get out of here!” I whispered. 

I couldn’t hear what they were saying. But I didn’t like the excited 
expressions on their faces. 

And I didn’t like the way they were moving along the wall, moving to get 
behind us, to surround us. 

“Eddie—run!” I screamed. 

Angry cries rang out as we both spun around and hurtled toward the open 
doorway. Dogs barked. Children started to cry. 

We darted back into the dark hallway and kept running. 

I could still feel the heat of the fire on my face as we ran, still smell the 
tangy aroma of the roasting deer. 

Their excited, angry cries followed us through the long hall. Gasping for 
breath, I glanced back, expecting to see them chasing after us. 

But the hall was empty. 

We turned a corner and kept going. Candles flickered on both sides of us. 
The floorboards groaned under our shoes. 



The eerie, dim light. The voices far behind us. The endless tunnel of a 
hallway. All made me feel as if I were running through a dream. 

We turned another corner and kept running. 

The misty candlelight blurred as I ran. I’m floating through a dark orange 
cloud, I thought. 

Do these empty, candlelit halls ever end? 

Eddie and I both cried out happily as a door appeared in front of us. 

A door we had never seen before. 

It has to lead to the outside! I told myself. 

We raced to the door. We didn’t slow down as we reached it. 

I stuck out both hands. Pushed hard. 

The door flew open. 

And we stepped out into bright sunlight. 

Outside! We had escaped from the dark maze of the hotel corridors! 

It took a few seconds for the harsh white glare to fade from my eyes. 

I blinked several times. Then I gazed up and down the street. 

“Oh, no!” I wailed, grabbing my brother’s arm. “No! Eddie—what has 
happened ?” 



22 


“It—it’s daytime!” Eddie stammered. 

But the bright sunlight wasn’t the only shock. 

Everything had changed. 

I felt as if I were watching a movie, and the scene had changed. And 
suddenly it was the next day—or the next week—and I was seeing an entirely 
different place. 

I knew that only a few seconds had passed since Eddie and I had burst out 
of the hotel. But in that time, everything had changed. 

We huddled close together and stared in one direction and then the next. We 
saw no cars. No buses. The street had vanished, replaced by a lumpy dirt road. 

The tall buildings had disappeared, too. The road was dotted with small, 
white cottages with flat roofs and low, wooden shacks built without doors or 
windows. 

A tall mound of straw stood beside the nearest cottage. Chickens clucked 
and strutted across the road or stood in front of cottages pecking in the dirt. A 
brown cow poked its head out from behind the mound of straw. 

“What’s going on?” Eddie asked. “Where are we?” 

“It’s like we stepped back in time,” I said in a hushed voice. “Eddie—look 
at the people.” 

Two men walked by carrying lines of slender, silvery fish. The men had 
thick beards and wild, unbrushed hair. They wore loose-fitting gray smocks that 
dragged along the ground. 

Two women in long, brown dresses were on their knees, pulling up root- 
type vegetables with their hands. A man leading a scrawny horse, its bones 
sticking out at its rib cage, stopped to say something to the two women. 

“They look a lot like the people in the hotel,” I told Eddie. 

Thinking about the hotel made me turn around. “Oh, no!” I grabbed Eddie 
and made him turn around. 

The hotel was gone. 

In its place stood a long, low building built of brown stone. It appeared to 
be some sort of inn or meeting hall. 

“I don’t understand this,” Eddie moaned. In the bright sunlight, he looked 



very pale. He scratched his dark brown hair. “Sue, we’ve got to get back to the 
hotel. I—I’m very mixed up.” 

“Me, too,” I confessed. 

I took a few steps along the dirt road. It must have rained recently. The road 
was soft and muddy. 

I could hear cows mooing nearby. 

This is downtown London! I told myself. How can I hear cows in 
downtown London? Where are all the tall buildings? The cars and taxis and 
double-decker buses? 

I heard someone whistling. A blond-haired boy, dressed in an outfit made of 
black and brown rags, appeared from behind the long building. He carried a 
bundle of sticks in his arms. 

He seemed about my age. My shoes sank into the mud as I hurried across 
the road to him. “Hey—!” I called. “Hi!” 

He peered over the bundle of sticks at me. His blue eyes widened in 
surprise. His hair was long and unbrushed. It fluttered over his shoulders in the 
breeze. “Good day to you, miss,” he said. His accent was so strange, I could 
barely understand him. 

“Good day,” I replied uncertainly. 

“Are ye a traveler?” the boy asked, shifting the bundle onto his shoulder. 

“Yes,” I replied. “But my brother and I are lost. We can’t find our hotel.” 

He narrowed his blue eyes at me. He appeared to be thinking hard. 

“Our hotel,” I repeated. “Can you tell us where it is? The Barclay?” 

“Barclay?” he repeated the word. “Hotel?” 

“Yes,” I said. I waited for him to reply. But he just stared back at me, 
squinting his blue eyes and frowning. 

“I do not know those foreign words,” he said finally. 

“Hotel?” I cried impatiently. “You know. A place where travelers stay?” 

“Many stay at the abbey,” he replied. He pointed to the long, low building 
behind us. 

“No. I mean—” I started. I could see that he didn’t understand me at all. 

“I must be getting the wood along home,” the boy said. He nodded good¬ 
bye, lowered the bundle from his shoulder, and headed down the road. 

“Eddie, that boy—” I said. “He doesn’t know what a hotel is! Do you 
believe—?” 


I turned back. “Eddie?” 



Eddie was gone. 



23 


“Eddie? Eddie?” 

My voice grew higher and more frightened as I called his name. 

Where did he go? 

“Hey—Eddie!” I shouted. 

The two women glanced up from their vegetable picking. 

“Did you see where my brother went?” I called to them. 

They shook their heads and returned to their work. 

“Oh!” I had to jump out of the road as a cart, pulled by a groaning, grunting 
ox, came barreling past. The driver, a fat, bare-chested man, his pouchy skin 
darkened by the sun, slapped the ropes that served as reins. He bellowed at the 
ox to move faster. 

As the wagon rolled past, its wooden wheels sank into the mud, leaving 
deep ridges in the road. 

Chickens clucked and scurried out of the way. The two women didn’t even 
glance up. 

I made my way to the entrance of the abbey. “Eddie? Are you back here?” 

I pulled open the door and peered inside. The long candlelit hall stretched 
before me. I could see men in hooded robes gathered at a doorway. 

We just came from there, I told myself as I closed the door. Eddie wouldn’t 
go back inside. 

So where was he? 

How could he run off and leave me here? How could he just disappear like 

that? 

I called his name a few more times. Then my throat tightened up. My 
mouth felt dry as cotton. “Eddie?” I called weakly. 

My legs began to tremble as I walked to the side of the first cottage. Don’t 
panic, Sue, I told myself. You’ll find him. Just don’t panic. 

Too late. 

I was really scared. 

Eddie wouldn’t suddenly wander off and go exploring without me. He was 
too scared. 



So where was he? 

I peered into the open doorway of the cottage. A sour smell floated out from 
inside. I could see a crude wooden table and a couple of wooden stools. No one 
in there. 

I made my way behind the cottage. A grassy pasture stretched up a gently 
sloping hill. Four or five cows stood halfway up the hill, their heads lowered as 
they chewed the grass. 

I cupped my hands around my mouth and called to my brother. 

My only reply was the soft mooing of a cow. 

With a worried sigh, I turned around and made my way back to the road. I 
guess I’ll have to search every cottage, I decided. Eddie couldn’t have gone very 
far. 

I had only taken a few steps toward the next cottage when a shadow slid 
over the road. 

Startled, I raised my eyes—and stared at the dark figure blocking my path. 

His black cape fluttered behind him in the wind. He wore a new black hat, 
and his pale, pale face poked out from its dark brim. 



24 


I stepped back, out of his shadow. I raised my hands to my cheeks and stared at 
him in horrified silence. 

“I said it was time for us to go,” he said softly, moving closer. 

“Wh-where is Eddie?” I managed to choke out. “Do you know where Eddie 

is?” 

A thin-lipped smile crossed his pale face. “Eddie?” He snickered. For some 
reason, my question seemed to amuse him. “Do not worry about Eddie,” he 
replied with a sneer. 

He took another step forward. His shadow fell over me again. 

It made me shiver. 

Glancing around, I saw that the two women picking vegetables had 
disappeared into their cottages. Everyone had disappeared. The road stood empty 
except for some chickens and a hound dog, asleep on its side in front of the 
straw pile. 

“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered. “Who are you? Why are you chasing 
us? Where are we?” 

My frantic questions only made him chuckle. “You know me,” he replied 
softly. 

“No!” I protested. “I don’t know you! What is happening?” 

“Your questions cannot delay your fate,” he replied. 

I stared hard at him, trying to study his face, searching for answers. But he 
lowered the brim of the black hat, hiding his eyes from view. 

“You’ve made a mistake!” I cried. “You’ve got the wrong girl! I don’t know 
you! I don’t know anything!” 

His smile faded. He shook his head. “Come with me now,” he said firmly. 

“No!” I shrieked. “Not until you tell me who you are! Not until you tell me 
where my brother is.” 

Brushing his heavy cape back, he took another step toward me. His boots 
sank heavily into the mud as he strode forward. 

“I won’t come with you!” I screamed. My hands were still pressed hard 
against my cheeks. My legs were shaking so much, I nearly sank to the ground. 

I glanced around, getting ready to run. 



Would my trembling legs carry me? 

“Do not think of running away,” he said, as if reading my mind. 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“You will come with me now. It is time,” he said. 

He strode forward quickly, raised his gloved hands, and grabbed me by both 
shoulders. 

I had no time to struggle. No time to try to break free. 

The ground started to rumble. 

I heard a groaning sound. A heavy slapping sound. 

Another oxcart bounced around the corner. I saw the driver slap the ox with 
a long rope. 

The cart moved so fast. A blur of groaning animal and grinding wheels. 

The black-caped man released his grasp and leaped back as the cart rolled 
at us. 

I saw his black hat fly off. Saw him stumble in the deep rut in the mud at 
the side of the road. Saw him stagger back off-balance. 

It was all the time I needed. I wheeled around and started to run. I bent low 
as I ran, hiding beside the grunting, straining ox. Then I turned sharply and dived 
between two small cottages. 

I caught a glimpse of the black-caped man as I darted past the cottages. He 
was bending to pick up his hat. His bald head shone like an egg in the sunlight. 
He had no hair at all. 

I was panting rapidly. My chest ached, and the blood throbbed at my 
temples. 

Keeping low, I ran along the backs of the cottages. The green pasture 
stretched to my left. Nowhere to hide there. 

The cottages grew closer together. I heard crying children. A woman was 
roasting some kind of blood-red sausage over a fire. She called out to me as I ran 
past. But I didn’t slow down to reply. 

Two scrawny black hounds came yapping after me, snapping at my legs. 
“Shoo!” I cried. “Shoo! Go home!” 

Glancing back, I could see the tall, dark figure gliding easily over the grass, 
his cape sweeping up behind him. 

He’s catching up, I realized. 

I have to find a hiding place, I told myself. Now! 

I ducked between two small shacks—and nearly ran into a large, red-haired 



woman carrying a baby. The baby was swaddled in a heavy, gray blanket. 
Startled, the woman squeezed the baby to her chest. 

“You’ve got to hide me!” I cried breathlessly. 

“Go away from here!” the woman replied. She seemed more frightened 
than unfriendly. 

“Please!” I begged. “He’s chasing me!” I pointed through the space 
between the cottages. 

We could both see the black-caped man running closer. 

“Please! Don’t let him catch me!” I pleaded. “Hide me! Hide me!” 

The woman had her eyes on the black-caped man. She turned to me and 
shrugged her broad shoulders. “I cannot,” she said. 



25 


I let out a long sigh, a sigh of defeat. I knew I couldn’t run any further. 

I knew the caped man would capture me easily. 

The woman pressed the baby against the front of her black dress and turned 
to watch the man run toward us. 

“I—I’ll pay you!” I blurted out. 

I suddenly remembered the coins in my pocket. The coins the taxi driver 
refused to take. 

Would the woman take them now? 

I shoved my hand into my pocket and pulled out the coins. “Here!” I cried. 
“Take them! Take them all! Just hide me—please!” 

I jammed the coins into the woman’s free hand. 

As she raised her hand to examine them, her eyes bulged and her mouth 
dropped open. 

She isn’t going to take them, either, I thought. She’s going to throw them 
back at me as the taxi driver did. 

But I was wrong. 

“Gold sovereigns!” she exclaimed in a hushed voice. “Gold sovereigns. I 
saw one once when I was a little lass.” 

“Will you take them? Will you hide me?” I pleaded. 

She dropped the coins into her dress. Then she shoved me through the open 
doorway of her little cottage. 

It smelled of fish inside. I saw three cots on the floor beside a bare hearth. 

“Quick—into the kindling basket,” the woman instructed. “It’s empty.” She 
pushed me again, toward a large straw box with a lid. 

My heart pounding, I pushed up the lid and scrambled inside. The lid 
dropped back down, covering me in darkness. 

On my hands and knees, I crouched on the rough straw bottom of the box. I 
struggled to stop panting, to stop my heart from thudding in my chest. 

The woman had taken the coins gladly, I realized. She didn’t think they 
were play money, as the taxi driver had said. 

The coins are very old, I decided. 



And then a chill ran down my trembling body. I suddenly knew why 
everything looked so different—so old. We really have gone back in time, I told 
myself. 

We are back in London hundreds of years ago. 

The caped man brought us back here with those white stones. He thinks I 
am someone else. He has been chasing me because he has mistaken me for 
someone else. 

How do I make him see the truth? I wondered. 

And how do I get out of the past, back to my real time? 

I forced the questions from my mind—and listened. 

I could hear voices outside the cottage. The woman’s voice. And then the 
booming, deep voice of the black-caped man. 

I held my breath so I could hear their words over the loud beating of my 
heart. 

“She is right in here, sire,” the woman said. I heard footsteps. And then 
their voices became louder. Closer. They were standing beside my basket. 

“Where is she?” the caped man demanded. 

“I put her in this box for you, sire,” the woman replied. “She’s all wrapped 
up for you. Ready for you to take her away.” 



26 


My heart jumped to my throat. In the blackness of the box, I suddenly saw red. 

That woman took my money, I thought angrily. And then she gave away my 
hiding place. 

How could she do that to me? 

I was still crouched on my hands and knees. So angry. So terrified. My 
entire body went numb, and I felt as if I would crumple to the basket floor in a 
heap. 

Taking a deep breath, I twisted around and tried to push open the straw lid. 

I let out a disappointed groan when it didn’t budge. 

Was it clasped shut? Or was the caped man holding it down? 

It didn’t matter. I was helpless. Trapped. I was his prisoner now. 

The basket suddenly moved, knocking me against its side. I could feel it 
sliding over the floor of the cottage. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. But my voice was muffled in the tiny box. I lowered 
myself to the rough straw floor, my heart pounding. “Let me out!” 

The basket bounced again. Then I felt it slide some more. 

“Lass! You—lass!” I lifted my head as I heard the woman whispering in to 
me. 

“I am so sorry,” she said. “I hope you will find it in your heart to forgive 
me. But I dare not go against the Lord High Executioner.” 

“What?” I cried. “What did you say?” 

The basket slid faster. Bumped hard. Bumped again. 

“What did you say?” I repeated frantically. 

Silence now. 

I did not hear her voice again. 

A moment later, I heard the whinny of horses. I was tossed against one side, 
then the other, as the basket was lifted up. 

Soon after, the basket began to bounce and shake. And I heard the steady 
clip-clop of horses’ hooves. 

A helpless prisoner inside the straw basket, I knew I was on some kind of 
carriage or horse cart. 



The Lord High Executioner? 

Is that what the woman had said? 

The shadowy man in the black cape and black hat—he is the Lord High 
Executioner? 

Inside my tiny, dark prison, I began to shudder. I could not stop the chills 
that rolled down my back until my entire body felt cold and numb and tingly. 

The Lord High Executioner. 

The words kept repeating and repeating in my mind. Like a terrifying chant. 
The Lord High Executioner. 

And then I asked myself: What does he want with me? 



27 


The wagon stopped with a jolt. Then, a minute or so later, started up again. 

Bouncing around inside the basket, I lost all track of time. 

Where is he taking me? I wondered. What does he plan to do? 

And: Why me? 

My head hit the front of the basket as we jolted to another stop. I shivered. 
My body was drenched in a cold sweat. 

The air in the box had become sour. I began gasping for fresh air. 

I let out a cry as the lid suddenly flew open. The harsh sunlight made me 
shield my eyes. 

“Remove her!” I heard the booming voice of the Executioner. 

Strong arms grabbed me roughly and tugged me from the straw box. As my 
eyes adjusted to the light, I saw that I was being lifted by two gray-uniformed 
soldiers. 

They set me on my feet. But my legs gave way, and I crumpled to the dirt. 

“Stand her up,” the Executioner ordered. I gazed up into the sun at him. His 
face was hidden once again in the shadow of his dark hat. 

The soldiers bent to pick me up. Both of my legs had fallen asleep. My 
back ached from being tossed and tumbled in the cramped box. 

“Let me go!” I managed to cry. “Why are you doing this?” 

The Executioner didn’t reply. 

The soldiers held on to me until I could stand on my own. 

“You’ve made a terrible mistake!” I told him, my voice trembling with 
anger, with fear. “I don’t know why I am here or how I got here! But I am the 
wrong girl! I am not who you think I am!” 

Again, he did not reply. He gave a signal with one hand, and the guards 
took my arms and turned me around. 

And as I turned away from the Executioner, away from the sun, the dark 
castle rose in front of me. I saw the wall, the courtyard, the dark, slender towers 
looming up over the stone castle. 

The Terror Tower! 

He had brought me to the Terror Tower. 



This is where Eddie and I had seen him for the first time. This is where the 
Executioner had first chased after us. 

In the twentieth century. In my time. In the time where I belonged. 
Hundreds of years in the future. 

Somehow Eddie and I had been dragged back into the past, to a time where 
we didn’t belong. And now Eddie was lost. And I was being led to the Terror 
Tower. 

The Executioner led the way. The soldiers gripped my arms firmly, pulling 
me through the courtyard toward the castle entrance. 

The courtyard was jammed with silent, grim-looking people. Dressed in 
rags and tattered, stained gowns, they stared at me as I was dragged past. 

Some of them stood hunched like scarecrows, their eyes vacant, their faces 
blank, as if their minds were somewhere else. Some sat and wept, or stared at the 
sky. 

A bare-chested old man sat under a tree frantically scratching his greasy 
tangles of white hair with both hands. A young man pressed a filthy rag against a 
deep cut in his dirt-caked foot. 

Babies cried and wailed. Men and women sat in the dirt, moaning and 
muttering to themselves. 

These sad, filthy people were all prisoners, I realized. I remembered our 
tour guide, Mr. Starkes, telling us that the castle had first been a fort, then a 
prison. 

I shook my head sadly, wishing I were back on the tour. In the future, in the 
time where I belonged. 

I didn’t have long to think about the prisoners. I was shoved into the 
darkness of the castle. Dragged up the twisting stone steps. 

The air felt wet and cold as I climbed. A heavy chill seemed to rise up the 
stairs with me. 

“Let me go!” I screamed. “Please—let me go!” 

The soldiers shoved me against the stone wall when I tried to pull free. 

I cried out helplessly and tried again to tug myself loose. But they were too 
big, too strong. 

The stone stairs curved round and around. We passed the cell on the narrow 
landing. Glancing toward it, I saw that it was jammed with prisoners. They stood 
in silence against the bars, their faces yellow and expressionless. Many of them 
didn’t even look up as I passed. 



Up the steep, slippery stairs. 

Up to the dark door at the top of the tower. 

“No—please!” I begged. “This is all wrong! All wrong!” 

But they slid the heavy metal bolt on the door and pulled the door open. 

A hard shove from behind sent me sprawling into the tiny tower room. I 
stumbled to the floor, landing on my elbows and knees. 

I heard the heavy door slam behind me. Then I heard the bolt sliding back 
into place. 

Locked in. 

I was locked in the tiny cell at the top of the Terror Tower. 

“Sue!” A familiar voice called my name. 

I raised myself to my knees. Glanced up. “Eddie!” I cried happily. “Eddie— 
how did you get here?” 

My little brother had been sitting on the floor against the wall. Now he 
scrambled over to me and helped me to my feet. “Are you okay?” he asked. 

I nodded. “Are you okay?” 

“I guess,” he replied. He had a long dirt smear down one side of his face. 
His dark hair was matted wetly against his forehead. His eyes were red-rimmed 
and frightened. 

“The caped man grabbed me,” Eddie said. “Back in the town. In the street. 
You know. When that oxcart came by.” 

I nodded. “I turned around, and you were gone.” 

“I tried to call to you,” Eddie replied. “But the caped man covered my 
mouth. He handed me to his soldiers. And they pulled me behind one of the 
cottages.” 

“This is so awful!” I cried, struggling to hold my tears back. 

“One of the soldiers lifted me onto his horse,” Eddie said. “I tried to squirm 
away. But I couldn’t. He brought me to the castle and dragged me up to the 
Tower.” 

“The caped man—he’s the Lord High Executioner,” I told my brother. 
“That’s what I heard a woman call him.” 

The words made my brother gasp. His dark eyes locked onto mine. 
“Executioner?” 

I nodded grimly. 

“But why does he want us?” Eddie demanded. “Why has he been chasing 
us? Why are we locked up in this horrible tower?” 



A sob escaped my throat. “I—I don’t know,” I stammered. 

I started to say something else—but stopped when I heard noises outside 
the door. 

Eddie and I huddled together in the center of the room. 

I heard the bolt slide open. 

The door slowly began to open. 

Someone was coming for us. 



28 


A white-haired man stepped into the room. His hair was wild and long, and fell 
in thick tangles behind his shoulders. He had a short white beard that ended in a 
sharp point. 

He wore a purple robe that flowed down to the floor. His eyes were as 
purple as his robe. They squinted first at Eddie, then lingered on me. 

“You have returned,” he said solemnly. His voice was smooth and low. His 
purple eyes suddenly revealed sadness. 

“Who are you?” I cried. “Why have you locked us in this tower?” 

“Let us out!” Eddie demanded shrilly. “Let us out of here—right now!” 

The long purple robe swept over the floor as the white-haired man moved 
toward us. He shook his head sadly, but didn’t reply. 

The cries and moans of prisoners down below floated into the tower room 
through the tiny window above our heads. Gray evening light spilled over us. 

“You do not remember me,” the man said softly. 

“Of course not!” Eddie cried. “We don’t belong here!” 

“You’ve made a bad mistake,” I told him. 

“You do not remember me,” he repeated, rubbing his pointed beard with 
one hand. “But you will.” 

He seemed gentle. Kind. Not at all like the Executioner. 

But as his strange purple eyes locked on mine, I felt a shiver of fear. This 
man was powerful, I realized. This man was dangerous. 

“Just let us go!” Eddie pleaded again. 

The man sighed. “I wish it were in my power to release you, Edward,” he 
said softly. “I wish it were in my power to release you, too, Susannah.” 

“Wait a minute.” I held up a hand to signal stop. “Just wait a minute. My 
name is Sue. Not Susannah.” 

The old man’s hands disappeared into the deep pockets of his robe. 
“Perhaps I should introduce myself,” he said. “My name is Morgred. I am the 
king’s sorcerer.” 

“You do magic tricks?” Eddie blurted out. 

“Tricks?” The old man seemed confused by Eddie’s question. 

“Did you order us locked up in here?” I asked him. “Did you have us 



brought back in time? Why? Why have you done this?” 

“It isn’t an easy story to tell, Susannah,” Morgred replied. “You and Edward 
have to believe—” 

“Stop calling me Susannah!” I shouted. 

“I’m not Edward!” my brother insisted. “I’m Eddie. Everyone calls me 
Eddie.” 

The old man removed his hands from his robe pockets. He placed one hand 
on Eddie’s shoulder, and one on mine. 

“I had better start with the biggest surprise of all,” he told us. “You are not 
Eddie and Sue. And you do not live in the twentieth century.” 

“Huh? What are you saying ?” I cried. 

“You really are Edward and Susannah,” Morgred replied. “You are the 
Prince and Princess of York. And you have been ordered to the Tower by your 
uncle, the king.” 



29 


“You’re wrong!” Eddie cried. “We know who we are. You’ve made a big 
mistake!” 

I suddenly felt cold all over. Morgred’s words echoed in my ears. “You are 
not Eddie and Sue. You really are Edward and Susannah.” 

I took a step back, out from under his hand. I studied his face. Was he 
joking? Was he crazy? 

His eyes revealed only sadness. His expression remained solemn, too 
solemn to be joking. 

“I do not expect you to believe me,” Morgred said, returning his hands to 
his robe pockets. “But my words are true. I cast a spell upon you. I tried to help 
you escape.” 

“Escape?” I cried. “You mean—escape from this tower?” 

Morgred nodded. “I tried to help you escape your fate.” 

And as he said this, the voice of Mr. Starkes, the tour guide, returned to my 
ears. And I remembered the story he had told. I remembered the fate of Prince 
Edward and Princess Susannah. 

The king’s orders were to smother them. 

Smothered with pillows. 

“But we’re not them!” I wailed. “You’re just confused. Maybe Eddie and I 
look like them. Maybe we look a lot like them. But we’re not the prince and 
princess. We’re two kids from the twentieth century.” 

Morgred shook his head solemnly. “I cast a spell,” he explained. “I erased 
your memories. You were locked in this tower. I wanted you to escape. First I 
whisked you away to the safety of the abbey, then I sent you as far into the future 
as I could.” 

“It’s not true!” Eddie insisted, shrieking the words. “It’s not true! Not true! 
I’m Eddie—not Edward. My name is Eddie!” 

Morgred sighed again. “Just Eddie?” he asked, keeping his voice low and 
soft. “What is your full name, Eddie?” 

“I—uh—well...” my brother stammered. 

Eddie and I don’t know our last name, I realized. And we don’t know where 
we live. 



“When I sent you far into the future, I gave you new memories,” Morgred 
said. “I gave you new memories so you could survive in a new and distant time. 
But the memories were not complete.” 

“That’s why we couldn’t remember our parents!” I exclaimed to Eddie. 

“But our parents—?” I started. 

“Your parents, the rightful king and queen, are dead,” Morgred told us. 
“Your uncle has named himself king. And he has ordered you to the Tower to get 
you out of the way.” 

“He—he’s going to have us murdered !” I stammered. 

Morgred nodded, shutting his eyes. “Yes. I am afraid he is. His men will be 
here soon. There is no way I can stop him now.” 



30 


“I don’t believe this,” Eddie murmured. “I really don’t.” 

But I could see the sadness in Morgred’s purple eyes and hear it in his low, 
soft voice. The sorcerer was telling the truth. 

The horror of the truth was sinking in. My brother and I weren’t Eddie and 
Sue from the twentieth century. We lived in this dark and dangerous time. We 
were Edward and Susannah of York. 

“I tried to send you as far from this Tower as possible,” Morgred tried to 
explain again. “I sent you far into the future to start new lives. I wanted you to 
live there and never return. Never return to face doom in this castle.” 

“But what happened?” I demanded. “Why, then, are we back here, 
Morgred?” 

“The Lord High Executioner was spying on me,” Morgred explained, 
lowering his voice to a whisper. “He must have known that I wanted to help you 
escape. And, so—” 

He stopped and tilted his head toward the door. 

Was that a footstep? Was someone out there? 

All three of us listened. 

Silence now. 

Morgred continued his story in a whisper. “When I cast the spell that sent 
you into the future, the Executioner must have hidden nearby. I used three white 
stones to cast the spell. Later, he stole the stones and performed the spell 
himself. He sent himself to the future to bring you back. And as you both know, 
he caught you and dragged you back here.” 

Morgred took a step forward. He raised his hand and placed it on my 
forehead. 

The hand felt cold at first. Then it grew warmer and warmer, until I pulled 
away from the blazing heat. 

As I pulled back, my memory returned. 

Once again, I became Princess Susannah of York. My true identity. I 
remembered my parents, the king and queen. And all my memories of growing 
up in the royal castle returned. 

My brother glared angrily at Morgred. “What did you do to my sister?” he 



cried, backing up until he bumped into the stone wall. 

Morgred placed his hand on my brother’s forehead. And I watched my 
brother’s expression change as his memory returned and he realized he really 
was the prince. 

“How did you do it, Morgred?” Edward asked, pushing his dark brown hair 
off his forehead. “How did you send Susannah and me to the future? Can you 
perform the spell again?” 

“Yes!” I cried. “Can you perform it once more? Can you send us to the 
future now—before the king’s men come?” 

Morgred shook his head sadly. “Alas, I cannot,” he murmured. “I do not 
have the three stones. As I told you, they were stolen by the Lord High 
Executioner.” 

A smile slowly spread over my brother’s face. He reached into his pocket. 
“Here they are!” Eddie announced. He winked at me. “I stole them back again 
when the Executioner captured me in town.” 

Edward handed the stones to Morgred. “Fastest hands in all of Britannia!” 
he declared. 

Morgred did not smile. “It is a simple spell, actually,” the wizard said. He 
raised the three stones into the air, and they began to glow. 

“I pile the stones up one on top of the other,” Morgred explained. “I wait 
for them to glow with a bright white heat. Then I pronounce the words 
‘Movarum, Lovaris, Movarus. ’ I then call out the year to which the traveler is to 
be sent.” 

“That’s the whole spell?” Edward asked, staring at the smooth, glowing 
stones in Morgred’s hand. 

Morgred nodded. “That is the spell, Prince Edward.” 

“Well, do it again! Please hurry!” I begged him. 

His expression grew even sadder. “I cannot,” he said, his voice breaking 
with emotion. 

He returned the three stones to the pocket of his robe. Then he uttered a 
long, unhappy sigh. “It is my fondest wish to help you children,” he whispered. 
“But if I help you to escape again, the king will torture me and put me to a 
painful death. And then I will not be able to use my magic to help all the people 
of Britain.” 

Tears brimmed in his purple eyes and ran down his wrinkled cheeks. He 
gazed unhappily at my brother and me. “I—I only hope that you enjoyed your 



brief time in the future,” he said in a whisper. 

I shuddered. “You—you really cannot help us?” I pleaded. 

“I cannot,” he replied, lowering his eyes to the floor. 

“Even if we ordered you?” Edward asked. 

“Even if you ordered me,” Morgred repeated. With an emotional cry, he 
wrapped Edward in a hug. Then he turned and hugged me, too. “I am helpless,” 
he whispered. “I beg your forgiveness. But I am helpless.” 

“How long do we have to live?” I asked in a tiny, trembling voice. 

“Perhaps a few hours,” Morgred replied, avoiding my eyes. He turned 
away. He could not bear to face us. 

A heavy silence fell over the tiny room. The gray light filtered down from 
the window above our heads. The air suddenly felt cold and damp. 

I couldn’t stop shivering. 

Edward startled me by leaning close and whispering in my ear. “Susannah, 
look!” he whispered excitedly. “The door. Morgred left the door open when he 
entered.” 

I turned to the door. Edward was right. The heavy wooden door stood 
nearly half open. 

We still have a chance, I thought, my heart beginning to race. We still have 
a tiny chance. 

“Edward—run!” I screamed. 



31 


I took a running step. 

And froze in midair. 

I turned to see Edward freeze, too, his arms outstretched, his legs bent in a 
running position. 

I struggled to move. But I couldn’t. I felt as if my body had turned to stone. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that Morgred had cast a spell on us. 
Frozen stiffly in the center of the tiny room, I watched the sorcerer make his way 
to the door. 

Halfway out, he turned back to us. “I’m so sorry,” he said in a trembling 
voice. “But I cannot allow you to escape. Please understand. I did my best. I 
really did. But now I am helpless. Truly helpless.” 

Tears rolled down his cheeks, into his white beard. He gave us one last sad 
glance. Then the door slammed hard behind him. 

As soon as the door was bolted from the outside, the spell wore off. Edward 
and I could move again. 

I sank to the floor. I suddenly felt weak. Weary. 

Edward stood tensely beside me, his eyes on the door. 

“What are we going to do?” I asked my brother. “Poor Morgred. He tried to 
help us. He wanted to help us again. But he couldn’t. If only—” 

I stopped talking when I heard the heavy footsteps outside the door. 

At first, I thought it was Morgred returning. 

But then I heard hushed voices. The sounds of more than one man. 

Right outside the door now. 

And I recognized the booming voice of one of them. The Lord High 
Executioner. 

I climbed tensely to my feet and turned to Edward. “They’ve come for us,” 
I whispered. 



32 


To my surprise, Edward’s face remained calm. 

He raised his hand. He had something hidden in his closed fist. 

As he opened his fist, I recognized the three stones. Morgred’s smooth, 
white stones. 

They immediately began to glow. 

“Edward—again?” I cried. 

A smile crossed his lips. His dark eyes lit up excitedly. “I lifted them from 
Morgred’s robe when he hugged me.” 

“Do you remember the spell?” I demanded. 

Edward’s smile faded. “I—I think so.” 

I could hear the Executioner outside the door. The heavy treading of boots 
on the stone stairs. 

“Edward—please hurry!” I urged. 

I heard the bolt slide outside the door. 

I heard the heavy wooden door begin to slide open. 

Edward struggled to stack the glowing stones one on top of the other. The 
one on top kept slipping off. 

Finally, he held all three in a small tower in his palm. 

The door slid open a few inches more. 

Edward held the glowing stones high. And called out the words, 
“Movarum, Lovaris, Movaris!” 

The glowing stones exploded in a flash of white light. 

The light faded quickly. 

I glanced around. 

“Oh, Edward!” I wailed in disappointment. “It didn’t work! We’re still in 
the Tower!” 

Before my stunned brother could reply, the door swung all the way open. 



33 


And there they stood. A tour group. 

I didn’t recognize the tour leader. She was a young woman, dressed in 
layers of red and yellow T-shirts, and a short skirt over black tights. 

I grinned at Edward. I felt so happy, I didn’t think I would ever stop 
grinning! 

“You did it, Edward!” I cried. “You did it! Your spell did work!” 

“Call me Eddie,” he replied, laughing gleefully. “Call me Eddie, okay, 
Sue?” 

The spell had worked perfectly. We were back in the twentieth century. 
Back in the Tower—as tourists! 

“This tiny Tower room is where Prince Edward and Princess Susannah of 
York were held as prisoners,” the tour guide announced. “They were held here 
and sentenced to death. But they were never executed.” 

“They didn’t die up here?” I asked the tour guide. “What happened?” 

The tour guide shrugged. She chewed her gum harder. “No one knows. On 
the night they were to be murdered, the prince and princess vanished. 
Disappeared into thin air. It is a mystery that will never be solved.” 

Members of the tour group mumbled to each other, gazing around the small 
room. 

“Look at the thick, stone walls,” the tour guide continued, chewing her gum 
as she talked. “Look at the barred window so high above. How did they escape? 
We will never know.” 

“I guess we know the answer to the mystery,” someone whispered behind 
me. 

Eddie and I turned to see Morgred grinning at us. He winked. I saw that he 
was wearing a purple sports jacket and dark gray trousers. 

“Thanks for bringing me along,” he said happily. 

“We had to bring you, Morgred,” Eddie replied. “We need a parent.” 

Morgred raised a finger to his mouth. “Hush! Don’t call me Morgred. I’m 
Mr. Morgan now. Okay?” 

“Okay,” I said. “And I guess I’m Sue Morgan. And this is Eddie Morgan.” I 
slapped my brother on the back. 



The tour group started out of the Tower room, and we followed. Eddie 
pulled the three white stones from his jeans pocket and began juggling them. 

“If I hadn’t borrowed these from your robe,” he told Mr. Morgan, “that tour 
guide would be telling a very different story—wouldn’t she!” 

“Yes, she would,” the sorcerer replied thoughtfully. “Avery different story.” 

“Let’s get out of here!” I cried. “I never want to see this tower again.” 

“I’m starving!” Eddie exclaimed. 

I suddenly realized I was starving, too. 

“Shall I perform a food spell?” Mr. Morgan suggested. 

Eddie and I each let out a loud groan. “I think I’ve had enough spells to last 
a lifetime,” I said. “How about we go to Burger Palace for some good old 
twentieth-century hamburgers and fries!” 




THE CUCKOO 
CLOCK OF DOOM 

Goosebumps - 28 
R.L. Stine 


1 


“Michael, your shoe’s untied.” 

My sister, Tara, sat on the front steps, grinning at me. Another one of 
her dumb jokes. 

I’m not an idiot. I knew better than to look down at my shoe. If I did, 
she’d slap me under the chin or something. 

“I’m not falling for that old trick,” I told her. 

Mom had just called me and the brat inside for dinner. An hour before 
she had made us go outside because she couldn’t stand our fighting 
anymore. 

It was impossible not to fight with Tara. 

When it comes to stupid tricks, Tara never knows when to quit. “I’m 
not kidding,” she insisted. “Your shoe’s untied. You’re going to trip.” 

“Knock it off, Tara,” I said. I started up the front steps. 

My left shoe seemed to cling to the cement. I pulled it up with a jerk. 

“Yuck!” I’d stepped on something sticky. 

I glanced at Tara. She’s a skinny little squirt, with a wide red mouth 
like a clown’s and stringy brown hair that she wears in two pigtails. 

Everyone says she looks exactly like me. I hate it when they say that. 
My brown hair is not stringy, for one thing. It’s short and thick. And my 
mouth is normal-sized. No one has ever said I look like a clown. 

I’m a little short for my age, but not skinny. 

I do not look like Tara. 

She was watching me, giggling. “You’d better look down,” she taunted 
in her singsong voice. 

I glanced down at my shoe. It wasn’t untied, of course. But I’d just 
stepped on a huge wad of gum. If I had looked down to check my 
shoelaces, I would have seen it. 

But Tara knew I wouldn’t look down. Not if she told me to. 

Tricked by Tara the Terror again. 

“You’re going to get it, Tara,” I grumbled. I tried to grab her, but she 
dodged out of reach and ran into the house. 



I chased her into the kitchen. She screamed and hid behind my mother. 

“Mom! Hide me! Michael’s going to get me!” she shrieked. 

As if she were afraid of me. Fat chance. 

“Michael Webster!” Mom scolded. “Stop chasing your little sister.” 

She glanced at my feet and added, “Is that gum on your shoe? Oh, 
Michael, you’re tracking it all over the floor!” 

“Tara made me step on it!” I whined. 

Mom frowned. “Do you expect me to believe that? Michael, you’re 
fibbing again.” 

“I am not!” I cried. 

Mom shook her head in disgust. “If you’re going to tell a lie, Michael, 
at least make it a good one.” 

Tara peeked out from behind Mom and taunted me. “Yeah, Michael .” 

Then she laughed. She loved this. 

She’s always getting me into trouble. My parents always blame me for 
stuff that’s her fault. But does Tara ever do anything wrong? Oh, no, never. 
She’s a perfect angel. Not a bad bone in her body. 

I’m twelve. Tara’s seven. She’s made the last seven years of my life 
miserable. 

Too bad I don’t remember the first five very well. The pre-Tara years. 
They must have been awesome! Quiet and peaceful—and fun! 

I went out to the back porch and scraped the sticky gum off my shoe. I 
heard the doorbell ring and Dad calling, “It’s here! I’ll get it.” 

Inside, everybody gathered around the front door. Two men were 
struggling to carry something heavy into the house. Something long and 
narrow and wrapped with padded gray cloth. 

“Careful,” Dad warned them. “It’s very old. Bring it in here.” 

Dad led the delivery guys into the den. They set the thing down on one 
end and began to unwrap it. It was about as wide as me and maybe a foot 
taller. 

“What is it?” Tara asked. 

Dad didn’t answer right away. He mbbed his hands together in 
anticipation. Our cat, Bubba, slinked into the room and rubbed against 
Dad’s legs. 

The gray cloth fell away, and I saw a very fancy old clock. It was 
mostly black but painted with lots of silver, gold, and blue designs, and 



decorated with scrolls, carvings, knobs, and buttons. 

The clock itself had a white face with gold hands and gold Roman 
numerals. I saw little secret doors hidden under the paint designs, and a big 
door in the middle of the clock. 

The delivery guys gathered up the gray padding. Dad gave them some 
money, and they left. 

“Isn’t it great?” Dad gushed. “It’s an antique cuckoo clock. It was a 
bargain. You know that store across from my office, Anthony’s Antiques 
and Stuff?” 

We all nodded. 

“It’s been in the shop for fifteen years,” Dad told us, patting the clock. 
“Every time I pass Anthony’s, I stop and stare at it. I’ve always loved it. 
Anthony finally put it on sale.” 

“Cool,” Tara said. 

“But you’ve been bargaining with Anthony for years, and he always 
refused to lower the price,” Mom said. “Why now?” 

Dad’s face lit up. “Well, today I went into the shop at lunchtime, and 
Anthony told me he’d discovered a tiny flaw on the clock. Something 
wrong with it.” 

I scanned the clock. “Where?” 

“He wouldn’t say. Do you see anything, kids?” 

Tara and I began to search the clock for flaws. All the numbers on the 
face were correct, and both the hands were in place. I didn’t see any chips 
or scratches. 

“I don’t see anything wrong with it,” Tara said. 

“Me, either,” I added. 

“Neither do I,” Dad agreed. “I don’t know what Anthony’s talking 
about. I told him I wanted to buy the clock anyway. He tried to talk me out 
of it, but I insisted. If the flaw is so tiny we don’t even notice it, what 
difference does it make? Anyway, I really do love this thing.” 

Mom cleared her throat. “I don’t know, dear. Do you think it really 
belongs in the den?” I could tell by her face that she didn’t like the clock as 
much as Dad did. 

“Where else could we put it?” Dad asked. 

“Well—maybe the garage?” 

Dad laughed. “I get it—you’re joking!” 



Mom shook her head. She wasn’t joking. But she didn’t say anything 
more. 

“I think this clock is just what the den needs, honey,” Dad added. 

On the right side of the clock I saw a little dial. It had a gold face and 
looked like a miniature clock. But it had only one hand. 

Tiny numbers were painted in black along the outside of the dial, 
starting at 1800 and ending at 3000. The thin gold hand pointed to one of 
the numbers: 2003. 

The hand didn’t move. Beneath the dial, a little gold button had been 
set into the wood. 

“Don’t touch that button, Michael,” Dad warned. “This dial tells the 
current year. The button moves the hand to change the year.” 

“That’s kind of silly,” Mom said. “Who ever forgets what year it is?” 

Dad ignored her. “See, the clock was built in 1800, where the dial 
starts. Every year the pointer moves one notch to show the date.” 

“So why does it stop at three thousand?” Tara asked. 

Dad shrugged. “I don’t know. I guess the clock-maker couldn’t 
imagine the year three thousand would ever come. Or maybe he figured the 
clock wouldn’t last that long.” 

“Maybe he thought the world would blow up in 2999,” I suggested. 

“Could be,” Dad said. “Anyway, please don’t touch the dial. In fact, I 
don’t want anyone touching the clock at all. It’s very old and very, very 
delicate. Okay?” 

“Okay, Dad,” Tara said. 

“I won’t touch it,” I promised. 

“Look,” Mom said, pointing at the clock. “It’s six o’clock. Dinner’s 
almost—” 

Mom was interrupted by a loud gong. A little door just over the clock 
face slid open—and a bird flew out. It had the meanest bird face I ever saw 
—and it dove for my head. 

I screamed. “It’s alive!” 



2 


Cuckoo! Cuckoo! 

The bird flapped its yellow feathers. Its eerie, bright blue eyes glared 
at me. It squawked six times. Then it jumped back inside the clock. The 
little door slid shut. 

“It’s not alive, Michael,” Dad said, laughing. “It sure is real-looking, 
though, isn’t it? Wow!” 

“You birdbrain!” Tara teased. “You were scared! Scared of a cuckoo 
clock!” She reached out and pinched me. 

“Get off me,” I growled. I shoved her away. 

“Michael, don’t push your sister,” Mom said. “You don’t realize how 
strong you are. You could hurt her.” 

“Yeah, Michael,” Tara said. 

Dad kept admiring the clock. He could hardly take his eyes off it. “I’m 
not surprised the cuckoo startled you,” he said. “There’s something special 
about this clock. It comes from the Black Forest of Germany. It’s supposed 
to be enchanted.” 

“Enchanted?” I echoed. “You mean, magic? How?” 

“Legend has it that the man who built this clock had magical powers. 
He put a spell on the clock. They say if you know the secret, you can use 
the clock to go back in time.” 

Mom scoffed. “Did Anthony tell you that? What a great way to sell an 
old clock. Claim it has magic powers!” 

Dad wouldn’t let her spoil his fun. “You never know,” he said. “It 
could be true. Why not?” 

“I think it’s true,” Tara said. 

“Herman, I wish you wouldn’t tell the kids these wild stories,” Mom 
chided. “It’s not good for them. And it only encourages Michael. He’s 
always making things up, telling fibs and impossible stories. I think he gets 
it from you.” 

I protested. “I don’t make things up! I always tell the truth!” 

How could Mom say that about me? 

“I don’t think it hurts the kids to use their imaginations once in a 



while,” Dad said. 

“Imagination is one thing,” Mom said. “Lies and fibs are something 
else.” 

I fumed. Mom was so unfair to me. The worst part was the expression 
of victory on Tara’s face. 

Making me look bad was her mission in life. I wanted to wipe that 
smirk off her face forever. 

“Dinner’s almost ready,” Mom announced, leaving the den. The cat 
followed her. “Michael, Tara—go wash up.” 

“And remember,” Dad warned. “No one touches the clock.” 

“Okay, Dad,” I said. 

Dinner smelled good. I started for the bathroom to wash up. As I 
passed Tara, she stomped hard on my foot. 

“Ow!” I yelled. 

“Michael!” Dad barked. “Stop making so much noise.” 

“But, Dad, Tara stomped on my foot.” 

“It couldn’t have hurt that much, Michael. She’s a lot smaller than you 

are.” 

My foot throbbed. I limped to the bathroom. Tara followed me. 

“You’re such a baby,” she taunted. 

“Be quiet, Tara,” I said. How did I get the worst sister in the world? 

We had pasta with broccoli and tomato sauce for dinner. Mom was on 
a big no-meat, low-fat kick. I didn’t mind. Pasta was better than what we’d 
had the night before—lentil soup. 

“You know, honey,” Dad complained to Mom, “a hamburger now and 
then never hurt anybody.” 

“I disagree,” Mom said. She didn’t have to say more. We’d all heard 
her lectures about meat and fat and chemicals before. 

Dad covered his pasta with a thick layer of Parmesan cheese. 

“Maybe the den should be off-limits for a while,” Dad suggested. “I 
hate to think of you two playing in there and breaking the clock.” 

“But, Dad, I have to do my homework in the den tonight,” I said. “I’m 
doing a report on Transportation in Many Lands.’ And I need to use the 
encyclopedia.” 

“Can’t you take it up to your room?” Dad asked. 

“The whole encyclopedia?” 



Dad sighed. “No, I guess you can’t. Well, all right. You can use the den 
tonight.” 

“I need to use the encyclopedia, too,” Tara announced. 

“You do not,” I snapped. She wanted to hang around the den and bug 
me, that was all. 

“I do, too. I’m supposed to read about the gold rush.” 

“You’re making that up. You don’t study the gold rush in the second 
grade. That’s not until fourth.” 

“What do you know about it? Mrs. Dolin is teaching us the gold rush 
now. Maybe I’m in a smarter class than you were.” 

Mom said, “Michael, really. If Tara says she needs to use the 
encyclopedia, why start a fight about it?” 

I sighed and stuffed a forkful of pasta in my mouth. Tara stuck her 
tongue out at me. 

There’s no point in talking, I thought. All it does is get me into trouble. 

I lugged my backpack into the den after dinner. No sign of Tara—yet. 
Maybe I’d be able to get some homework done before she came in and 
started pestering me. 

I dumped my books on Dad’s desk. The clock caught my eye. It wasn’t 
pretty—kind of ugly, really. But I liked looking at all those scrolls and 
buttons and knobs. It really did seem as if the clock could be magic. 

I thought about the flaw Dad had mentioned. I wondered what it was. 
Some kind of bump? A missing notch on one of the gears? Maybe a piece 
of chipped paint? 

I glanced back at the door to the den. Bubba wandered through it, 
purring. I petted him. 

Mom and Dad were still in the kitchen, cleaning up after dinner. I 
didn’t think it would matter if I just looked at the clock a little. 

Careful not to touch any buttons, I stared at the dial that showed the 
year. I ran my fingers along a curve of silver at the edge of the clock. I 
glanced at the little door over the face of the clock. I knew the cuckoo sat 
behind that door, waiting to leap out at the right time. 

I didn’t want to be surprised by the bird again. I checked the time. Five 
minutes to eight. 

Under the face of the clock I saw another door. A big door. I touched 



its gold knob. 

What’s behind this door? I wondered. Maybe the gears of the clock, or 
a pendulum. 

I glanced over my shoulder again. No one was looking. No problem if 
I just peeked behind that big clock door. 

I tugged on the gold knob. The door stuck. I pulled harder. 

The door flew open. 

I let out a scream as an ugly green monster burst out of the clock. It 
grabbed me and knocked me to the floor. 



3 


“Mom! Dad! Help!” I shrieked. 

The monster raised its long claws over me. I covered my face, waiting 
to be slashed. 

“Goochy goochy goo!” The monster giggled and tickled me with its 
claws. 

I opened my eyes. Tara! Tara in her old Halloween costume! 

She rolled on the floor, giggling. “You’re so easy to scare!” she 
shouted. “You should have seen your face when I jumped out of the clock!” 

“It’s not funny!” I cried. “It’s—” 

Gong. 

Cuckoo, cuckoo, cuckoo, cuckoo! 

The bird popped out of the clock and started cuckooing. Okay, I admit 
it scared me again. But did Tara have to clutch her sides, laughing at me 
that way? 

“What’s going on in here?” Dad stood in the doorway, glaring down at 
us. 

He pointed at the clock. “What’s that door doing open? Michael, I told 
you to stay away from the clock!” 

“ME?” I cried. 

“He was trying to catch the cuckoo,” Tara lied. 

“I thought so,” Dad said. 

“Dad, that’s not true! Tara’s the one who—” 

“Enough of that, Michael. I’m sick of hearing you blame Tara every 
time you do something wrong. Maybe your mother is right. Maybe I have 
been encouraging your imagination a little too much.” 

“That’s not fair!” I yelled. “I don’t have any imagination! I never make 
anything up!” 

“Dad, he’s lying,” Tara said. “I came in here and saw him playing with 
the clock. I tried to stop him.” 

Dad nodded, swallowing every word his precious Tara said. 

There was nothing I could do. I stormed off to my room and slammed 
the door. 



Tara was the biggest pain in the world, and she never got blamed for 
anything. She even mined my birthday. 

I turned twelve three days ago. Usually, people like their birthday. It’s 
supposed to be fun, right? 

Not for me. Tara made sure my birthday was the worst day of my life. 
Or at least one of the worst. 

First, she ruined my present. 

I could tell my parents were very excited about this present. My 
mother kept hopping around like a chicken, saying, “Don’t go in the garage, 
Michael! Whatever you do, don’t go in the garage!” 

I knew she’d hidden my present in there. But just to torture her, I 
asked, “Why not? Why can’t I go in the garage? The lock on my bedroom 
door is broken, and I need to borrow one of Dad’s tools....” 

“No, no!” Mom exclaimed. “Tell your father to fix the lock. He’ll get 
the tools. You can’t go in there, because... well... there’s a huge mound of 
trash in there. It really stinks. It smells so bad, you could get sick from it!” 

Sad, isn’t it? And she thinks I get my “imagination” from Dad! 

“All right, Mom,” I promised. “I won’t go in the garage.” 

And I didn’t—even though the lock on my door really was broken. I 
didn’t want to spoil whatever surprise they had cooked up. 

They were throwing me a big birthday party that afternoon. A bunch of 
kids from school were coming over. Mom baked a cake and made snacks 
for the party. Dad ran around the house, setting up chairs and hanging crepe 
paper. 

“Dad, would you mind fixing the lock on my door?” I asked. 

I like my privacy—and I need that lock. Tara had broken it a week 
earlier. She’d been trying to kickbox the door down. 

“Sure, Michael,” Dad agreed. “Anything you say. After all, you’re the 
birthday boy.” 

“Thanks.” 

Dad took the toolbox upstairs and worked on the lock. Tara lounged 
around the dining room making trouble. As soon as Dad was gone, she 
pulled down a crepe paper streamer and left it lying on the floor. 

Dad fixed the lock and returned the tools to the garage. As he passed 
through the dining room, he noticed the torn-down streamer. 



“Why won’t this crepe paper stay up?” he mumbled. He taped it back 
up. A few minutes later, Tara tore it down again. 

“I know what you’re doing, Tara,” I told her. “Stop trying to wreck my 
birthday.” 

“I don’t have to wreck it,” she said. “It’s bad all by itself—just because 
it’s the day you were born.” She pretended to shudder in horror. 

I ignored her. It was my birthday. Nothing could keep me from having 
fun, not even Tara. 

That’s what I thought 

About half an hour before the party, Mom and Dad called me into the 
garage. 

I pretended to go along with Mom’s silly story. “What about the 
horrible trash?” 

“Oh, that,” Mom clucked. “I made it up.” 

“Really?” I said. “Wow. It was so believable.” 

“If you believed that, you must be a moron,” Tara said. 

Dad threw open the garage door. I stepped inside. 

There stood a brand-new 21-speed bike. The bike I’d wanted for a 
long time. 

The coolest bike I’d ever seen! 

“Do you like it?” Mom asked. 

“I love it!” I cried. “It’s awesome! Thanks!” 

“Cool bike, Mike,” Tara said. “Mom, I want one of these for my 
birthday.” 

Before I could stop her, she climbed up on the seat of my new bike. 

“Tara, get off!” I yelled. 

She didn’t listen. She tried to reach her feet to the pedals, but her legs 
were too short. The bike fell over. 

“Tara!” Mom cried, running to the little brat’s side. “Are you hurt?” 

Tara stood up and brushed herself off. “I’m okay. I scraped my knee a 
little, though.” 

I picked up my bike and inspected it. It was no longer perfectly shiny 
and black. There was a huge white scratch across the middle bar. 

It was practically ruined. 

“Tara, you wrecked my bike! ” 

“Let’s not get overexcited, Michael,” Dad said. “It’s only a scratch.” 



“Don’t you even care about your sister?” Mom asked. “She could’ve 
been hurt!” 

“It’s her own fault! She shouldn’t have touched my bike in the first 
place!” 

“Michael, you have a lot to learn about being a good brother,” Dad 

said. 

They make me so mad sometimes! 

“Let’s go inside,” Mom said. “Your friends will be here soon.” 

The party. I thought the party would make me feel better. After all, 
there would be cake, presents, and my best friends. What could go wrong? 

It started out okay. One by one my friends arrived, and they all brought 
me presents. I’d invited five guys: David, Josh, Michael B., Henry, and 
Lars; and three girls: Ceecee, Rosie, and Mona. 

I wasn’t so crazy about Ceecee and Rosie, but I really liked Mona. She 
has long, shiny brown hair and a turned-up nose that’s kind of cute. She’s 
tall, and good at basketball. There’s something sort of cool about her. 

Ceecee and Rosie are Mona’s best friends. I had to invite them if I was 
going to invite Mona. They always go everywhere together. 

Ceecee, Rosie, and Mona arrived all at once. They took off their 
jackets. Mona was wearing pink overalls over a white turtleneck. She 
looked great. I didn’t care what the other girls were wearing. 

“Happy birthday, Michael!” they all called out at the door. 

“Thanks,” I said. 

They each handed me a gift. Mona’s was small and flat and wrapped in 
silver paper. Probably a CD, I figured. But which one? What kind of CD 
would a girl like Mona think a guy like me would like? 

I set the presents on top of the pile in the living room. 

“Hey, Michael—what did your parents give you?” David asked. 

“Just a bike,” I said, trying to be cool about it. “A twenty-one speed.” 

I put on a CD. Mom and Tara brought in plates of sandwiches. Mom 
went back to the kitchen, but Tara stayed. 

“Your little sister is so cute,” Mona said. 

“Not once you get to know her,” I muttered. 

“Michael! That’s not very nice,” Mona said. 

“He’s a terrible big brother,” Tara told her. “He yells at me all the 


time.” 



“I do not! Get lost, Tara.” 

“I don’t have to.” She stuck her tongue out at me. 

“Let her stay, Michael,” Mona said. “She’s not bothering anybody.” 

“Hey, Mona,” Tara chirped. “You know, Michael really likes you.” 

Mona’s eyes widened. “He does?” 

My face got red-hot. I glared at Tara. I wanted to strangle her right 
then and there. But I couldn’t—too many witnesses. 

Mona started laughing. Ceecee and Rosie laughed, too. Luckily, the 
guys didn’t hear this. They were around the CD player, skipping from cut to 
cut. 

What could I say? I did like Mona. I couldn’t deny it—it would hurt 
her feelings. But I couldn’t admit it, either. 

I wanted to die. I wanted to sink through the floor and die. 

“Michael, your face is all red!” Mona cried. 

Lars heard this and called out, “What did Webster do now?” 

Some of the guys call me by my last name. 

I grabbed Tara and dragged her into the kitchen, Mona’s laughter 
ringing in my ears. 

“Thanks a lot, Tara,” I whispered. “Why did you have to tell Mona I 
like her?” 

“It’s true, isn’t it?” the brat said. “I always tell the truth.” 

“Yeah, right!” 

“Michael—” Mom interrupted. “Are you being mean to Tara again?” 

I stormed out of the kitchen without answering her. 

“Hey, Webster,” Josh called when I returned to the living room. “Let’s 
see your new bike.” 

Good, I thought. A way to get away from the girls. 

I led them to the garage. They all stared at the bike and nodded at each 
other. They seemed really impressed. Then Henry grabbed the handlebars. 

“Hey, what’s this big scratch?” he said. 

“I know,” I explained. “My sister...” 

I stopped and shook my head. What was the use? 

“Let’s go back and open my presents,” I suggested. 

We trooped back into the living room. 

At least I’ve got more presents coming, I thought. Tara can’t ruin 
those. 



But Tara always finds a way. 

When I entered the living room, I found Tara sitting in the middle of a 
pile of torn-up wrapping paper. Rosie, Mona, and Ceecee sat around her, 
watching. 

Tara had opened all my presents for me. 

Thanks so much, Tara. 

She was ripping open the last present—Mona’s. 

“Look what Mona gave you, Michael!” Tara shouted. 

It was a CD. 

“I’ve heard there are some great love songs on it,” Tara teased. 

Everybody laughed. They all thought Tara was a riot. 

Later, we all sat down in the dining room for cake and ice cream. I carried 
the cake myself. Mom followed me, holding plates, candles, and matches. 

It was my favorite kind of cake, chocolate-chocolate. 

Balancing the cake in my hands, I stepped through the kitchen door 
and into the dining room. 

I didn’t see Tara pressed against the wall. I didn’t see her stick her 
bratty little foot in the doorway. 

I tripped. The cake flew out of my hands. 

I landed on top of the cake. Facedown. Of course. 

Some kids gasped. Some tried to muffle their laughter. 

I sat up and wiped the brown frosting from my eyes. 

The first face I saw was Mona’s. She was shaking with laughter. 

Mom leaned over and scolded me. “What a mess! Michael, why don’t 
you look where you’re going?” 

I listened to the laughter and stared at my ruined cake. I had no candles 
to blow out now. But it didn’t matter. I decided to make a wish, anyway. 

I wish I could start this birthday all over again. 

I stood up, covered in gooey brown cake. My friends howled. 

“You look like the Hulk!” Rosie cried. 

Everybody laughed harder than ever. 

They all had a great time at my party. Everyone did. 

Except for me. 

My birthday was bad—very bad. But ruining it wasn’t the worst thing 
Tara did to me. 



Nobody would believe the worst thing. 



4 


It happened the week before my birthday. Mona, Ceecee, and Rosie were 
coming over. We all had parts in the school play, and planned to rehearse 
together at my house. 

The play was a new version of The Frog Prince. Mona played the 
princess, and Ceecee and Rosie were her two silly sisters. Perfect casting, I 
thought. 

I played the frog, before the princess kisses him and turns him into a 
prince. For some reason, our drama teacher didn’t want me to play the 
prince. Josh got that part. 

Anyway, I decided that the frog is a better part. Because Mona, the 
princess, kisses the frog, not the prince. 

The girls would arrive any minute. 

Tara sat on the rug in the den, torturing our cat, Bubba. Bubba hated 
Tara almost as much as I did. 

Tara lifted Bubba by the hind legs, trying to make him do a handstand. 
Bubba yowled and squirmed and wriggled away. But Tara caught him and 
made him do a handstand again. 

“Stop that, Tara,” I ordered. 

“Why?” Tara said. “It’s fun.” 

“You’re hurting Bubba.” 

“No, I’m not. He likes it. See? He’s smiling.” She let go of his hind 
legs and grabbed him with one hand under his front legs. With the other 
hand she lifted the corners of his mouth and stretched them into a pained 
smile. 

Bubba tried to bite her. He missed. 

“Tara,” I said, “let him go. And get out of here. My friends are coming 
over.” 

“No.” Now Tara tried to make Bubba walk on his front paws. He fell 
and bumped his nose. 

“Tara, stop it!” I cried. As I tried to take Bubba away from her, she let 
the cat go. Bubba meowed and scratched me across the arm. 

“Ow!” I dropped Bubba. He ran away. 



“Michael, what were you doing to that cat?” Mom stood in the 
doorway. Bubba slipped past her into the hall. 

“Nothing! He scratched me!” 

“Stop teasing him, and he won’t scratch you,” Mom scolded. She left, 
calling over her shoulder, “I’m going upstairs to lie down for a while. I have 
a headache.” 

The doorbell rang. “We’ll get it, Mom!” I called. 

I knew it must be the girls at the door. I wanted to surprise them in my 
frog costume, but I wasn’t ready yet. 

“Answer the door, Tara,” I told the brat. “Tell Mona and the others to 
wait for me in the den. I’ll be right back.” 

“Okay,” Tara said. She trotted off to the front door. I hurried upstairs to 
change into my costume. 

I pulled the costume out of my closet. I took off my pants and shirt. I 
picked up the frog suit, trying to open the zipper. It was stuck. 

I stood there in my underwear, tugging at the zipper. Then my 
bedroom door clicked open. 

“Here he is, girls,” I heard Tara say. “He told me to bring you 
upstairs.” 

No! I thought. Please don’t let it be true! 

I was afraid to look up. I knew what I’d see. 

The door wide open. Mona, Ceecee, Rosie, and Tara, staring at me in 
my underwear! 

I forced myself to look. It was worse than I’d thought. 

There they all stood—staring and laughing! 

Tara laughed hardest of all. She laughed like a rotten little hyena. 

You think that’s bad? Wait. There’s more. 


* * * 


Two days before the underwear disaster, I was hanging around after school, 
playing basketball in the gym with Josh, Henry, and some other guys, 
including Kevin Flowers. 

Kevin is a good player, big and tough. He is twice as tall as me! He 
loves basketball. The Duke Blue Devils are his favorite college team. He 
wears a Blue Devils cap to school every day. 



While we were shooting baskets, I spied Tara hanging around the 
sidelines, where we’d all tossed our jackets and backpacks against the wall. 

I got a bad feeling. I always do when Tara’s around. 

What’s she doing there? I wondered. 

Maybe her teacher kept her after school, and she’s waiting for me to 
walk her home. 

She’s just trying to distract me, I told myself. Don’t let her. Don’t think 
about her. Just concentrate on the game. 

I felt good. I actually sank a few baskets before the game ended. My 
side won. We had Kevin Flowers on our team, that’s why. 

We all jogged to the wall to get our packs. Tara was gone. 

Funny, I thought. I guess she went home without me. 

I hoisted my pack over my shoulder and said, “See you tomorrow, 
guys.” 

But Kevin’s voice boomed through the gym. “Nobody move!” 

We all froze. 

“Where’s my cap?” he demanded. “My Blue Devils cap is missing!” 

I shrugged. I didn’t know where his stupid cap was. 

“Somebody took my cap,” Kevin insisted. “Nobody leaves until we 
find it.” 

He grabbed Henry’s backpack and started pawing through it. Everyone 
knows how much Kevin loves that cap. 

But Josh pointed at me. “Hey—what’s that hanging out of Webster’s 
pack?” he asked. 

“My pack?” I cried. I glanced over my shoulder. 

I saw a patch of blue sticking out of the zippered pocket. 

My stomach lurched. 

Kevin strode over to me and ripped the cap out of my pack. 

“I don’t know how it got there, Kevin,” I insisted. “I swear—” 

Kevin didn’t wait to hear my excuses. He never was much of a listener. 

Til spare you the blood and gore. Let’s just say my clothes didn’t fit 
too well when Kevin got through taking me apart! 

Josh and Henry helped me home. My mom didn’t recognize me. My 
eyes and nose had traded places with my chin. 

While I was in the bathroom cleaning myself up, I caught a glimpse of 
Tara in the mirror. The bratty grin on her face told me all I needed to know. 



“You!” I cried. “You put Kevin’s cap in my pack! Didn’t you!” 

Tara just grinned. Yeah. She did it, all right. 

“Why?” I demanded. “Why did you do it, Tara?” 

Tara shrugged and tried to look innocent. “Was that Kevin’s cap?” she 
said. “I thought it was yours.” 

“What a lie!” I cried. “I never wore a Duke cap, and you know it! You 
did that on purpose!” 

I was so furious, I couldn’t stand to look at her. I slammed the 
bathroom door in her face. 

And of course I got in trouble for slamming the door. 

Now you understand what I had to live with. 

Now you know why I did the terrible thing that I did. 

Anyone in my place would have done the same. 



5 


I stayed in my room that night, thinking hard. Plotting a way to get Tara in 
trouble. 

But nothing came to me. At least, nothing good enough. 

Then the clock arrived. A few days later, Tara did something that gave 
me an idea. 

Tara couldn’t stay away from the cuckoo clock. One afternoon, Dad 
caught Tara playing with the clock hands. She didn’t get into any real 
trouble, of course—not sweet little Tara. But Dad did say, “I’ve got my eye 
on you, young lady. No more playing with the clock.” 

At last! I thought. At last Dad realizes that Tara’s not a perfect angel. 
And at last I’ve found a way to get her into big trouble. 

If something went wrong with the clock, I knew Tara would be blamed 
for it. 

So I decided to make sure something did go wrong. 

Tara deserved to get into trouble for the hundreds of terrible things she 
did to me. 

So what if just once she gets blamed for something she didn’t do? I 
thought. It’s only evening the score a little. 

That night, after everybody was asleep, I sneaked downstairs to the 

den. 

It was almost midnight. I crept up to the clock and waited. 

One minute to go. 

Thirty seconds. 

Ten seconds. 

Six, five, four, three, two, one... 

The gong sounded. 

Cuckoo! Cuckoo! 

The yellow bird popped out. I grabbed it in mid-cuckoo. It made short, 
strangling noises. 

I twisted its head around, so it faced backwards. It looked really funny 
that way. 

It finished out its twelve cuckoos, facing the wrong way. 



I laughed to myself. When Dad saw it, he’d go ballistic ! 

The cuckoo slid back into its little window, still facing backwards. 

This is going to drive Dad insane! I thought wickedly. 

He’ll be furious at Tara. He’ll explode like a volcano! 

Finally, Tara will know what it feels like to be blamed for something 
you didn’t do. 

I crept back upstairs. Not a sound. No one saw me. 

I fell asleep that night a happy guy. There’s nothing like revenge. 

I slept late the next morning. I couldn’t wait to see Dad blow up at Tara. I 
just hoped I hadn’t missed it already. 

I hurried downstairs. I checked the den. 

The door stood open. 

No one there. No sign of trouble yet. 

Good, I thought. I haven’t missed it. 

I made my way into the kitchen, hungry. Mom, Dad, and Tara sat 
around the table, piled with empty breakfast dishes. 

As soon as they saw me, their faces lit up. 

“Happy Birthday!” they cried all at once. 

“Very funny,” I snapped. I opened a cabinet. “Is there any more cereal 
left?” 

“Cereal!” Mom said. “Don’t you want something special, like 
pancakes?” 

I scratched my head. “Well, sure. Pancakes would be great.” 

This was a little strange. Usually if I woke up late, Mom said I had to 
fix my own breakfast. And why should I want something special, anyway? 

Mom mixed a fresh batch of pancake batter. “Don’t go in the garage, 
Michael! Whatever you do, don’t go in the garage!” She hopped up and 
down, all excited. Just as if it were my birthday again. 

Weird. 

“.. .there’s a huge mound of trash in there,” Mom was saying. “It really 
stinks. It smells so bad, you could get sick from it!” 

“Mom, what’s with the trash story?” I asked. “I didn’t believe it the 
first time.” 

“Just don’t go into the garage,” she repeated. 

Why was she saying this to me? Why was she acting so weird? 



Dad excused himself, saying, “I’ve got a few important chores to do,” 
in a strange, jolly way. 

I shrugged and tried to eat my breakfast in peace. But after breakfast I 
passed through the dining room. Somebody had decorated it with crepe 
paper. One strand had been torn down. 

Weird. Totally weird. 

Dad came into the room, toolbox in hand. He picked up the torn piece 
of crepe paper and started to tape it back up again. 

“Why won’t this crepe paper stay up?” he asked. 

“Dad,” I said. “Why are you covering the dining room with crepe 
paper?” 

Dad smiled. “Because it’s your birthday, of course! Every birthday 
party needs crepe paper. Now, I bet you can’t wait to see your present, 
right?” 

I stared at him. 

What’s going on here? I wondered. 



6 


Mom and Dad led me to the garage. Tara followed. They all acted as if they 
were really going to give me a birthday present. 

Dad opened the garage door. 

There it was. The bike. 

It was perfectly shiny and new-looking. No scratches anywhere. 

That must be the surprise, I thought. They figured out a way to get rid 
of the scratch somehow. Or maybe they got me another new bike! 

“Do you like it?” Mom asked. 

“It’s awesome!” I replied. 

Tara said, “Cool bike, Mike. Mom, I want one of these for my 
birthday.” 

Then she jumped up on the seat. The bike fell over on her. When we 
pulled it up, it had a big scratch on it. 

Mom cried, “Tara! Are you hurt?” 

I couldn’t believe it. What a nightmare! 

It was happening all over again. Exactly as it had happened on my 
birthday. 

What’s going on? 

“What’s wrong, Michael?” Dad asked. “Don’t you like the bike?” 

What could I say? I felt sick. I felt so confused. 

Then it dawned on me. 

It must have been my wish, I thought. 

My birthday wish. 

After Tara tripped me and I fell on my cake, I wished I could go back 
in time and start my birthday all over again. 

Somehow my wish came tme. 

Wow! I thought. This is kind of cool. 

“Let’s go inside,” Mom said. “The party guests will be here soon.” 

The party? 

Oh, no. 

Please, no! 



Do I have to live through that horrible party again? 



7 


Yes. 

Yes, I had to live through the whole horrible nightmare again. 

My friends all showed up, just like the first time. 

I heard Tara say the awful words, “Hey, Mona. You know, Michael 
really likes you.” 

Mona said, “He does?” 

You already knew that, Mona, I thought. Tara told you four days ago. 

You were standing in that very same spot. Wearing those same pink 
overalls. 

Mona, Ceecee, and Rosie cracked up. 

I panicked. This can’t go on, I thought. 

My mother came in, carrying a tray of soda. I grabbed her. 

“Mom,” I begged. “Please take Tara away. Shut her up in her room or 
something!” 

“Michael, why? Your sister wants to have fun, too.” 

“Mom— please !” 

“Oh, Michael, you’re being silly. Be nice to Tara. She won’t bother 
you. She’s just a little girl.” 

Mom left the room, stranding me with Tara and my friends. 

She couldn’t save me. 

No one could. 

I showed the guys my new bike. Henry said, “Hey, what’s this big 
scratch?” 

When we got back to the living room, there were all my presents, 
opened by Tara. 

“Look what Mona gave you, Michael!” Tara shouted. 

I know, I know, I thought. A CD. With great love songs on it. 

“I’ve heard there are some great love songs on it,” Tara repeated. 

Everybody laughed. 

It was just as bad as before. 

No. Worse. Because I could see it all coming. And I couldn’t stop it. 



Could I? 

“Michael,” Mom called. “Come into the kitchen, please. It’s time for 
the birthday cake!” 

Here’s the test, I thought, dragging myself into the kitchen. 

I’ll carry in the cake—but this time I won’t trip. 

I know Tara is going to try and trip me. I won’t let her. 

I won’t make a fool of myself this time. 

I don’t have to. I don’t have to repeat everything the same way. 

Do I? 



8 


I stood in the kitchen, staring at the cake. I could hear my friends laughing 
and talking in the dining room. Tara was in there, too. 

I knew she was standing just beyond the dining room door, waiting. 
Waiting to stick out her foot and trip me. Waiting to make me fall on my 
face and embarrass myself all over again. 

Not this time. 

I carefully picked up the cake in both hands. I started toward the 
dining room. 

Mom followed, just as before. 

I stopped in front of the entrance to the dining room. I glanced down. 
No sign of Tara’s foot. 

Carefully, watching closely, I stepped through the door. One step. 

So far, so good. 

Another step. I stood inside the dining room now. 

I’d made it! All I had to do was get to the table, about five steps away, 
and I’d be safe. 

I took another step forward. Another. 

Then I felt a tug on my foot. 

Tara reached out from under the table. 

So that was where she’d been hiding. I knew it now. But it was too 

late. 

Everything seemed to move in slow motion. Like in a dream. 

I heard an evil giggle. 

She grabbed my foot. 

Oh, no, I thought. It’s happened. 

I lost my balance. 

As I fell, I turned my head and glanced back. 

Tara sat under that table, smirking at me. 

I wanted to kill her. 

But first I had to fall on my face on a cake. 

The cake flew out of my arms. I turned my head again. 



Splat! 

Everybody gasped with laughter. I sat up and wiped the frosting from 
my eyes. 

Mona leaned over the table, laughing harder than anybody. 

The second time was more embarrassing than the first. 

I sat on the floor, my face covered with cake, thinking, how could I 
have been so stupid? 

Why did I have to make that wish? 

I’ll never wish for anything ever again. 

I cleaned myself up and managed to survive the rest of the party. When 
I went to bed that night, I thought, at least it’s over. 

I switched off the light and pulled the covers up high. 

It’s over, I repeated. I’ll go to sleep, and everything will be back to 
normal in the morning. 

I shut my eyes and fell asleep. But in my dreams, all night long, I saw 
scenes from my horrible birthday party. The nightmare party became a real 
nightmare. 

There was Tara, telling Mona that I liked her. Mona’s face loomed up 
large in my dreams, laughing, laughing. Ceecee and Rosie and the guys, all 
laughing right in my face. 

I tripped and fell on top of the cake, over and over again. 

I tossed and turned. Each dream was scarier than the last. Soon my 
friends looked like horrible monsters. And Tara was the most horrible of all. 
Her features melted into a blur as she laughed and laughed at me. 

Wake up, I told myself. Wake up! 

I dragged myself out of the nightmare world. I sat up in bed, in a cold 
sweat. 

The room was still dark. I glanced at the clock. 

Three o’clock in the morning. 

I can’t sleep, I thought miserably. I can’t calm down. 

I’ve got to tell Mom and Dad what happened. Maybe they can help. 

Maybe they can make me feel better. 

I climbed out of bed and hurried down the dark hall to their room. 
Their door was open a crack. 

I pushed it open. 

“Mom? Dad? Are you awake?” 



Dad rolled over and grunted, “Huh?” 

I shook Mom’s shoulder. “Mom?” 

Mom stirred. “What is it, Michael?” she whispered. She sat up and 
grabbed the clock radio. In the clock’s dim blue glow I saw her squint, 
trying to read the time. 

“It’s three o’clock!” she cried. 

Dad snorted and sat up suddenly. “Huh? What?” 

“Mom, you’ve got to listen to me!” I whispered. “Something creepy 
happened today. Didn’t you notice it?” 

“Michael, what is this—” 

“My birthday,” I explained. “Tara ruined my birthday, and I wished I 
could have it all over again. I wanted to make it better. But I never thought 
the wish would come true! Then, today, it was my birthday again! And 
everything happened exactly the same. It was horrible!” 

Dad rubbed his eyes. “That you, Michael?” 

Mom patted him. “Go back to sleep, dear. Michael’s just had a bad 
dream.” 

“No, Mom,” I cried. “It wasn’t a dream. It was real! My birthday 
happened twice! You were there, both times. Don’t you understand?” 

“Listen, Michael,” Mom began. I heard impatience in her voice. “I 
know you’re excited about your birthday, but it’s two days away. Only two 
days to go—then it will be your birthday at last! Okay? So go back to bed 
now and get some sleep.” 

She kissed me good night. “Only two days till your birthday. Sweet 
dreams.” 



9 


I staggered back to bed, my head spinning. 

Two days until my birthday? 

Hadn’t I just lived through my birthday—twice? 

I switched on the reading lamp and stared at the date on my watch. 
February third, it said. 

My birthday is February fifth. My birthday was two days away. 

Could it be true? Was time going backwards? 

No, I thought. I must be going nuts. 

I shook my head hard. I slapped myself a few times. Going back in 
time. I laughed at the idea. 

It’s impossible, I thought. Get a hold of yourself, Michael. 

All I did was wish to celebrate my birthday over again— once. 

I didn’t wish to repeat my twelfth birthday for the rest of my life! 

But if that’s what’s happening, why is it now two days before my 
birthday? Why isn’t it just the night before? 

Maybe time really is going backwards, I thought. Maybe this has 
nothing to do with my wish. 

But, then—why is this happening to me? 

I racked my brains. 

The clock. Dad’s cuckoo clock. 

I twisted the cuckoo’s head backwards... went to bed... and when I 
woke up, time had gone backwards. 

Could that be it? Did / do this? 

Is Dad’s clock really magic? 

Maybe I shouldn’t have turned that stupid bird backwards, I decided. It 
figures—I try to get Tara in trouble, and end up getting myself into a 
horrible mess. 

Well, if that is what happened, it’s easy enough to fix. 

I’ll just go downstairs and turn the cuckoo’s head back around. 

I tiptoed out of my room and down the stairs. My parents had probably 
fallen back to sleep already, but I didn’t want to take any chances. 



I definitely didn’t want Dad to catch me fooling around with his 
precious clock. 

My feet hit the cold, bare floor of the foyer. I crept into the den. I 
switched on a lamp. I glanced around the room. The cuckoo clock was 
gone! 



10 


“No!” I cried. 

Had the clock been stolen? 

Without the clock, how could I fix everything? How could I turn the 
bird’s head around and make my life go forward again? 

I raced upstairs. I didn’t care who I woke up now. 

“Mom! Dad!” I yelled. I burst into their room and shook Mom awake 
again. 

“Michael, what is it?” She sounded furious. “It’s the middle of the 
night. We’re trying to get some sleep!” 

Let them be angry, I thought. This was way more important. 

“The cuckoo clock! It’s gone!” 

Dad rolled over. “What? Huh?” 

“Michael, you’ve had another nightmare,” Mom assured me. 

“It’s not a nightmare, Mom—it’s true! Go downstairs and see for 
yourself! There’s no cuckoo clock in the den!” 

“Michael—listen to me. It was a dream.” Mom’s voice was firm. “We 
don’t own a cuckoo clock. We never did.” 

I staggered backwards. 

“It’s just a dream. A bad dream,” she said. 

“But Dad bought it....” 

I stopped. 

I understood now. 

The date was February third. Two days before my birthday. 

And five days before Dad bought the cuckoo clock. 

We were traveling back in time. Dad hadn’t bought the clock yet. 

I felt sick. 

Mom said, “Michael, are you all right?” She climbed out of bed and 
pressed the back of her hand against my forehead. 

“You feel a little warm,” she said, nicer now that she thought I might 
be sick. “Come on, let’s get you to bed. I’ll bet you have a fever—and that’s 
why you’re having all these nightmares.” 



Dad grunted again. “What? Sick?” 

“I’ll take care of it, Herman,” Mom whispered. “Go back to sleep.” 

She guided me back to bed. She thought I was sick. 

But I knew the truth. 

I had made time move backwards. And the clock was gone. How 
would I fix things now? 

By the time I got to the kitchen the next morning, Mom, Dad, and Tara had 
already eaten. 

“Hurry up, Michael,” Dad said. “You’ll be late.” 

Being late for school didn’t seem to matter much at the moment. 

“Dad, please sit down for a second,” I pleaded. “Just for a minute. It’s 
important.” 

Dad sat, impatiently, on the edge of a kitchen chair. “Michael, what is 

it?” 

“Mom, are you listening?” I asked. 

“Sure, honey,” Mom said. She put the milk in the refrigerator and 
busily wiped off the counter. 

“This is going to sound weird,” I began. “But I’m not kidding.” 

I paused. Dad waited. I could tell by the tension in his face he expected 
me to say something totally dopey. 

I didn’t disappoint him. 

“Dad, time is going backwards. Every day I wake up—and it’s an 
earlier day than the last!” 

Dad’s face drooped. “Michael, you have a wonderful imagination, but 
I’m really running late. Can we talk about it when I get home from work 
tonight? Or why don’t you write it down? You know I love reading science 
fiction stories.” 

“But, Dad—” 

Mom said, “Did somebody remember to feed the cat?” 

“I did it,” Tara said. “Even though it’s supposed to be Michael’s job.” 
“Thanks, Tara,” Mom said. “Let’s hit the road, everybody.” 

I grabbed a muffin as Mom hustled us out the door. 

They’re too busy to understand right now, I reasoned as I hurried to 
school. Tonight, at dinner, when I have more time to explain... 

I had lots of time to think about my problem during school. I’d lived 



through this day before, too. I’d already done all the work, heard all the 
lessons, eaten the lousy lunch. 

When my math teacher, Mr. Parker, turned his back to the class, I 
knew what would happen next. I predicted it to the second. Kevin Flowers 
threw an eraser at him and hit him smack on the back of his black pants. 

Now Mr. Parker is going to turn around... I thought, watching Mr. 
Parker. 

He turned around. 

.. .now he’ll yell at Kevin... 

Mr. Parker shouted, “Kevin Flowers—to the principal’s office, now!” 

.. .now Kevin will start yelling his head off. 

“How do you know it was me!” Kevin yelled. “You didn’t see me do 
anything!” 

The rest of the scene happened as I remembered it. Mr. Parker cowered 
a bit—Kevin is pretty big—but told Kevin to go to the principal’s office 
again. Kevin kicked over an empty chair and threw his books across the 
room. 

It was all so boring. 

After school, I found Tara in the den, teasing Bubba. She lifted his 
hind legs and made him walk on his front paws. 

“Tara, stop it!” I cried. I tried to take Bubba away from her. She let the 
cat go. Bubba meowed and scratched me across the arm. 

“Ow!” I dropped Bubba. He ran away. 

It felt very familiar. And painful. 

“Michael, what were you doing to that cat?” Mom demanded. 

“Nothing! He scratched me!” 

“Stop teasing him, and he won’t scratch you,” Mom scolded. 

The doorbell rang. 

Oh, no. 

Mona, Ceecee, and Rosie. The Frog Prince. 

The underwear. 

I can’t let it happen. 

But my feet started taking me upstairs. I was walking like a robot to 
my room. 

Why am I doing this? I asked myself. 

I’ll get out my frog costume. The zipper will be stuck. 



Tara will open the door, and I’ll be standing there in my underpants. 
Mona will laugh her head off. I’ll want to sink through the floor. 

I know all this will happen. 

So why am I doing it? 

Can’t I stop myself? 



11 


Don’t go upstairs, I begged myself. Don’t go to your room. 

You don’t have to do this. 

There must be a way to stop it, to control it. 

I forced myself to turn around. I walked back down the steps. I sat 
down on the third step. 

Tara answered the door, and soon the girls stood before me in the 
foyer. 

Okay, I thought. I’m controlling it. Already things are happening 
differently from before. 

“Michael, where’s your costume?” Mona asked. “I really want to see 
what your costume looks like.” 

“Uh, no you don’t,” I said, shrinking a little. “It’s really ugly, and I 
don’t want to scare you girls—” 

“Don’t be a jerk, Michael,” Ceecee said. “Why would we be scared by 
a stupid frog costume?” 

“And, anyway, I want to rehearse with it,” Mona added. “I don’t want 
to see the costume for the first time onstage. I’ll need to be prepared for it. I 
need to practice with the costume—and you in it.” 

“Come on, Michael,” Tara put in. “Show them the costume. I want to 
see it, too.” 

I flashed her a dirty look. I knew what she had in mind. 

“No,” I insisted. “I can’t do that.” 

“Why not?” Mona demanded. 

“I just can’t.” 

“He’s shy!” Rosie exclaimed. 

“He’s embarrassed,” Tara added. 

“No, it’s not that,” I said. “It’s just that... it’s awfully hot in that 
costume, and—” 

Mona leaned close to me. I smelled something sweet, like 
strawberries. It must’ve been the shampoo she used. “Come on, Michael,” 
she said. “For me?” 

“No.” 



She stamped her foot. “I won’t rehearse our scenes unless you put on 
that costume!” 

I sighed. I didn’t see any way out of it. 

Mona wouldn’t leave me alone until I put on that frog costume. 

I gave in. “Okay.” 

“Hurray!” Tara cried. I gave her another dirty look. 

All right, I thought. I may have to put on the costume. But that doesn’t 
mean the girls have to see me in my underwear. 

I can still keep that from happening. 

I trudged up to my room. But this time, I locked the door. 

Now try to embarrass me, Tara, I thought. You can’t outsmart Michael 
Webster. No way. 

The door was locked. I felt sure I was safe. 

I took off my jeans and my shirt. I dragged the frog costume out of the 
closet. 

I tugged on the zipper. It was stuck. 

Just like the last time. 

But this time it’s okay, I told myself. The door is locked. I have 
privacy. 

Then the door flew open. 

I stood helplessly in my underwear. Mona, Rosie, and Ceecee stared at 
me. Then they screamed and started laughing. 

“Tara!” I yelled. “The door was locked!” 

“No, it wasn’t,” Tara replied. “The lock’s broken, remember?” 

“No!” I cried. “Dad fixed it... he fixed it...” 

I tried to remember when Dad had fixed the lock on my bedroom door. 
Oh, right. 

It was after the underwear nightmare. On my birthday. 

So it hadn’t happened yet. 

How was I supposed to keep all this straight? 

Oh, no, I thought. I’m doomed. 

Time is all messed up. And I have no way of stopping it. 

I began to shake. This was too frightening. 

Where would it end? I had no idea. It was getting scarier by the 
minute. 



I could hardly eat dinner that night. I’d eaten it before, of course, and hadn’t 
liked it the first time. Peas, carrots, and mushrooms. Over brown rice. 

I picked at the rice and the carrots. I never eat peas. I slipped them into 
my napkin when Mom and Dad weren’t looking. 

I watched Mom, Dad, and Tara eat dinner as if nothing were wrong. 
They sat calmly around the table, saying the same things they’d said last 
time. 

Mom and Dad must notice that something is weird, I thought. They 
must. 

So why don’t they say anything about it? 

I waited for Dad to finish telling us about his day at work. Then I 
brought up the subject again. I decided to take it slowly. 

“Mom? Dad? Doesn’t this dinner seem a little bit familiar?” 

“I’ll say,” Dad replied. “It reminds me of the lunch we ate at that 
vegetarian restaurant last month. Ugh.” 

Mom glared at him, then at me. “What are you trying to tell us, 
Michael?” she said frostily. “Are you tired of eating healthy food?” 

“I am,” Dad said. 

“Me, too,” Tara chimed in. 

“No. No way,” I insisted. “You don’t understand. I don’t mean that 
we’ve eaten food like this before. I mean that we have eaten this very meal 
before. We’re eating it twice.” 

Dad frowned. “No weird theories at the dinner table, please, Michael.” 

They weren’t getting it. I plowed ahead. “It’s not just this dinner. It’s 
this whole day. Haven’t you noticed? We’re doing everything over! Time is 
going backwards!” 

“Shut up, Michael,” Tara said. “This is so boring. Can’t we talk about 
something else?” 

“Tara,” Mom scolded, “don’t say ‘shut up’.” She turned to me. “Have 
you been reading those comic books again?” 

I grew very frustrated. “You’re not listening to me!” I cried. 
“Tomorrow is going to be yesterday, and the day after that will be the day 
before! Everything is going backwards!” 

Mom and Dad exchanged glances. They seemed to be sharing a secret. 

They do know something, I thought with excitement. They know 
something, but they’re afraid to tell me. 



Mom gazed at me very seriously. “All right, Michael. We might as 
well tell you,” she said. “We’re all caught in a time warp, and there’s 
nothing we can do about it.” 



12 


Mom pushed back her chair. She walked backwards to the stove. She 
started dishing rice from her plate into the pot on the stove. 

“Yenoh, ecir erom?” she asked Dad. 

Huh? 

“Esaelp, sey,” Dad replied. 

“Oot, em,” Tara said. She spit some rice out on her fork and dumped it 
back on her plate. She was eating backwards! 

Dad stood up and walked backwards to Mom. Then Tara skipped 
backwards around the kitchen table. 

They were all talking and moving backwards. We really were in a time 
warp! 

“Hey!” I cried. “It’s true!” 

Why wasn’t I talking backwards, too? 

“Norom,” Tara said. 

She cracked up first. Then Dad started laughing. Then Mom. 

I finally caught on. It was a joke. “You—you’re all horrible !” I cried. 

That made them laugh even more. 

“I was wondering when you’d figure it out,” Tara sneered. 

They all sat down at the table again. Mom couldn’t help grinning. 
“We’re sorry, Michael. We didn’t mean to make fun of you.” 

“Yes we did!” Tara exclaimed. 

I stared at them in horror. 

This was the most terrible thing that had ever happened to me. And my 
parents thought it was a big joke. 

Then Dad said, “Michael, did you ever hear of dejr vu?” 

I shook my head. 

“It’s when something happens to you and you have the feeling it’s 
happened before,” he explained. “Everyone feels that way once in a while. 
It’s nothing to be afraid of.” 

“Maybe you’re nervous about something,” Mom added. “Like your 
birthday coming up. I’ll bet you’re a little nervous about turning twelve, 



right? And planning your party and everything?” 

“Not really,” I protested. “I know that feeling. But this isn’t the same 
thing! This is—” 

“Say, Mike,” Dad interrupted. “Wait till you see what I got you for 
your birthday. You’re going to flip! It’s a big surprise.” 

No, it isn’t, I thought unhappily. 

It’s not a surprise at all. You’ve given me that birthday present twice 
already. How many times are you going to give me that stupid bike? 

“Mom, Michael is hiding peas in his napkin again,” Tara ratted. 

I smushed the peas up in my napkin and threw it in her face. 

When I went to school the next morning, I wasn’t sure what day it was. It 
was getting hard to keep track. My classes, my lunch, the stuff my friends 
said all seemed familiar. But nothing unusual happened. It could have been 
any day of the school year. 

I played basketball after school that day, as usual. While I was playing, 
a funny feeling crept over me. 

A bad feeling. 

I’ve already played this game, I realized. And it didn’t end well. 

But I kept on playing, waiting to see what would happen. 

My team won. We collected our packs. 

Then Kevin Flowers yelled, “Where’s my Blue Devils cap?” 

Oh, yeah, I remembered. 

This was that basketball game. How could I forget? 

Good old Tara. She’s done it again! “Nobody leaves until we find that 
cap!” I shut my eyes and handed over my pack. I knew what was coming. 
Might as well get it over with. 

Getting pounded to a pulp by Kevin Flowers hurt a lot. But at least the pain 
didn’t last long. 

The next morning when I woke up, it was all gone. The pain, the 
scabs, the bruises, everything. 

What day is it today? I wondered. It must be a few days before Kevin 
beat me up. 

I hope I won’t have to live through that a third time. 

But what will happen today? 



As I walked to school, I searched for clues. I tried to remember what 
had happened a day or two before Kevin beat me up. 

A math test? Maybe. I hoped not. But at least it would be easier this 
time around. I could even try to remember what the problems were and look 
up all the answers before the test! 

I was a little late today. Did that mean something? I wondered. Would 
I get into trouble? 

My homeroom teacher, Ms. Jacobson, had closed the classroom door. I 
opened it. The classroom was already full. 

Ms. Jacobson didn’t look up when I walked in. 

I must not be that late, I thought. Guess I won’t get in trouble after all. 

I started for the back of the room, where I usually sit. As I passed 
through the rows of desks, I glanced at the other kids. 

Who’s that guy? I wondered, staring at a chubby, blond kid I’d never 
seen before. 

Then I noticed a pretty girl with cornrows and three earrings in one 
ear. I’d never seen her before, either. 

I stared at all the faces in the classroom. None of the kids looked 
familiar. 

What’s going on? I wondered, feeling panic choke my throat. 

I don’t know any of these kids! 

Where’s my class? 



13 


Ms. Jacobson finally turned around. She stared at me. 

“Hey,” the blond kid shouted. “What’s a third-grader doing in here?” 

Everybody laughed. I couldn’t understand why. 

A third-grader? Who was he talking about? 

I didn’t see any third-graders. 

“You’re in the wrong classroom, young man,” Ms. Jacobson said to 
me. She opened the door, showing me the way out. 

“I think your room is downstairs on the second floor,” she added. 

“Thanks,” I said. I didn’t know what she was talking about. But I 
decided to go along with her. 

She shut the door behind her. I could hear the kids laughing behind the 
door. I hurried down the hall to the boy’s bathroom. I needed to splash some 
cold water on my face. Maybe that would help. 

I turned on the cold water tap. Then I glanced in the mirror, very 
quickly. 

The mirror seems a little higher than usual, I thought. 

I washed my hands in the cold water and splashed some on my face. 

The sink seems higher, too, I noticed. Strange. 

Am I in the right school? 

I glanced in the mirror again—and got the shock of my life. 

Was that me? 

I looked so young. 

I ran my hand through my short, brushlike brown hair. That dopey 
crew cut I’d had ah through the third grade. 

I don’t believe it, I thought, shaking my head. I’m a third-grader again! 

I’ve got my third-grade hair. My third-grade clothes. My third-grade 
body. 

But my seventh-grade brain. I think. 

Third grade. 

That means I’ve slipped back four years—in one night. 

My whole body started to tremble. I grabbed on to the sink to steady 



myself. 

I was suddenly paralyzed with fear. 

Things were speeding up. Now I lost whole years in one night! How 
old will I be when I wake up tomorrow? I asked myself. 

Time was going backward faster and faster—and I still hadn’t found a 
way to stop it! 

I shut off the water and dried my face with a paper towel. I didn’t 
know what to do. I was so frightened, I couldn’t think straight. 

I walked back to my third-grade classroom. 

First I glanced through the window of the classroom door. There she 
was, Mrs. Harris, my old third-grade teacher. I’d know that helmet of silver 
hair anywhere. 

And I knew, as soon as I saw her, that I really had gone back in time 
four years. 

Because old Mrs. Harris shouldn’t have been in school that day. She’d 
retired two years earlier. When I was in fifth grade. 

I opened the door and stepped into the classroom. 

Mrs. Harris didn’t bat an eye. “Take a seat, Michael,” she commanded. 
She never mentioned the fact that I was late. 

Mrs. Harris always liked me. 

I checked out the other kids in the class. I saw Henry, Josh, Ceecee, 
and Mona, all little third-graders now. 

Mona wore her shiny brown hair in two braids. Ceecee wore hers in 
one of those stupid side ponytails. 

Josh didn’t have pimples on his forehead, I noticed. Henry had a 
sticker on the back of his hand—Donatello, from the Teenage Mutant Ninja 
Turtles. 

It was my class all right. 

I sat down at an empty desk in the back. My old desk. Right next to 
Henry. 

I glanced at him. He was picking his nose. 

Gross. I’d forgotten about that part of being a third-grader. 

“Michael, we’re on page 33 in your spelling book,” Mrs. Harris 
informed me. 

I reached inside the desk and found my spelling book. I opened it to 
page 33. 



“These are the words you’ll need to know for tomorrow’s spelling 
test,” Mrs. Harris announced. She wrote the words on the board, even 
though we could read them right there in the spelling book: Taste, sense, 
grandmother, easy, happiness. 

“Man,” Henry whispered to me. “These words are tough. Look how 
many letters there are in grandmother !” 

I didn’t know what to say to him. On my last spelling test (when I was 
still in the seventh grade), I’d had to spell psychology. Grandmother wasn’t 
a big challenge for me anymore. 

I zoned out for most of the day. I’d always wished school were easier, 
but not this easy. It was so babyish and boring. 

Lunch and recess were even worse. Josh chewed up a banana and 
stuck his tongue out at me. Henry painted his face with chocolate pudding. 

Finally the school day ended. I dragged my little third-grade body 
home. 

When I opened the front door, I heard a horrible screech. Bubba, just a 
kitten now, raced past me and out the door. Tara toddled after him. 

“Don’t tease the cat,” I scolded her. 

“You’re dumb,” she replied. 

I stared at Tara. She was three years old. 

I tried to remember: Had I liked her better when she was three? 

“Give me a piggyback!” she cried, tugging on my backpack. 

“Get off me,” I said. 

My pack dropped to the floor. I stooped to pick it up. She grabbed a 
hunk of my hair and yanked it. 

“Ow!” I screamed. 

She laughed and laughed. 

“That hurt!” I yelled, and shoved her—just as Mom stepped into the 
foyer. 

She rushed to Tara’s side. “Michael, don’t shove your sister. She’s only 
a little girl!” 

I stormed off to my room to think. 

No, I hadn ’t liked Tara better when she was three. She was as much of 
a brat as ever. 

She was born a brat, and she’d never grow out of it, I knew. She’d be a 
brat for the rest of her life, driving me crazy even when we’re old. 



If we ever get to be old, I thought with a shudder. We’ll never grow up 
at this rate. 

What am I going to do? I worried. I’ve slipped back in time four years! 
If I don’t do something fast, I’ll be a baby again. 

And then what? 

A cold shiver ran down my back. 

And then what? I asked myself. 

Will I disappear completely ? 



14 


I woke up in a panic every morning. 

What day was it? What year was it? 

I had no idea. 

I climbed out of bed—it seemed farther away from the floor than it 
used to—and padded across the hall to the bathroom. 

I stared in the mirror. How old was I? Younger than I’d been the day 
before, I knew that much. 

I went back to my room and began to get dressed. Mom had left my 
clothes for the day folded on a chair in my room. 

I examined the jeans I was supposed to wear. They had a picture of a 
cowboy on the back pocket. 

Oh, yeah, I remembered. These jeans. The cowboy jeans. 

Second grade. 

That means I must be seven years old now. 

I stepped into the pants, thinking, I can’t believe I have to wear these 
stupid jeans again. 

Then I unfolded the shirt Mom had picked out for me. 

My heart sank when I saw it: A cowboy shirt—with fringe and 
everything. 

This is so embarrassing, I thought. How could I have ever let Mom do 
this to me? 

Deep down I knew that I used to like these clothes. I probably picked 
them out myself. 

But I couldn’t stand to admit that I’d ever been so stupid. 

Downstairs, Tara was still in her pajamas, watching cartoons. She was 
now two. 

When she saw me pass through the living room, she held out her arms 
to me. “Kiss! Kiss!” she called. 

She wanted me to kiss her? That didn’t seem like Tara. 

But maybe the two-year-old Tara was still sweet and innocent. Maybe, 
at two, Tara was actually likable. 



“Kiss! Kiss!” she begged. 

“Give poor Tara a kiss,” Mom called from the kitchen. “You’re her big 
brother, Michael. She looks up to you.” 

I sighed. “Okay.” 

I leaned down to give Tara a kiss on the cheek. With one chubby index 
finger, she poked me in the eye. 

“Ow!” I shrieked. 

Tara laughed. 

Same old terrible Tara, I thought as I stumbled into the kitchen, one 
hand over my sore eye. 

She was born bad! 

This time, at school, I knew which classroom to go to. 

There sat all my old friends, Mona and everybody, younger than ever. 
I’d forgotten how dopey everybody used to look when we were little. 

I sat through another dull day of learning stuff I already knew. 
Subtraction. How to read books with really big print. Perfecting my capital 
L. 

At least it gave me lots of time to think. 

Every day I tried to figure out what to do. But I never came up with an 
answer. 

Then I remembered Dad telling us he’d been wanting the cuckoo clock 
for fifteen years. 

Fifteen years! That’s it! The clock must be at that antique store! 

I’ll go find the clock, I decided. I couldn’t wait for school to end that 

day. 

I figured if I could turn the cuckoo around, time would go forward 
again. I knew the dial that showed the year must be going backwards, too. 
All I had to do was reset the date on the clock to the right year, and I’d be 
twelve again. 

I missed being twelve. Seven-year-olds don’t get away with much. 
Someone’s always watching you. 

When the school day ended, I started down the block toward my 
house. I knew the crossing guard was watching me, making sure I’d get 
home safely. 

But at the second block I dashed around the corner to the bus stop. I 
hoped the crossing guard hadn’t seen me. 



I stood behind a tree, trying not to be seen. 

A few minutes later, a bus pulled over. The doors opened with a hiss. I 
stepped aboard. 

The bus driver eyed me strangely. “Aren’t you a little young to be 
riding the bus by yourself?” he asked me. 

“Mind your own business,” I replied. 

He looked startled, so I added, “I’m meeting Daddy at his office. 
Mommy said it was okay.” 

He nodded and let the doors slide shut. 

I started to put three quarters in the coin slot, but the driver stopped me 
after two. 

“Whoa, there, buddy,” he said, pressing the third quarter into my palm. 
“Fare’s only fifty cents. Keep this quarter for a phone call.” 

“Oh, yeah. Right.” I’d forgotten. They raised the bus fare to 75 cents 
when I was eleven. But now I was only seven. I put the quarter in my 
pocket. 

The bus pulled away from the curb and chugged downtown. 

I remembered hearing Dad say that Anthony’s Antiques and Stuff was 
across the street from his office. I got off the bus at Dad’s block. 

I hoped Dad wouldn’t see me. I knew I’d be in big trouble if he did. 

I wasn’t allowed to ride the bus by myself when I was seven. 

I hurried past Dad’s building and crossed the street. On the corner 
stood a construction site; just a pile of bricks and rubble, really. Further 
down the block I saw a black sign with Anthony’s Antiques and Stuff 
painted on it in gold letters. 

My heart began to pound. 

I’m almost there, I thought. Soon everything will be all right. 

I’ll just walk into the store and find the clock. Then, when no one’s 
looking, I’ll turn the cuckoo around and fix the year. 

I won’t have to worry about waking up tomorrow morning as a three- 
year-old or something. My life will go back to normal. 

Life will seem so easy, I told myself, when time is moving forward the 
way it’s supposed to. Even with Tara around! 

I gazed through the big plate-glass window of the shop. There it stood, 
right in the window. The clock. 

My palms began to sweat, I felt so excited. 



I hurried to the shop door and turned the handle. 

It wouldn’t move. I jiggled it harder. 

The door was locked. 

Then I noticed a sign, tucked in the bottom corner of the door. 
It said, CLOSED FOR VACATION. 



15 


I let out a howl of frustration. “NOOO!” I cried. Tears sprang to my eyes. 
“No! Not after all this.” 

I banged my head against the door. I couldn’t stand it. 

Closed for vacation. 

How could I have such terrible luck? 

How long was Anthony planning to be on vacation? I wondered. How 
long will the shop be closed? 

By the time it reopens, I could be a baby! 

I gritted my teeth and thought, there’s no way I’m letting that happen. 
No way! 

I’ve got to do something. Anything. 

I pressed my nose against the shop window. The cuckoo clock was 
standing there, two feet in front of me. 

And I couldn’t get to it. 

The window stood between me and that clock. 

The window... 

Normally, I would never think of doing what I decided to do at that 
moment. 

But I was desperate. I had to reach that clock. 

It really was a matter of life and death! 

I strolled down the block to the construction site, trying to look casual. 
Trying not to look like a kid who was planning to break a shop window. 

I stuffed my hands in the pockets of my cowboy jeans and whistled. I 
was sort of grateful to be wearing this stupid cowboy outfit after all. It 
made me look innocent. 

Who would suspect a seven-year-old in a cowboy suit of trying to 
break into an antique shop? 

I kicked around a little dirt at the construction site. Kicked a few rocks. 
Nobody seemed to be working there. 

Slowly I made my way over to a pile of bricks. I glanced around to see 
if anybody saw me. 



The coast was clear. 

I picked up a brick and hefted it in my hand. It was very heavy. It 
wouldn’t be easy for me, in my little second-grade body, to throw it far. 

But I didn’t have to throw it far. Just through the window. 

I tried stuffing the brick in my pants pocket, but it was too big. So I 
carried it in both hands back to the shop. 

I tried to look as if it were perfectly normal for a boy to be carrying a 
brick down the street. 

A few adults quickly passed by. No one gave me a second glance. 

I stood in front of the shiny plate-glass window, weighing the brick in 
my hand. I wondered if a burglar alarm would go off when I broke the 
window. 

Would I be arrested? 

Maybe it wouldn’t matter. If I made time go to the present, I’d escape 
the police. 

Be brave, I told myself. Go for it! 

With both hands, I raised the brick over my head... 

.. .and someone grabbed me from behind. 



16 


“Help!” I shouted. I spun around. “Dad!” 

“Michael, what are you doing here?” Dad demanded. “Are you by 
yourself?” 

I let the brick fall to the sidewalk. He didn’t seem to see it. 

“I—I wanted to surprise you,” I lied. “I wanted to come visit you after 
school.” 

He stared at me as if he didn’t quite understand. So I added, for good 
measure, “I missed you, Daddy.” 

He smiled. “You missed me?” He was touched. I could tell. 

“How did you get here?” he asked. “On the bus?” 

I nodded. 

“You know you’re not allowed to ride the bus by yourself,” he said. 
But he didn’t sound angry. I knew that line about missing him would soften 
him up. 

Meanwhile, I still had the same major problem—getting my hands on 
the cuckoo clock. 

Could Dad help me? Would he? I was willing to try anything. “Dad,” I 
said, “that clock—” 

Dad put his arm around me. “Isn’t it a beauty? I’ve been admiring it 
for years.” 

“Dad, I’ve got to get to the clock,” I insisted. “It’s very, very 
important! Do you know when the store will open again? We’ve got to get 
that clock somehow!” 

Dad misunderstood me. He patted me on the head and said, “I know 
how you feel, Michael. I wish I could have the clock right now. But I can’t 
afford it. Maybe some day...” 

He pulled me away from the shop. “Come on—let’s go home. I 
wonder what’s for supper tonight?” 

I didn’t say another word all the way home in the car. All I could think 
about was the clock—and what would happen to me next. 

How old will I be when I wake up tomorrow? I wondered. 

Or how young? 



17 


When I opened my eyes the next morning, everything had changed. 

The walls were painted baby blue. The bedspread and the curtains 
matched. The material was printed with bouncing kangaroos. On one wall 
hung a needlepoint picture of a cow. 

It wasn’t my room, but it looked familiar. 

Then I felt a lump in the bed. I reached under the kangaroo covers and 
pulled out Harold, my old teddy bear. 

I slowly understood. I was back in my old bedroom. 

How had I ended up there? It was Tara’s room now. 

I jumped out of bed. I was wearing Smurf pajamas. 

I swear I don’t remember ever liking Smurfs that much. 

I ran to the bathroom to look in the mirror. 

How old was I now? 

I couldn’t tell. I had to stand on the toilet seat to see my face. 

A bad sign. 

Yikes. I looked about five years old! 

I hopped off the toilet seat and hurried downstairs. 

“Hello, Mikey,” Mom said, squeezing me and giving me a big kiss. 

“Hi, Mommy,” I said. I couldn’t believe how babyish my voice 
sounded. 

Dad sat at the kitchen table, drinking coffee. He put down his mug and 
held out his arms. “Come give Daddy a good morning kiss,” he said. 

I sighed and forced myself to run into his arms and kiss him on the 
cheek. I’d forgotten how many stupid things little kids have to put up with. 

I ran out of the kitchen on my little five-year-old legs, through the 
living room, into the den, and back to the kitchen. Something was missing. 

No, someone was missing. 

Tara. 

“Sit still for a minute, sweetie,” Mom said, scooping me up and 
plopping me into a chair. “Want some cereal?” 

“Where’s Tara?” I demanded. 



“Who?” Mom replied. 

“Tara,” I repeated. 

Mom glanced at Dad. Dad shrugged. 

“You know,” I persisted. “My little sister.” 

Mom smiled. “Oh, Tara,” she said, seeming to understand at last. 

She glanced at Dad and mouthed, “Invisible friend.” 

“Huh?” Dad said out loud. “He has an invisible friend?” 

Mom frowned at him and gave me a bowl of cereal. “What does your 
friend Tara look like, Mikey?” 

I didn’t answer her. I was too shocked to speak. 

They don’t know who I’m talking about! I realized. 

Tara doesn’t exist. She hasn’t been born yet! 

For a brief moment, I felt a thrill. No Tara! I could go through this 
whole day without ever seeing, hearing, or smelling Tara the Terrible! How 
totally awesome! 

But then the real meaning of this sank in. 

One Webster kid had disappeared. 

I was next. 

After I’d finished my cereal, Mom took me upstairs to get dressed. She put 
on my shirt and pants and socks and shoes. She didn’t tie the shoes, though. 

“Okay, Mikey,” she said. “Let’s practice tying your shoes. Remember 
how we did it yesterday?” 

She took my shoelaces in her fingers and, as she tied them, chanted, 
“The bunny hops around the tree and ducks under the bush. Remember?” 

She sat back to watch me try to tie my other shoe. I could tell by the 
look on her face she didn’t expect me to get very far. 

I bent over and easily tied the shoe. I didn’t have time to fool around 
with this stuff. 

Mom stared at me in amazement. 

“Come on, Mom, let’s get going,” I said, straightening up. 

“Mikey!” Mom cried. “You did it! You tied your shoe for the first 
time!” She grabbed me and hugged me hard. “Wait till I tell Daddy!” 

I followed her downstairs, rolling my eyes. 

So I tied my shoe. Big deal! 

“Honey!” Mom called. “Mikey tied his shoe—all by himself!” 



“Hey!” Dad cried happily. He held up one hand so I could slap him 
five. “That’s my big boy!” 

This time I saw him mouth to Mom: “Took him long enough!” 

I was too worried to be insulted. 

Mom walked me to kindergarten. She told my teacher that I’d learned 
to tie my shoe. Big excitement all around. 

I had to sit around that stupid kindergarten all morning, finger¬ 
painting, and singing the ABC song. 

I knew I had to get back to that antique store. It was all I could think 
about. 

I’ve got to change that cuckoo clock, I thought desperately. Who 
knows? Tomorrow I might not know how to walk. 

But how would I get there? It had been hard enough to get downtown 
as a second-grader. As a kindergartner, it would be nearly impossible. 

And, besides, even if I could get on the bus without anybody asking 
questions, I didn’t have any money with me. 

I glanced at the teacher’s purse. Maybe I could steal a couple of 
quarters from her. She’d probably never know. 

But if she caught me, I’d be in really big trouble. And I had enough 
trouble now. 

I decided to sneak on to the bus somehow. I knew I could find a way. 

When the kindergarten torture was finally over for the day, I raced out 
of the building to catch the bus— 

—and bumped smack into Mom. 

“Hi, Mikey,” she said. “Did you have a nice day?” 

I forgot that she picked me up every day from kindergarten. 

She took my hand in her iron grip. There was no escape. 



18 


At least I’m here, I thought when I woke up the next morning. At least I’m 
still alive. 

But I’m four years old. 

Time is running out. 

Mom waltzed into my room, singing, “Good morning to you, good 
morning to you, good morning dear Mikey, good morning to you! Ready 
for nursery school?” 

Yuck. Nursery school. 

Things kept getting worse and worse. 

I couldn’t take it anymore. Mom dropped me off at nursery school 
with a kiss and her usual, “Have a nice day, Mikey!” 

I stalked to the nearest corner and sat. I watched the other little kids 
play. I refused to do anything. No singing. No painting. No sandbox. No 
games for me. 

“Michael, what’s the matter with you today?” the teacher, Ms. Sarton, 
asked. “Don’t you feel well?” 

“I feel okay,” I told her. 

“Well, then, why aren’t you playing?” She studied me for a minute, 
then added, “I think you need to play.” 

Without asking my permission or anything, she picked me up, carried 
me outside, and dumped me in the sandbox. 

“Mona will play with you,” she said brightly. 

Mona was very cute when she was four. Why didn’t I remember that? 

Mona didn’t say anything to me. She concentrated on the sand igloo 
she was building—at least I think it was supposed to be an igloo. It was 
round, anyway. I started to say hi to her, but suddenly felt shy. 

Then I caught myself. Why should I feel bashful with a four-year-old 

girl? 

Anyway, I reasoned, she hasn’t seen me in my underwear yet. That 
won’t happen for another eight years. 

“Hi, Mona,” I said. I cringed when I heard the babyish nursery school 
voice that came out of my mouth. But everyone else seemed to be used to 



it. 

Mona turned up her nose. “Eeew,” she sniffed. “A boy. I hate boys.” 

“Well,” I squeaked in my little boy voice, “if that’s the way you feel, 
forget I said anything.” 

Mona stared at me now, as if she didn’t quite understand what I had 

said. 

“You’re stupid,” she said. 

I shrugged and began to draw swirls in the sand with my chubby little 
finger. Mona dug a moat around her sand igloo. Then she stood up. “Don’t 
let anybody smash my sand castle,” she ordered. 

So it wasn’t an igloo. Guess I was wrong. 

“Okay,” I agreed. 

She toddled away. A few minutes later she returned, carrying a bucket. 

She carefully poured a little water into her sand castle moat. She 
dumped the rest on my head. 

“Stupid boy!” she squealed, running away. 

I rose and shook my wet head like a dog. I felt a strange urge to burst 
into tears and run to the teacher for help, but I fought it. 

Mona stood a few yards away from me, ready to run. “Nyah nyah!” 
she taunted. “Come and get me, Mikey!” 

I pushed my wet hair out of my face and stared at Mona. 

“You can’t catch me!” she called. 

What could I do? I had to chase after her. 

I began to run. Mona screamed and raced to a tree by the playground 
fence. Another girl stood there. Was that Ceecee? 

She wore thick glasses with pink rims, and underneath, a pink 
eyepatch. 

I’d forgotten about that eyepatch. She’d had to wear it until halfway 
through first grade. 

Mona screamed again and clutched at Ceecee. Ceecee clutched her 
back and screamed, too. 

I stopped in front of the tree. “Don’t worry. I won’t hurt you,” I 
assured them. 

“Yes you will!” Mona squealed. “Help!” 

I sat down on the grass to prove I didn’t want to hurt them. 

“He’s hurting us! He’s hurting us!” the girls shouted. They unclutched 



their hands and jumped on top of me. 

“Ow!” I cried. 

“Hold his arms!” Mona ordered. Ceecee obeyed. Mona started tickling 
me under the arms. 

“Stop it!” I begged. It was torture. “Stop it!” 

“No!” Mona cried. “That’s what you get for trying to catch us!” 

“I... didn’t...” I had trouble getting the words out while she tickled 
me. “I didn’t... try to...” 

“Yes you did!” Mona insisted. 

I’d forgotten that Mona used to be so bossy. It made me think twice. If 
I ever make it back to my real age, I thought, maybe I won’t like Mona so 
much anymore. 

“Please stop,” I begged again. 

“I’ll stop,” Mona said. “But only if you promise something.” 

“What?” 

“You have to climb that tree.” She pointed to the tree by the fence. 
“Okay?” 

I stared at the tree. Climbing it wouldn’t be such a big deal. “Okay,” I 
agreed. “Just get off me!” 

Mona stood up. Ceecee let go of my arms. 

I climbed to my feet and brushed the grass off my pants. 

“You’re scared,” Mona taunted. 

“I am not!” I replied. What a brat! She was almost as bad as Tara! 

Now Mona and Ceecee chanted, “Mikey is scared. Mikey is scared.” 

I ignored them. I grabbed the lowest branch of the tree and hauled 
myself up. It was harder than I thought it would be. My four-year-old body 
wasn’t very athletic. 

“Mikey is scared. Mikey is scared.” 

“Shut up!” I yelled down at them. “Can’t you see that I’m climbing the 
stupid tree? It doesn’t make sense to tease me about being scared.” 

They both gave me that blank look Mona had given me before. As if 
they didn’t understand what I was saying. 

“Mikey is scared,” they chanted again. 

I sighed and kept climbing. My hands were so small, it was hard to 
grip the branches. One of my feet slipped. 

Then a terrible thought popped into my head. 



Wait a minute. 

I shouldn’t be doing this. 

Isn’t nursery school the year I broke my arm? 
YEEEEOOOOOOWWWWW! 



19 


Morning again. 

I yawned and opened my eyes. I shook my left arm, the one I broke 
climbing that stupid tree the day before. 

The arm felt fine. Perfectly normal. Completely healed. 

I must have gone back in time again, I thought. That’s the good part 
about this messed-up time thing: I didn’t have to wait for my arm to heal. 

I wondered how far back I went. 

The sun poured in through the window of Tara’s—or my—room. It 
cast a weird shadow across my face: a striped shadow. 

I tried to roll out of bed. My body slammed against something. 

What was that? I rolled back to look. 

Bars! 

I was surrounded by bars! Was I in jail? 

I tried to sit up so I could see better. It wasn’t as easy as usual. My 
stomach muscles seemed to have grown weak. 

At last I managed to sit up and look around. 

I wasn’t in jail. I was in a crib! 

Crumpled up beside me was my old yellow blankie with the 
embroidered duck on it. I sat beside a small pile of stuffed animals. I was 
wearing a tiny white undershirt, and— 

Oh, no. 

I shut my eyes in horror. 

It can’t be. Please don’t let it be true! I prayed. 

I opened my eyes and checked to see if my prayer had come true. 

It hadn’t. 

I was wearing diapers. 

Diapers! 

How young am I now? How far back in time did I go? I wondered. 

“Are you awake, Mikey?” 

Mom came into the room. She looked pretty young. I didn’t remember 
ever seeing her this young before. 



“Did you get lots of sleep, sweetie pie?” Mom asked. She clearly 
expected no answer from me. Instead, she shoved a bottle of juice into my 
mouth. 

Yuck! A bottle! 

I pulled it out of my mouth and clumsily threw it down. 

Mom picked it up. “No, no,” she said patiently. “Bad little Mikey. 
Drink your bottle now. Come on.” 

She slid it back into my mouth. I was thirsty, so I drank the juice. 
Drinking from a bottle wasn’t that bad, once you got used to it. 

Mom left the room. I let the bottle drop. 

I had to know how old I was. I had to find out how much time I had 

left. 

I grabbed the bars of the crib and pulled myself to my feet. 

Okay, I thought. I can stand. 

I took a step. I couldn’t control my leg muscles very well. I toddled 
around the crib. 

I can walk, I realized. Unsteadily, but at least I can walk. 

I must be about one year old! 

I fell just then and banged my head against the side of the crib. Tears 
welled in my eyes. I started wailing, bawling. 

Mom ran into the room. “What’s the matter, Mikey? What happened?” 
She picked me up and started patting me on the back. 

I couldn’t stop crying. It was really embarrassing. 

What am I going to do? I thought desperately. In one night, I went 
back in time three years! 

I’m only one year old now. How old will I be tomorrow? 

A little shiver ran down my tiny spine. 

I’ve got to find a way to make time go forward again—today! I told 
myself. 

But what can I do? 

I’m not even in nursery school anymore. 

I’m a baby! 



20 


Mom said we were going out. She wanted to dress me. Then she uttered the 
dreaded words. 

“I bet I know what’s bothering you, Mikey. You probably need your 
diaper changed.” 

“No!” I cried. “No!” 

“Oh, yes you do, Mikey. Come on...” 

I don’t like to think about what happened after that. I’d rather block it 
out of my memory. 

I’m sure you understand. 

When the worst was over, Mom plopped me down in a playpen—more 
bars—while she bustled around the house. 

I shook a rattle. I batted at a mobile hanging over my head. I watched 
it spin around. 

I pressed buttons on a plastic toy. Different noises came out when I 
pressed different buttons. A squeak. A honk. A moo. 

I was bored out of my mind. 

Then Mom picked me up again. She bundled me into a warm sweater 
and a dopey little knit cap. Baby blue. 

“Want to see Daddy?” she cooed at me. “Want to see Daddy and go 
shopping?” 

“Da-da,” I replied. 

I’d planned to say, “If you don’t take me to Anthony’s Antiques, I’ll 
throw myself out of my crib and crack my head open.” 

But I couldn’t talk. It was so frustrating! 

Mom carried me out to the car. She strapped me into a baby seat in the 
back. I tried to say, “Not so tight, Mom!” It came out, “No no no no no!” 

“Don’t give me a hard time now, Mikey,” Mom said sharply. “I know 
you don’t like your car seat, but it’s the law.” She gave the strap an extra 
tug. 

Then she drove into town. 

At least there’s a chance, I thought. If we’re going to meet Dad, we’ll 
be near the antique store. Maybe, just maybe. 



Mom parked the car outside Dad’s office building. She unstrapped me 
from the car seat. 

I could move again. But not for long. She pulled a stroller out of the 
trunk, unfolded it, and strapped me in. 

Being a baby really is like being a prisoner, I thought as she wheeled 
me across the sidewalk. I never realized how awful it is! 

It was lunchtime. A stream of workers flowed out of the office 
building. Dad appeared and gave Mom a kiss. 

He squatted down to tickle me under the chin. “There’s my little boy!” 
he said. 

“Can you say hi to your daddy?” Mom prompted me. 

“Hi, Da-da,” I gurgled. 

“Hi, Mikey,” Dad said fondly. But when he stood up, he spoke quietly 
to Mom, as if I couldn’t hear. “Shouldn’t he being saying more words by 
now, honey? Ted Jackson’s kid is Mikey’s age, and he can say whole 
sentences. He can say ‘lightbulb’, and ‘kitchen’, and ‘I want my teddy 
bear.’” 

“Don’t start that again,” Mom whispered angrily. “Mikey is not slow.” 

I squirmed in my stroller, fuming. Slow! Who said I was slow? 

“I didn’t say he was slow, honey,” Dad went on. “I only said—” 

“Yes you did,” Mom insisted. “Yes you did! The other night, when he 
stuffed those peas up his nose, you said you thought we should have him 
tested!” 

I stuffed peas up my nose? I shuddered. 

Sure, stuffing peas up your nose is stupid. But I was only a baby. 
Wasn’t Dad getting carried away? 

I thought so. 

I wished I could tell them I would turn out all right—at least up to the 
age of twelve. I mean, I’m no genius, but I get mostly A’s and B’s. 

“Can we discuss this later?” Dad said. “I’ve only got an hour for 
lunch. If we’re going to find a dining room table, we’d better get moving.” 

“You brought it up,” Mom sniffed. She wheeled the stroller smartly 
around and began to cross the street. Dad followed us. 

I let my eyes rove along the storefronts across the street. An apartment 
building. A pawnshop. A coffee shop. 

Then I found what I was looking for: Anthony’s Antiques and Stuff. 



My heart leaped. The store still existed! I kept my eyes glued to that 

sign. 

Please take me in there, Mom, I silently prayed. Please please please! 
Mom steered me down the street. Past the apartment building. Past the 
pawnshop. Past the coffee shop. 

We stopped in front of Anthony’s. Dad stood in front of the window, 
hands in his pockets, gazing through the glass. Mom and I pulled up beside 
him. 

I couldn’t believe it. Finally, after all this time—some good luck! 

I stared through the window, searching for it. 

The clock. 

The window display was set up like an old-fashioned living room. My 
eyes roamed over the furniture: a wooden bookcase, a fringed table lamp, a 
Persian rug, an overstuffed armchair, and a clock... a table clock. Not the 
cuckoo clock. 

Not the right clock. 

My heart sank back to its normal low spot in my chest. 

It figures, I thought. Here I am, at the antique store, at last. 

And the clock isn’t here. 



21 


I felt like crying. 

I could have cried, too. Easily. 

After all, I was a baby. People expected me to cry. 

But I didn’t. Even though I looked like a baby, I was a twelve-year-old 
inside. I still had my pride. 

Dad stepped to the door and held it open for Mom and me. Mom 
pushed me inside. I sat strapped into the stroller. 

The shop was jammed with old furniture. A chubby man in his forties 
strolled down the aisle toward us. 

Behind him, down at the end of the aisle, in a corner at the back of the 
shop, I saw it. The clock. The clock. 

A squeal of excitement popped out of me. I began to rock in my 
stroller. I was so close! 

“May I help you?” the man asked Mom and Dad. 

“We’re looking for a dining room table,” Mom told him. 

I had to get out of that stroller. I had to get to that clock. 

I rocked harder, but it was no good. I was strapped in. “Let me out of 
this thing!” I shouted. 

Mom and Dad turned to look at me. “What’s he saying?” Dad asked. 

“It sounded like 'La ma la ma’,” the shopkeeper suggested. 

I rocked harder than ever and screamed. 

“He hates his stroller,” Mom explained. She leaned down and 
unbuckled the straps. “I’ll hold him for a few minutes. Then he’ll quiet 
down.” 

I waited until she held me in her arms. Then I screamed again and 
wriggled as hard as I could. 

Dad’s face reddened. “Michael, what is wrong with you?” 

“Down! Down!” I yelled. 

“All right,” Mom muttered, setting me down on the floor. “Now please 
stop screaming.” 

I quieted down immediately. I tested my wobbly, chubby little legs. 



They wouldn’t get me far, but they were all I had to work with. 

“Keep an eye on him,” the shopkeeper warned. “A lot of this stuff is 
breakable.” 

Mom grabbed my hand. “Come on, Mikey. Let’s go look at some 
tables.” 

She tried to lead me to a corner of the shop where several wooden 
tables stood. I whined and squirmed, hoping to get away. Her grip was too 
tight. 

“Mikey, shhh,” she said. 

I let her drag me to the tables. I glanced up at the cuckoo clock. It was 
almost noon. 

At noon, I knew, the cuckoo would pop out. It was my only chance to 
grab the bird and turn it around. 

I tugged on Mom’s hand. She tightened her grip. 

“What do you think of this one, honey?” Dad asked her, rubbing his 
hand along a dark wood table. 

“I think that wood’s too dark for our chairs, Herman,” Mom said. 
Another table caught her eye. As she moved toward it, I tried to slip my 
hand out of hers. No go. 

I toddled after her to the second table. I shot another glance at the 
clock. The minute hand moved. 

Two minutes to twelve. 

“We can’t be too picky, honey,” Dad said. “The Bergers are coming 
over Saturday night—two days from now—for a dinner party. We can’t 
have a dinner party without a dining room table!” 

“I know that, dear. But there’s no point in buying a table we don’t 
like.” 

Dad’s voice began to rise. Mom’s mouth got that hard, set look to it. 

Aha. A fight. This was my chance. 

Dad was shouting. “Why don’t we just spread a blanket out on the 
floor and make them eat there? We’ll call it a picnic!” 

Mom finally relaxed her grip on my hand. 

I slipped away and toddled as fast as I could toward the clock. 

The clock’s minute hand moved again. 

I toddled faster. 

I heard my parents shouting at each other. “I won’t buy an ugly table, 



and that’s that!” Mom cried. 

Please don’t let them notice me, I prayed. Not yet. 

I reached the cuckoo clock at last. I stood in front of it and stared up at 
the clock. 

The cuckoo’s window was far above me, out of reach. 

The minute hand clicked again. The clock’s gong sounded. 

The cuckoo’s window slid open. The cuckoo popped out. 

It cuckooed once. 

It cuckooed twice. 

I stared up at it, helpless. 

A twelve-year-old boy trapped in a baby’s body. 

I stared grimly up at the clock. 

Somehow, I had to reach that cuckoo. 

Somehow, I had to turn it around. 



22 


Cuckoo! Cuckoo! 

Three, four. 

I knew that once it reached twelve, I was doomed. 

The cuckoo bird would disappear. 

And so would my last chance to save myself. 

In a day or so, I would disappear. Disappear forever. 

Frantic, I glanced around for a ladder, a stool, anything. 

The closest thing was a chair. 

I toddled over to the chair and pushed it toward the clock. It moved 
about an inch. 

I leaned, putting all my weight into it. I figured I weighed about 
twenty pounds. 

But it was enough. The chair began to slide across the floor. 

Cuckoo! Cuckoo! Five, six. 

I shoved the chair up against the clock. The seat of the chair came up 
to my chin. 

I tried to pull myself up onto the seat. My arms were too weak. 

I planted a baby sneaker against the chair leg. I boosted myself up. I 
grabbed a spindle at the back of the chair and heaved my body onto the 
seat. 

I made it! 

Cuckoo! Cuckoo! Seven, eight. 

I got to my knees. I got to my feet. 

I reached up to grab the cuckoo. I stretched as tall as I could. 

Cuckoo! Cuckoo! Nine, ten. 

Reaching, reaching. 

Then I heard the shopkeeper shout, “Somebody grab that baby!” 



23 


I heard pounding footsteps. 

They were running to get me. 

I strained to reach the cuckoo. Just another inch... 

Cuckoo! 

Eleven. 

Mom grabbed me. She lifted me up. 

For one second, the cuckoo flashed within my reach. 

I grasped it and turned the head around. 

Cuckoo! 

Twelve. 

The cuckoo slid back into the clock, facing the right way. 

Forward. 

I wriggled out of Mom’s arms, landing on the chair. 

“Mikey, what’s gotten into you?” she cried. She tried to grab me again. 
I dodged her. I reached around to the side of the clock. 

I saw the little dial that told the year. I felt for the button that 
controlled it. I could just reach it, standing on the chair. 

I slammed my hand on the button, carefully watching the years whiz 

by. 

I heard the shopkeeper yelling, “Get that baby away from my clock!” 
Mom grabbed me again, but I screamed. I screamed so loudly, it 
startled her. She let her hands drop. 

“Mikey, let go of that!” Dad ordered. 

I took my hand off the button. The dial showed the right year. The 
present year. The year I turned twelve. 

Mom made another grab for me. This time I let her pick me up. 

It doesn’t matter what happens now, I thought. Either the clock will 
work, and I’ll go back to being twelve again... 

.. .or else it won’t work. And then what? 

Then I’ll disappear. Vanish in time. Forever. 

I waited. 



“I’m so sorry,” Dad said to the shopkeeper. “I hope the baby didn’t 
damage the clock.” 

The muscles in my neck tensed. 

Nothing was happening. Nothing. 

I waited another minute. 

The shopkeeper inspected the clock. “Everything seems okay,” he told 
Dad. “But he changed the year. I’ll have to change it back.” 

“NO!” I wailed. “No! Don’t!” 

“That boy could use a little discipline, if you ask me,” the shopkeeper 

said. 

He reached his hand around the side of the clock and started to set 
back the year. 



24 


“Nooo!” I wailed. “Nooo!” 

That’s it, I realized. I’m doomed. I’m a goner. 

But the shopkeeper never touched the button. 

A bright white light flashed. I felt dizzy, stunned. I blinked. And 
blinked again. 

Several seconds passed before I could see anything. 

I felt cool, damp air. I smelled a musty odor. A garage smell. 

“Michael? Do you like it?” Dad’s voice. 

I blinked. My eyes adjusted. I saw Dad and Mom. Looking older. 
Looking normal. 

We were standing in the garage. Dad was holding a shiny new 21- 
speed bike. 

Mom frowned. “Michael, are you feeling all right?” 

They were giving me the bike. It was my birthday! 

The clock worked! I’d brought myself back to the present! 

Almost to the present. Up to my twelfth birthday. 

Close enough. 

I felt so happy, I thought I’d explode. 

I threw myself at Mom and hugged her hard. Then I hugged Dad. 

“Wow,” Dad gushed. “I guess you really do like the bike!” 

I grinned. “I love it!” I exclaimed. “I love everything! I love the whole 
world!” 

Mainly, I loved being twelve again. I could walk! I could talk! I could 
ride the bus by myself! 

Whoa! Wait a minute, I thought. It’s my birthday. 

Don’t tell me I have to live through it again. 

I tensed my shoulders and steeled myself for the horrible day to come. 

It’s worth it, I told myself. It’s worth it if it means time will go forward 
again, the way it’s supposed to. 

I knew too well what would happen next. 

Tara. 



She’d try to get on my bike. The bike would fall over and get 
scratched. 

Okay, Tara, I thought. I’m ready. Come and do your worst. 

I waited. 

Tara didn’t come. 

In fact, she didn’t seem to be around at all. 

She wasn’t in the garage. No sign of her. 

Mom and Dad oohed and ahhed over the bike. They didn’t act as if 
anything was wrong. Or anyone was missing. 

“Where’s Tara?” I asked them. 

They looked up. 

“Who?” They stared at me. 

“Did you invite her to your party?” Mom asked. “I don’t remember 
sending an invitation to a Tara.” 

Dad grinned at me. “Tara? Is that some girl you have a crush on, 
Michael?” 

“No,” I answered, turning red. 

It was as if they’d never heard of Tara. Never heard of their own 
daughter. 

“You’d better go upstairs and get ready for your party, Michael,” Mom 
suggested. “The kids will be here soon.” 

“Okay.” I stumbled into the house, dazed. 

“Tara?” I called. 

Silence. 

Could she be hiding somewhere? 

I searched through the house. Then I checked her room. I threw open 
the door. I expected to see a messy, all-pink girl’s room with a white canopy 
bed. 

Instead, I saw two twin beds, neatly made with plaid covers. A chair. 
An empty closet. No personal stuff. 

Not Tara’s room. 

A guest room. 

Wow. I was amazed. 

No Tara. Tara doesn’t exist. 

How did that happen? 

I wandered into the den, looking for the cuckoo clock. 



It wasn’t there. 

For a second, I felt a shock of fear. Then I calmed down. 

Oh, yeah, I remembered. We don’t have the clock yet. Not on my 
birthday. Dad bought it a couple of days later. 

But I still didn’t understand. What had happened to my little sister? 
Where was Tara? 

My friends arrived for the party. We played CDs and ate tortilla chips. 
Ceecee pulled me into a corner and whispered that Mona had a crush on 
me. 

Wow. I glanced at Mona. She turned a little pink and glanced away, 
shyly. 

Tara wasn’t there to embarrass me. It made a big difference. 

My friends all brought presents. I actually opened them myself. No 
Tara to open my presents before I get to them. 

At cake time, I carried the cake into the dining room and set it in the 
middle of the table. No problem. I didn’t fall and make a fool out of myself. 
Because Tara wasn’t there to trip me. 

It was the greatest birthday party I’d ever had. It was probably the 
greatest day I’d ever lived—because Tara wasn’t there to ruin it. 

I could get used to this, I thought. 

A few days later, the cuckoo clock was delivered to our house. 

“Isn’t it great?” Dad gushed, as he had the first time. “Anthony sold 
me the clock cheap. He said he’d discovered a tiny flaw on it.” 

The flaw. I’d almost forgotten about it. 

We still didn’t know what it was. But I couldn’t help wondering if it 
had something to do with Tara’s disappearance. 

Maybe the clock didn’t work perfectly in some way? Maybe it 
somehow left Tara behind? 

I hardly dared to touch the clock. I didn’t want to set off any more 
weird time trips. 

But I had to know what had happened. 

I carefully studied the face of the clock again, and all the decorations. 
Then I stared at the dial that showed the year. 

It was properly set at the current year. 

Without really thinking about it, I scanned twelve places down the dial 



to find the year I was born. 

There it was. 

Then I scanned my eyes back up to the dial. 
1992.1993.1994.1995.1997... 

Wait a second. 

Didn’t I just skip a year? 

I checked the dates again. 

Nineteen ninety-six was missing. There was no 1996 on the dial. 

And 1996 was the year Tara was born! 

“Dad!” I cried. “I found the flaw! Look—there’s a year missing on the 
dial.” 

Dad patted me on the back. “Good job, son! Wow, isn’t that funny?” 

To him it was just a funny mistake. 

He had no idea his daughter had never been born. 

I suppose there’s some way to go back in time and get her. 

I guess I probably ought to do that. 

And I will. 

Really. 

One of these days. 

Maybe. 






MONSTER BLOOD III 

Goosebumps - 29 
R.L. Stine 

1 


“The Monster Blood! It’s growing again!” Evan Ross stared at the quivering 
green blob in his driveway. It looked like an enormous wad of sticky green 
bubble gum, and was bigger than a beach ball. Bigger than two beach balls! 

The green blob trembled and shook as if it were breathing hard. It made 
disgusting sucking sounds. Then it started to bounce. 

Evan took a step back. How did the sticky goo get out of its can? he 
wondered. Who left it in the driveway? Who opened the can? 

Evan knew that once Monster Blood starts to grow, it can’t be stopped. It 
will grow and grow, and suck up everything in its path. 

Evan knew this from painful experience. 

He had seen a giant glob of Monster Blood swallow kids whole. And he 
had seen what had happened when his dog, Trigger, had eaten Monster Blood. 
The cocker spaniel had grown and grown and grown—until he was big enough 
to pick up Evan in his teeth and bury him in the backyard! 

A small chunk of Monster Blood had turned Cuddles, the tiny hamster in 
Evan’s class, into a raging, growling monster. The giant hamster—bigger than a 
gorilla—had roared through the school, destroying everything in its path! 

This gunk is dangerous, Evan thought. It may be the most dangerous green 
slimy stuff on Earth! 

So how did it get in Evan’s driveway? 

And what was he going to do about it? 

The Monster Blood bounced and hiccupped. It made more disgusting 
sucking sounds. 

As it bounced, it picked up sticks and gravel from the driveway. They stuck 
to its side for a moment, before being sucked into the center of the giant wet ball. 

Evan took another step back as the ball slowly started to roll. “Oh, noooo.” 
Alow moan escaped his throat. “Please. Noooo.” 

The Monster Blood rolled over the driveway toward Evan, picking up speed 
as it moved. Evan had tossed one of his Rollerblades by the side of the house. 
The green goo swallowed up the skate with a loud thwoccccck. 

Evan gulped as he saw the skate disappear into the bouncing green ball. “I 
—I’m next!” he stammered out loud. 



No way! he told himself. I’m getting out of here. 

He turned to run—and went sprawling over the other skate. 

“Ow!” he cried out as he fell hard on his elbows and knees. Pain shot up his 
arms. He had landed on both funny bones. 

Shaking away the tingling, he scrambled to his knees. He turned in time to 
see the seething goo roll over him. 

He opened his mouth to scream. But the scream was trapped inside him as 
the heavy green gunk splatted over his face. 

He thrashed both arms wildly. Kicked his feet. 

But the sticky goo wrapped around him. Pulling him. Pulling him in. 

I—I can’t breathe! he realized. 

And, then, everything turned green. 



2 


“Evan—stop daydreaming and eat your Jell-O,” Mrs. Ross scolded. 

Evan shook his head hard. The daydream had seemed so real. His mother’s 
voice still sounded far away. 

“Evan—hurry. Eat the Jell-O. You’ll be late.” 

“Uh... Mom...” Evan said softly. “Could you do me a really big favor?” 

“What favor?” his mother asked him patiently, pushing back her straight 
blond hair into a ponytail. 

“Could we never have green Jell-0 again? Could you just buy other colors? 
Not green?” 

He stared at the shimmering, quivering green mound of Jell-0 in the glass 
bowl in front of him on the kitchen counter. 

“Evan, you’re weird,” Mrs. Ross replied, rolling her eyes. “Hurry up. 
Kermit is probably wondering where you are.” 

“Kermit is probably busy blowing up his house,” 

Evan replied glumly. He pulled the spoon out of the Jell-O. It made a gross 
sucking sound. 

“All the more reason for you to hurry over there,” his mother said sharply. 
“You are responsible for him, Evan. You are in charge of your cousin until his 
mom gets home from work.” 

Evan shoved the green Jell-0 away. “I can’t eat this,” he murmured. “It 
makes me think of Monster Blood.” 

Mrs. Ross made a disgusted face. “Don’t mention that slimy stuff.” 

Evan climbed down from the stool. Mrs. Ross pushed a hand gently through 
his curly, carrot-colored hair. “It’s nice of you to help out,” she said softly. “Aunt 
Dee can’t really afford a babysitter.” 

“Kermit doesn’t need a baby-sitter. He needs a keeper!” Evan grumbled. 
“Or maybe a trainer. A guy with a whip and a chair. Like in the circus.” 

“Kermit looks up to you,” Mrs. Ross insisted. 

“Only because he’s two feet tall!” Evan exclaimed. “I can’t believe he’s my 
cousin. He’s such a nerd.” 

“Kermit isn’t a nerd. Kermit is a genius!” Mrs. Ross declared. “He’s only 
eight, and already he’s a scientific genius.” 



“Some genius,” Evan grumbled. “Mom, yesterday he melted my sneakers.” 

Mrs. Ross’ pale blue eyes grew wide. “He what?” 

“He made one of his concoctions. It was a bright yellow liquid. He said it 
would toughen up the sneakers so they would never wear out.” 

“And you let him pour the stuff on your sneakers?” Evan’s mother 
demanded. 

“I didn’t have a choice,” Evan replied unhappily. “I have to do everything 
Kermit wants. If I don’t, he tells Aunt Dee I was mean to him.” 

Mrs. Ross shook her head. “I wondered why you came home barefoot 
yesterday.” 

“My sneakers are still stuck to Kermit’s basement floor,” Evan told her. 
“They melted right off my feet.” 

“Well, be careful over there, okay?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied. He pulled his Atlanta Braves cap over his head, 
waved to his mother, and headed out the back door. 

It was a warm spring day. Two black-and-yellow monarch butterflies 
fluttered over the flower garden. The bright new leaves on the trees shimmered 
in the sunlight. 

Evan stopped at the bottom of the driveway and lowered the baseball cap to 
shield his eyes from the sun. He squinted down the street, hoping to see his 
friend Andy. 

No sign of her. 

Disappointed, he kicked a large pebble along the curb and started to make 
his way toward Kermit’s house. Aunt Dee, Kermit’s mom, paid Evan three 
dollars an hour to watch Kermit after school every afternoon. Three hundred 
dollars an hour would be a lot more fair! he thought angrily. 

But Evan was glad to earn the money. He was saving for a new Walkman. 
Trigger had mistaken his old Walkman for a dog bone. 

But Evan was earning every penny. Kermit was impossible. That was the 
only word for him. Impossible. 

He didn’t want to play video games. He didn’t want to watch TV. He 
refused to go outside and play ball or toss a Frisbee around. He didn’t even want 
to sneak down to the little grocery on the corner and load up on candy bars and 
potato chips. 

All he wanted to do was stay downstairs in his dark, damp basement lab 
and mix beakers of chemicals together. “My experiments,” he called them. “I 



have to do my experiments.” 

Maybe he is a genius, Evan thought bitterly. But that doesn’t make him any 
fun. He’s just impossible. 

Evan definitely wasn’t enjoying his after-school baby-sitting job watching 
Kermit. In fact, he had several daydreams in which Kermit tried one of his own 
mixtures and melted to the basement floor, just like Evan’s sneakers. 

Some afternoons, Andy came along, and that made the job a little easier. 
Andy thought Kermit was really weird, too. But at least when she was there, 
Evan had someone to talk to, someone who didn’t want to talk about mixing 
aluminum pyrite with sodium chlorobenzadrate. 

What is Kermit’s problem, anyway? Evan wondered as he crossed the street 
and made his way through backyards toward Kermit’s house. Why does he think 
mixing is so much fun? Why is he always mixing this with that and that with 
this? 

I can’t even mix chocolate milk! 

Kermit’s house came into view two yards down. It was a two-story white 
house with a sloping black roof. 

Evan picked up his pace. He was about fifteen minutes late. He hoped that 
Kermit hadn’t already gotten into some kind of trouble. 

He had just pushed his way though the prickly, low hedges that fenced in 
Kermit’s yard when a familiar gruff voice made him freeze. 

“Evan—were you looking at my yard?” 

“Huh?” Evan recognized the voice at once. It belonged to Kermit’s next- 
door neighbor, a kid from Evan’s school. 

His name was Conan Barber. But the kids at school all called him Conan 
the Barbarian. That’s because he had to be the biggest, meanest kid in Atlanta. 
Maybe in the universe. 

Conan sat on top of the tall white fence that separated the yards. His cold 
blue eyes glared down at Evan. “Were you looking at my yard?” Conan 
demanded. 

“No way!” Evan’s voice came out in a squeak. 

“You were looking at my yard. That’s trespassing,” Conan accused. He 
leaped down from the high fence. He was big and very athletic. His hobby was 
leaping over kids he had just pounded into the ground. 

Conan wore a gray muscle shirt and baggy, faded jeans cutoffs. He also 
wore a very mean expression. 



“Whoa. Wait a minute, Conan!” Evan protested. “I was looking at Kermit’s 
yard. I never look at your yard. Never!” 

Conan stepped up to Evan. He stuck out his chest and bumped Evan hard, 
so hard he stumbled backwards. 

That was Conan’s other hobby. Bumping kids with his chest. His chest 
didn’t feel like a chest. It felt like a truck. 

“Why don’t you look at my yard?” Conan demanded. “Is there something 
wrong with my yard? Is my yard too ugly? Is that why you never look at it?” 

Evan swallowed hard. It began to dawn on him that maybe Conan was 
itching for a fight. 

Before he could answer Conan, he heard a scratchy voice reply for him. 
“It’s a free country, Conan!” 

“Oh, noooo,” Evan groaned, shutting his eyes. 

Evan’s cousin, Kermit, stepped out from behind Evan. He was tiny and 
skinny. A very pale kid with a pile of white-blond hair, and round black eyes 
behind big red plastic-framed glasses. Evan always thought his cousin looked 
like a white mouse wearing glasses. 

Kermit wore enormous red shorts that came down nearly to his ankles, and 
a red-and-black Braves T-shirt. The short sleeves hung down past the elbows of 
his skinny arms. 

“What did you say?” Conan demanded, glaring down menacingly at 
Kermit. 

“It’s a free country!” Kermit repeated shrilly. “Evan can look at any yard he 
wants to!” 

Conan let out an angry growl. As he lumbered forward to pound Evan’s 
face into mashed potatoes, Evan turned to Kermit. “Thanks a lot,” he told his 
cousin. “Thanks for all your help.” 

“Which way do you want your nose to slant?” Conan asked Evan. “To the 
right or to the left?” 



3 


“Don’t do it!” Kermit shrieked in his scratchy mouse voice. 

Conan raised a huge fist. With his other hand, he grabbed the front of 
Evan’s T-shirt. He glared down at Kermit. “Why not?” he growled. 

“Because I have this!” Kermit declared. 

“Huh?” Conan let go of Evan’s shirt. He stared at the glass beaker Kermit 
had raised in both hands. The beaker was half-full with a dark blue liquid. 

Conan let out a sigh and swept a beefy hand back through his wavy blond 
hair. His blue eyes narrowed at Kermit. “What’s that? Your baby formula?” 

“Ha-ha,” Kermit replied sarcastically. 

If Kermit doesn’t shut up, we’re both going to get pounded! Evan realized. 
What is the little creep trying to do? 

He tugged at Kermit’s sleeve, trying to pull him away from Conan. But 
Kermit ignored him. He raised the beaker close to Conan’s face. 

“It’s an Invisibility Mixture,” Kermit said. “If I pour it on you, you’ll 
disappear.” 

We should both disappear! Evan thought frantically. He let his eyes dart 
around the backyard. Maybe I can make it through that hedge before Conan 
grabs me, he thought. If I can get around the next house and down to the street, I 
might escape. 

But would it be right to leave little Kermit at Conan’s mercy? 

Evan sighed. He couldn’t abandon his cousin like that. Even though Kermit 
was definitely asking for it. 

“You’re going to make me invisible with that stuff?” Conan asked Kermit 
with a sneer. 

Kermit nodded. “If I pour a few drops on you, you’ll disappear. Really. I 
mixed it myself. It works. It’s a mixture of Teflon dioxinate and magnesium 
parasulfidine.” 

“Yeah. Right,” Conan muttered. He peered at the liquid in the beaker. 
“What makes it blue?” 

“Food coloring,” Kermit replied. Then he lowered his squeaky voice, trying 
to sound tough. “You’d better go home now, Conan. I don’t want to have to use 
this stuff.” 



Oh, wow! Evan thought, pulling the bill of his Braves cap down over his 
face. I can’t bear to watch this. This is sad. Really sad. Kermit is such a jerk. 

“Go ahead. Try it,” Evan heard Conan say. 

Evan raised the cap so he could see. “Uh... Kermit... maybe we should go 
in the house now,” he whispered. 

“Go ahead. Make me invisible,” Conan challenged. 

“You really want me to?” Kermit demanded. 

“Yeah,” Conan replied. “I want to be invisible. Go ahead, Kermit. Pour it on 
me. Make me disappear. I dare you.” 

Kermit raised the beaker over the gray muscle shirt that covered Conan’s 
broad chest. 

“Kermit—no!” Evan pleaded. “Don’t! Please don’t!” 

Evan made a frantic grab for the beaker. 

Too late. 

Kermit turned the beaker over and let the thick blue liquid pour onto the 
front of Conan’s shirt. 



4 


Out of the corner of his eye, Evan saw a monarch butterfly fluttering over the 
low hedges. I wish I were a butterfly, he thought. I wish I could flap my wings 
and float away. 

As far away from here as I can get! 

The blue liquid oozed down the front of Conan’s muscle shirt. All three 
boys stared at it in silence. 

“Well? I’m not disappearing,” Conan murmured, narrowing his eyes 
suspiciously at Kermit. 

Then his shirt started to shrink. 

“Hey—!” Conan cried angrily. He struggled to pull off the shrinking shirt. 
It got tinier and tinier. “It—it’s choking me!” Conan shrieked. 

“Wow!” Kermit squeaked, his black eyes glowing excitedly behind his 
glasses. “This is cool!” 

Evan gazed in amazement as the muscle shirt shrank down to a tiny shred 
of cloth. And then it vanished completely. 

Now Conan stood in front of them bare-chested. 

A heavy silence fell over the backyard. All three of them stared at Conan’s 
broad, bare chest for a few moments. 

Conan broke the silence. “That was my best muscle shirt,” he told Evan 
through gritted teeth. 

“Uh-oh,” Evan uttered. 

“I like your nose that way,” Andy told Evan. “It kind of tilts in both directions at 
once.” 

“I think it will go back to the way it was,” Evan replied, patting his nose 
tenderly. “At least it stopped hurting so much.” He sighed. “All the other cuts 
and bruises will go away, too. In time.” 

It was two days later. Evan sat across from Andy in the lunchroom at 
school. He stared down sadly at the tuna fish sandwich his mom had packed for 
him. He hadn’t taken a bite. His mouth wasn’t working exactly right yet. It kept 
going sideways instead of up and down. 

Andy wiped a chunk of egg salad off her cheek. She had short brown hair 



and big brown eyes that stared across the table at Evan. 

Andy didn’t dress like most of the other kids in their sixth-grade class. She 
liked bright colors. A lot of bright colors. 

Today she wore a yellow vest over a magenta T-shirt and orange Day-Glo 
shorts. 

When Andy moved to Atlanta in the beginning of the school year, some 
kids made fun of her colorful clothes. But they didn’t anymore. Now everyone 
agreed that Andy had style. And a few kids were even copying her look. 

“So what happened after Conan the Barbarian pounded your body into 
coleslaw?” Andy asked. She pulled a handful of potato chips from her bag and 
shoved them one by one into her mouth. 

Evan took a few bites from a section of his tuna fish sandwich. It took him 
a long time to swallow. “Conan made me promise I’d never look in his yard 
again,” he told Andy. “I had to raise my right hand and swear. Then he went 
home.” 

Evan sighed. He touched his sore nose again. “After Conan left, Kermit 
helped me hobble into his house,” Evan continued. “A little while later, Aunt 
Dee got home.” 

“Then what happened?” Andy asked, crinkling up the empty potato chip 

bag. 

“She saw that I was messed up,” Evan replied. “So she asked what 
happened.” 

Evan shook his head and scowled. “And before I could say anything, that 
little rat Kermit piped up and said, 'Evan picked a fight with Conan.’” 

“Oh, wow,” Andy murmured. 

“And Aunt Dee said, ‘Well, Evan, if you’re just going to get into fights 
instead of taking care of Kermit, I’m going to have to talk to your mom about 
you. Maybe you’re not mature enough for this job.’” 

“Oh, wow,” Andy repeated. 

“And the whole thing was Kermit’s fault!” Evan shouted, pounding his fist 
so hard on the table that his milk carton tipped over. Milk spilled over the 
tabletop, onto the front of his jeans. 

Evan was so upset, he didn’t even move out of the way. “And do you know 
the worst thing?” Evan demanded. “The worst thing?” 

“What?” Andy asked. 

“Kermit did it deliberately. He knew what that blue mixture would do. He 



knew it would shrink Conan’s shirt. Kermit wanted me to get pounded by 
Conan. He did the whole thing to get me in trouble with Conan.” 

“How do you know?” Andy asked. 

“The smile,” Evan told her. 

“Huh? What smile?” 

“The smile on Kermit’s face. You know that twisted little smile he has 
where his two front teeth stick out? That’s the smile he had when he helped me 
back to the house.” 

Andy tsk-tsked. 

Evan finished the section of tuna fish sandwich. “Is that all you’re going to 
say?” he snapped. 

“What can I say?” Andy replied. “Your cousin, Kermit, is a weird little 
dude. I think you should teach him a lesson. Pay him back.” 

“Huh?” Evan gaped at her. “How do I do that?” 

Andy shrugged. “I don’t know. Maybe you could... uh...” Her dark eyes 
suddenly flashed with excitement. “I know! Doesn’t he have a snack after school 
every day? You could slip some Monster Blood into his food.” 

Evan gulped and jumped to his feet. “Hey—no way! No way, Andy!” he 
shouted. 

Several kids turned to stare at Evan, startled by his loud cries. 

“Don’t even think it!” Evan shouted, ignoring the stares. “No Monster 
Blood. Ever! I never want to hear those words again!” 

“Okay, okay!” Andy cried. She raised both hands, as if to shield herself 
from him. 

“By the way,” Evan said, a little calmer, “where is the Monster Blood? 
Where did you hide it? You didn’t take any of it out—did you?” 

“Well...” Andy replied, lowering her eyes. A devilish grin spread across her 
face. “I put a little bit of it in the tuna fish sandwich you just ate.” 



5 


Evan let out a cry so loud, it made two kids fall off their chairs. Two other kids 
dropped their lunch trays. 

His eyes bulged and his voice rose higher than the gym teacher’s whistle. 
“You—you—you—!” he sputtered, grabbing his throat. 

Andy laughed. She pointed at his chair. “Evan, sit down. I was only 
joking.” 

“Huh?” 

“You heard me,” Andy said. “It was a joke. The Monster Blood is home, 
safe and sound.” 

Evan let out a long sigh. He sank back into the chair. He didn’t care that he 
was sitting in the milk he had spilled. 

“Annndrea,” he said unhappily, stretching out the word. “Annnndrea, that 
wasn’t funny.” 

“Sure it was,” Andy insisted. “And don’t call me Andrea. You know I hate 
that name.” 

“Andrea. Andrea. Andrea,” Evan repeated, paying her back for her mean 
joke. He narrowed his eyes at her sternly. “That new can of Monster Blood your 
parents sent you from Europe—it really is hidden away?” 

Andy nodded. “On the top shelf of a closet in the basement. Way in the 
back,” she told him. “The can is shut tight. No way the stuff can get out.” 

He stared hard at her, studying her face. 

“Don’t look at me like that!” she cried. She balled up the sandwich tinfoil 
and tossed it at him. “I’m telling the truth. The Monster Blood is totally hidden 
away. You don’t have to worry about it.” 

Evan relaxed. He pulled the Fruit Roll-Up from his lunch bag and started to 
unwrap it. “You owe me now,” he said softly. 

“Excuse me?” 

“You owe me for playing that stupid joke,” Evan said. 

“Oh, yeah? What do I have to do?” Andy demanded. 

“Come with me after school. To Kermit’s,” Evan said. 

Andy made a disgusted face. 

“Please,” Evan added. 



“Okay,” she said. “Kermit isn’t that bad when I’m around.” 

Evan held up the sticky Fruit Roll-Up. “Want this? I begged my mom not to 
buy the green ones!” 


* * * 


After school, Evan and Andy walked together to Kermit’s house. It was a gray 
day, threatening rain. The air felt heavy and wet, as humid as summer. 

Evan led the way across the street. He started to cut through the backyards 
—but stopped. “Let’s go the front way,” he instructed. “Conan might be hanging 
out in back. Waiting for us.” 

“Don’t say us,” Andy muttered. She shifted her backpack to the other 
shoulder. She scratched her arm. “Ow. Look at this.” 

Evan lowered his eyes to the large red bump on Andy’s right arm. “What is 
that? A mosquito bite?” 

Andy scratched it some more. “I guess so. It itches like crazy.” 

“You’re not supposed to scratch it,” Evan told her. 

“Thanks, Doc,” she replied sarcastically. She scratched it even harder to 
annoy him. 

A few sprinkles of rain came down as they made their way up Kermit’s 
driveway. Evan opened the front door and stepped into the living room. 

“Kermit—are you here?” 

No reply. 

A sour smell attacked Evan’s nostrils. He pressed his fingers over his nose. 
“Yuck. Do you smell that?” 

Andy nodded, her face twisted in disgust. “I think it’s coming from the 
basement.” 

“For sure,” Evan muttered. “Kermit must already be in his lab.” 

“Kermit? Hey—Kermit, what are you doing down there?” Evan called out. 

Holding their noses, they made their way quickly down the stairs. The 
basement was divided into two rooms. To the right stood the laundry room and 
furnace; to the left the rec room with Kermit’s lab set up along the back wall. 

Evan hurried across the tiled floor into the lab. He spotted Kermit behind 
his lab table, several beakers of colored liquids in front of him. “Kermit—what’s 
that disgusting smell?” he demanded. 

As Evan and Andy ran up to the lab table, Kermit poured a yellow liquid 



into a green liquid. “Uh-oh!” he cried, staring down at the bubbling mixture. 
Behind his glasses, his eyes grew wide with horror. 

“Run!” Kermit screamed. “Hurry! Get out! It’s going to BLOW!” 



6 


The liquid swirled and bubbled. 

Kermit ducked under the lab table. 

With a cry of horror, Evan spun round. Grabbed Andy’s hand. Started to 
pull her to the stairs. 

But he had only taken a step when he stumbled over Dogface, Kermit’s 
huge sheepdog. 

“Oof!” Evan felt the wind knocked out of him as he fell over the dog and 
landed facedown on the tile floor. He gasped. Struggled to choke in a mouthful 
of air. 

The room tilted and swayed. 

“It’s going to BLOW!” Kermit’s shrill warning rang in Evan’s ears. 

He finally managed to take a deep breath. Raised himself to one knee. 
Turned back to the lab table. 

And saw Andy standing calmly in the center of the rec room, her hands at 
her waist. 

“Andy—it’s going to BLOW!” Evan choked out. 

She rolled her eyes. “Evan, really,” she muttered, shaking her head. “Did 
you really fall for that?” 

“Huh?” Evan gazed past her to the long glass table. 

Kermit had climbed back to his feet. He was leaning with both elbows on 
the table. And he had the grin on his face. That grin. 

The twisted grin with the two front teeth sticking out. The grin Evan hated 
more than any grin in the world. 

“Yeah, Evan,” Kermit repeated, mimicking Andy, “did you really fall for 
that?” He burst into his squealing-high laugh that sounded like a pig stuck in a 
fence. 

Evan pulled himself up, muttering under his breath. Dogface hiccupped. 
The dog’s tongue tumbled out, and he began to pant loudly. 

Evan turned to Andy. “I didn’t really fall for it,” he claimed. “I knew it was 
another one of Kermit’s dumb jokes. I was just seeing if you believed it.” 

“For sure.” Andy rolled her eyes again. She was doing a lot of eye-rolling 
this afternoon, Evan realized. 



Evan and Andy stepped up to the table. It was littered with bottles and glass 
tubes, beakers and jars—all filled with colored liquids. 

On the wall behind the table stood a high bookshelf. The shelves were also 
jammed with bottles and jars of liquids and chemicals. Kermit’s mixtures. 

“I was only a few minutes late getting here,” Evan told Kermit. “From now 
on, don’t do anything. Just wait for me.” He sniffed the air. “What’s that really 
gross smell?” 

Kermit grinned back at him. “I didn’t notice it until you came in!” he joked. 

Evan didn’t laugh. “Give me a break,” he muttered. 

Andy scratched her mosquito bite. “Yeah. No more jokes today, Kermit.” 

The big sheepdog hiccupped again. 

“I’m mixing up something to cure Dogface’s hiccups,” Kermit announced. 

“Oh, no!” Evan replied sharply. “No way! I can’t let you give the dog one 
of your mixtures to drink.” 

“It’s a very simple hiccup cure,” Kermit said, pouring a blue liquid into a 
green liquid. “It’s just maglesium harposyrate and ribotussal polythorbital. With 
a little sugar for sweetness.” 

“No way,” Evan insisted. “You’re not giving Dogface anything to drink but 
water. It’s too dangerous.” 

Kermit ignored him and continued to mix chemicals from one glass beaker 
into another. He glanced up at Andy. “What’s wrong with your arm?” 

“It’s a really big mosquito bite,” Andy told him. “It itches like crazy.” 

“Let me see it,” Kermit urged. 

Andy eyed him suspiciously. “Why?” 

Kermit grabbed Andy’s hand and tugged her closer. “Let me see it,” he 
insisted. 

“It’s just a mosquito bite,” Andy said. 

“I have some of that blue shrinking mixture left,” Kermit announced. “The 
stuff I shrank Conan’s shirt with.” 

“Don’t remind me,” Evan groaned. 

“It’ll shrink your mosquito bite,” Kermit told Andy. He picked up the 
beaker. 

“You’re going to pour that stuff on my arm?” Andy cried. “I don’t think 

so!” 

She tried to step away. 

But Kermit grabbed her arm. And poured. 



The blue liquid spread over the mosquito bite. 
“No! Oh, no!” Andy shrieked. 



7 


“My arm!” Andy shrieked. “What did you do to me?” 

Evan lurched to the lab table, nearly stumbling over the dog again. He 
grabbed Andy’s arm and examined it. “It—it—” he stammered. 

“It’s gone!” Andy cried. “The mosquito bite—it’s gone!” 

Evan stared at Andy’s arm. Perfectly smooth, except for a few drips of the 
blue liquid. 

“Kermit—you’re a geniusl” Andy cried. “That mixture of yours shrank the 
mosquito bite away!” 

“Told you,” Kermit replied, grinning happily. 

“You can make a fortune!” Andy exclaimed. “Don’t you realize what 
you’ve done? You’ve invented the greatest cure for mosquito bites ever!” 

Kermit held up the beaker. He tilted it one way, then the other. “Not much 
left,” he said softly. 

“But you can mix up some more—right?” Andy demanded. 

Kermit frowned. “I’m not sure,” he said softly. 

“I think I can mix up a new batch. But I’m not sure. I didn’t write down 
what I put in it.” 

He scratched his white-blond hair and stared at the empty glass beaker, 
twitching his nose like a mouse, thinking hard. 

Dogface let out another loud hiccup. The hiccup was followed by a howl. 
Evan saw that the poor dog was getting very unhappy about the hiccups. 
Dogface was a big dog—and so he had big hiccups that shook his sheepdog 
body like an earthquake. 

“I’d better get to work on the hiccup cure,” Kermit announced. He pulled 
some jars of chemicals off the shelf and started to open them. 

“Whoa. Wait a minute,” Evan told him. “I told you, Kermit—I can’t let you 
feed anything to the dog. Aunt Dee will kill me if—” 

“Oh, let him try!” Andy interrupted. She rubbed her smooth arm. “Kermit is 
a genius, Evan. You have to let a genius work.” 

Evan glared at her. “Whose side are you on?” he demanded in a loud 
whisper. 

Andy didn’t answer. She unzipped her orange-and-blue backpack and 



pulled out some papers. “I think I’ll do my math homework while Kermit mixes 
up his hiccup cure.” 

Kermit’s eyes lit up excitedly behind his glasses. “Math? Do you have math 
problems?” 

Andy nodded. “It’s a take-home equations exam. Very hard.” 

Kermit set down the test tubes and beakers. He hurried out from behind the 
lab table. “Can I do the problems for you, Andy?” he asked eagerly. “You know I 
love to do math problems.” 

Andy flashed Evan a quick wink. Evan frowned back at her. He shook his 
head. 

So that’s why Andy is being so nice to Kermit! Evan told himself. It was all 
a trick. A trick to get Kermit to do the math test for her. 

Kermit could never resist math problems. His parents had to buy him stacks 
and stacks of math workbooks. He could spend an entire afternoon doing all the 
problems in the workbooks —for fun ! 

Dogface hiccupped. 

Kermit grabbed the math test from Andy’s hand. “Please let me do the 
equations,” he begged. “Pretty please?” 

“Well... okay,” Andy agreed. She flashed Evan another wink. 

Evan scowled back at her. Andy is going to get in trouble for this, he 
thought. Andy is a terrible math student. It’s her worst subject. Mrs. McGrady is 
going to get very suspicious when Andy gets every problem right. 

But Evan didn’t say anything. What was the point? 

Kermit was already scribbling answers on the page, solving the equations as 
fast as he could read them. His eyes were dancing wildly. He was breathing hard. 
And he had a happy grin on his face. 

“All done,” he announced. 

Wow, he’s fast! Evan thought. He finished that math test in the time it 
would take me to write my name at the top of the page! 

Kermit handed the pencil and math pages back to Andy. “Thanks a lot,” she 
said. “I really need a good grade in math this term.” 

“Cheater,” Evan whispered in her ear. 

“I just did it for Kermit,” Andy whispered back. “He loves doing math 
problems. So why shouldn’t I give him a break?” 

“Cheater,” Evan repeated. 

Dogface hiccupped. Then he let out a pained howl. 



Kermit returned to his lab table. He poured a yellow liquid into a red liquid. 
It started to smoke. Then it turned bright orange. 

Andy tucked the math test into her backpack. 

Kermit poured the orange liquid into a large glass beaker. He picked up a 
tiny bottle, turned it upside down, and emptied silvery crystals into the beaker. 

Evan stepped up beside Kermit. “You can’t feed that to Dogface,” Evan 
insisted. “I really mean it. I won’t let you give it to him.” 

Kermit ignored him. He stirred the mixture until it turned white. Then he 
added another powder that made it turn orange again. 

“You have to listen to me, Kermit,” Evan said. “I’m in charge, right?” 

Kermit continued to ignore him. 

Dogface hiccupped. His white furry body quivered and shook. 

“Let Kermit work,” Andy told Evan. “He’s a genius.” 

“Maybe he’s a genius,” Evan replied. “But I’m in charge. Until Kermit’s 
mom gets home, I’m the boss.” 

Kermit poured the mixture into a red dog dish. 

“I’m the boss,” said Evan. “And the boss says no.” 

Kermit lowered the dog dish to the floor. 

“The boss says you can’t feed that to Dogface,” Evan said. 

“Here, boy! Here, boy!” Kermit called. 

“No way!” Evan cried. “No way the dog is drinking that!” 

Evan made a dive for the bowl. He planned to grab it away. 

But he dove too hard—and went sliding under the lab table. 

Dogface lowered his head to the dog dish and began lapping up the orange 
mixture. 

Evan spun around and stared eagerly at the dog. All three of them were 
waiting... waiting... waiting to see what would happen. 



8 


Dogface licked the bowl clean. Then he stared up at Kermit, as if to say, “Thank 
you.” 

Kermit petted the big dog’s head. He smoothed the white, curly fur from in 
front of Dogface’s eyes. The fur fell right back in place. Dogface licked Kermit’s 
hand. 

“See? The hiccups are gone,” Kermit declared to Evan. 

Evan stared at the dog. He waited a few seconds more. “You’re right,” he 
confessed. “The hiccups are gone.” 

“It was a simple mixture,” Kermit bragged. “Just a little tetrahydropodol 
with some hydradroxilate crystals and an ounce of megahydracyl oxyneuroplat. 
Any child could do it.” 

“What a genius!” Andy exclaimed. 

Evan started to say something. But Dogface interrupted with a sharp yip. 

Then, without warning, the big sheepdog sprang forward. With another 
shrill yip, Dogface raised his enormous front paws—and leaped on to Kermit. 

Kermit let out a startled cry and stumbled back against the wall. Bottles and 
jars shook on the shelves behind him. 

Dogface began barking wildly, uttering shrill, excited yips. The dog jumped 
again, as if trying to leap into Kermit’s arms. 

“Down, boy! Down!” Kermit squealed. 

The dog jumped again. 

The shelves shook. Kermit sank to the floor. 

“Down, boy! Down!” Kermit shrieked, covering his head with both arms. 
“Stop it, Dogface! Stop jumping!” 

The excited dog used his head to push Kermit’s arm away. Then he began 
licking Kermit’s face frantically. Then he began nipping at his T-shirt. 

“Stop! Yuck! Stop!” Kermit struggled to get away. But the big dog had 
Kermit pinned to the floor. 

“What’s going on?” Andy cried. “What’s gotten into that dog?” 

“Kermit’s mixture!” Evan replied. He dove at the dog, grabbed Dogface 
with both hands, and tried to tug him off Kermit. 

Dogface spun around. With another high-pitched yip, he bounded away, 



running at full speed across the basement. 

“Stop him!” Kermit cried. “He’s out of control! He’ll break something!” 

CRAAAASH. 

A shelf of canning jars toppled to the floor. 

Barking loudly, the dog bounded away from the shelf and began running in 
wide circles, his big paws clomping on the tile floor. Round and round, as if 
chasing his tail. 

“Dogface—whoa!” Evan called, chasing after the sheepdog. He turned back 
to Andy. “Help me! We’ve got to stop him! He’s acting crazy!” 

Dogface disappeared into the laundry room. “Dogface—come back here!” 
Evan called. 

He burst into the laundry room in time to see the dog crash into the ironing 
board. It toppled over, along with a stack of clothes that had been resting on it. 
The iron clattered over the hard floor. 

Dogface yelped and climbed out from under the spilled clothes. Spotting 
Evan, the dog’s stubby tail began wagging—and he leaped across the room. 

“No!” Evan screeched as the huge dog knocked him over backwards to the 
ground. Dogface frantically licked Evan’s face. 

Behind him, Evan heard Andy laugh. “Too much energy! He’s acting like a 
crazy puppy!” she declared. 

“He’s too big to think he’s a puppy!” Evan wailed. 

Dogface was sniffing furiously under the washing machine. He pounced on 
a large black ant. 

Then he turned and came bounding over to Andy and Evan. 

“Look out!” Evan cried. 

But the big sheepdog lumbered past them, back into the other room. They 
followed him, watching him roll over a few times, kicking his big, furry paws in 
the air. 

Then Dogface jumped to his feet—and came charging at Kermit. 

“Whoa! Whoa, boy!” Kermit cried. He turned to Andy. “You’re right. This 
is just the way Dogface acted when he was a puppy. The mixture gave him too 
much energy!” 

The sheepdog crashed into an old couch against the wall. He climbed up 
onto the couch, sniffing the cushions, exploring. His stubby tail wagged 
furiously. 

“Dogface, you’re not a puppy!” Evan cried. “Please listen to me! You’re too 



big to be a puppy! Dogface—please!” 

“Look out!” Andy shrieked. 

The dog jumped off the couch and went running full speed toward Kermit. 

“No! Stop!” Kermit cried. He dove behind the lab table. 

The dog tried to slow down. But his big legs were carrying him too fast. 

Dogface crashed into the lab table. Bottles and beakers flew into the air, 
then crashed to the floor. The table toppled over on top of Kermit. 

The shelves fell off the wall, and all of the jars and tubes and beakers 
tumbled to the floor, shattering, clattering, chemicals pouring out over the floor. 

“What a mess!” Evan cried. “What a horrible mess!” 

He turned—and let out a loud gasp. 

Aunt Dee stood in the doorway. Her mouth was opened wide in surprise, 
and her eyes nearly bulged out of her head. 

“What on Earth is going on down here?” she shrieked. 

“Uh... well...” Evan started. 

How could he begin to explain? And if he did find a way to explain, would 
Aunt Dee believe him? 

Aunt Dee pressed her hands against her waist and tapped one foot on the 
floor. “What has happened here?” she demanded angrily. 

“Uh... well...” Evan repeated. 

Kermit spoke up first. He pointed an accusing finger at Evan. “Evan was 
teasing the dog!” he cried. 



9 


Kermit’s mom glared angrily at Evan. “I’m paying you to take care of Kermit,” 
she said sternly. “Not to play silly jokes on the dog and wreck my house.” 

“But—but—but—” Evan sputtered. 

“Evan didn’t do it!” Andy protested. 

But her words were drowned out by Kermit, who let out a loud, phony wail 
—and burst into tears. “I tried to stop Evan!” Kermit sobbed. “I didn’t want him 
to tease Dogface! But he wouldn’t stop!” 

Kermit rushed into his mother’s arms. “It’s okay,” Aunt Dee said 
soothingly. “It’s okay, Kermit. I’ll make sure Evan never does it again.” 

She narrowed her eyes angrily at Evan as Kermit continued to sob, holding 
on to his mother like a baby. 

Evan rolled his eyes at Andy. Andy replied with a shrug. 

“Evan, you and Andy can start cleaning up this mess,” Mrs. Majors 
ordered. “Kermit is a very sensitive boy. When you play jokes like this, it upsets 
him terribly.” 

Kermit sobbed even louder. His mom tenderly patted his head. “It’s okay, 
Kermit. It’s okay. Evan won’t ever tease Dogface again,” she whispered. 

“But—but—” Evan sputtered. 

How could Kermit put on such an act? 

How could he deliberately get Evan into trouble? This mess wasn’t Evan’s 
fault. It was Kermit’s! 

“I really don’t think—” Andy started. 

But Aunt Dee raised a hand to silence her. “Just get this mess cleaned up— 
okay?” 

She turned to Evan. “I’m not going to tell your mom about this, Evan,” she 
said, still patting Kermit’s head. 

“Thanks,” Evan muttered. 

“I’m going to give you one more chance,” she continued. “You don’t really 
deserve it. If you weren’t my nephew, I’d make you pay for all the damage. And 
I’d get someone else to take care of Kermit.” 

“Evan is mean,” Kermit murmured, removing his glasses and wiping tears 
off his cheeks. “Evan is really mean.” 



What a little rat! Evan thought. But he remained silent, his eyes lowered to 
the floor. 

“Kermit, let’s get you cleaned up,” Aunt Dee said, leading him to the stairs. 
“Then we’ll have to give the dog a bath.” 

She turned back to Evan and pointed a finger at him. “One more chance,” 
she warned. “One more chance.” 

In the corner, Dogface let out a loud hiccup. 

“See how you’ve upset the dog?” Kermit’s mom called to Evan. “You’ve 
given poor Dogface the hiccups!” 

“But—but—” Evan sputtered again. 

As Evan struggled to find words to defend himself, Kermit and his mom 
disappeared up the stairs. 

Two hours later, Andy and Evan wearily headed for home. 

“What a mess,” Evan moaned. “Look at me. I’m covered in chemicals.” 

“Two hours,” Andy muttered. “Two hours to clean up the basement. And 
Dogface stood there watching us, hiccupping the whole time.” 

“Kermit is such a little creep,” Evan said, kicking a stone across the 
sidewalk. 

Andy shook her head bitterly. “Do you have any more cousins like him?” 

“No,” Evan replied. “Kermit is one of a kind.” 

“He’s such a little liar,” Andy said. 

“Hey—you stuck up for him,” Evan accused. “You said he was a genius, 
remember? You were so happy that he did your math problems for you, you 
thought he was wonderful.” 

Andy shifted her backpack onto her other shoulder. A smile crossed her 
face. “I forgot all about the math problems,” she said. “Kermit may be a little 
creep—but he’s also a genius. I’m going to get an A in math!” She let out a 
happy cheer. 

“Winners never cheat, and cheaters never win,” Evan muttered. 

Andy gave him a playful shove. “Did you just make that up? It’s very 
catchy.” 

“Give me a break,” Evan growled. He turned and made his way up his 
driveway without saying good-bye. 


Andy called him two nights later. “Your cousin Kermit is a total creep!” She 



shouted so loudly, Evan had to hold his phone away from his ear. 

“Do you know what he did? Do you know what he did?” Andy shrieked. 

“No. What?” Evan asked softly. 

“He did all the math equations wrong,” Andy cried. 

“Excuse me?” Evan wasn’t sure he heard correctly. “The genius got 
everything wrong?” 

“On purpose!” Andy declared. “He got them wrong on purpose. He made 
up answers for all of them! He didn’t even read the problems. He just wrote 
down stupid answers.” 

“But why?” Evan demanded. 

“Why? Why? Because he’s Kermit!” Andy screamed. 

Evan swallowed hard. Poor Andy, he thought. Now she will fail in math. 

“What a mean, rotten trick!” Andy shrieked into the phone. “Mrs. McGrady 
called me up to her desk and asked me to explain my answers. She asked me 
how I could possibly be so totally off on every single equation.” 

Andy sighed bitterly. “Of course I couldn’t answer her. I just stood there 
with my mouth open. I think I drooled on her desk!” 

“After we left his house, Kermit probably laughed his head off,” Evan said. 

“That brat has such a sick sense of humor,” Andy wailed. “We have to pay 
him back, Evan. We really have to.” 

“Yeah. We do,” Evan agreed. 

“We have to get out the Monster Blood,” Andy urged. “We have to use the 
Monster Blood to pay him back.” 

“Yeah. We do,” Evan agreed. 



10 


Evan called Andy back later that night. “I changed my mind,” he said. “I don’t 
want to use the Monster Blood.” 

“What’s your problem?” Andy demanded. “Kermit deserves it. You know 
he does.” 

“Monster Blood is too dangerous,” Evan told her. “It turned Cuddles the 
hamster into a giant, roaring monster. I don’t want to turn Kermit into a giant, 
roaring monster.” 

“Neither do I!” Andy exclaimed. “I don’t want to feed it to him, Evan. I just 
want to slip a tiny bit into one of his mixtures. He thinks he’s so smart and can 
do anything. I want to see Kermit’s face when his mixture goes berserk!” 

She laughed gleefully. 

What an evil laugh, Evan thought. 

“It’ll be awesome!” Andy exclaimed. 

“Forget about it,” Evan insisted. “I have nightmares about Monster Blood 
almost every night. I don’t want to see that stuff again, Andy. I really don’t. 
Leave it locked up—please!” 

“But you said we could do it!” Andy pleaded. 

“I made a mistake,” Evan told her. “Don’t take it out of the closet, Andy. 
Leave it safe and sound in its can—okay?” 

Andy didn’t reply. 

“Okay?” Evan demanded. “Okay?” 

“Okay,” Andy finally agreed. 

“We’re going to play outside today, Kermit,” Evan said firmly. “It’s a beautiful 
day, and we’re going to go out and not stay in the stupid basement. Get it?” 

It was a sunny, warm Thursday afternoon. Golden sunlight filtered down 
through the dust-covered basement windows up near the ceiling. 

Standing behind his lab table, arranging his jars and bottles of chemicals, 
Kermit muttered something to himself. 

“No argument,” Andy added. “We’re going outside even if Evan and I have 
to drag you out.” 

“But I have a mixture I want to try,” Kermit whined. 



“You need some sunshine,” Evan told him. “Look how pale you are. You 
look just like a white mouse.” 

Kermit was wearing a huge olive-colored T-shirt over baggy brown shorts. 
With his white-blond hair, beady eyes, and buck teeth, he looked more like a rat 
in human clothes. 

He frowned, hurt by Evan’s description. 

“Okay. I’ll go outside with you,” he murmured unhappily. 

“Yaay!” Andy whooped. It was the first time Kermit had ever agreed to 
leave his basement lab. 

“But first I have to have a drink,” Kermit said. He stepped out from behind 
the lab table and made his way toward the basement stairs. “You want an orange 
soda?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Evan replied. He and Andy followed Kermit up the stairs to 
the kitchen. 

“I can’t believe he agreed to go out and play,” Andy whispered. “Do you 
think he’s sick or something?” 

“Maybe he feels bad about the mean tricks he’s pulled,” Evan whispered. 

The kitchen phone rang. Evan answered it. It was the wrong number. 

He hung up the phone. He and Andy stepped up to the counter. Andy was 
wearing pink jeans, a yellow sleeveless T-shirt, and bright orange high-tops. 

Kermit had already poured out three glasses of orange soda. The soda was 
the same color as Andy’s high-tops, Evan noticed. They all drank the soda down 
quickly. 

“I was really thirsty,” Kermit said. Evan didn’t pay any attention to the 
strange smile on Kermit’s face. After all, Kermit always had a strange smile on 
his face. 

“This orange soda is very sweet,” Andy commented. She made a face. “Too 
sweet! It makes my teeth itch!” 

Kermit laughed. “I think it’s good,” he said. 

They set their glasses down in the sink and stepped out the back door. Evan 
found a red Frisbee on the back stoop. He flipped it to Andy. 

Andy trotted across the backyard and flipped it back to Evan. “Let’s play 
keep-away from Kermit!” she cried. 

“Hey—no way!” Kermit protested. “Toss it to me!” 

Andy sent the Frisbee flying over Kermit’s head to Evan. Kermit made a 
wild grab for it, but it sailed out of his reach. It hit Evan’s hands, but Evan 



dropped it. 

Andy started to laugh. 

“What’s so funny?” Evan demanded. 

Andy shrugged. “I don’t know.” She let out another giggle. 

Evan flipped the Frisbee to Kermit. It bounced off Kermit’s chest. 

This kid is a real klutz, Evan thought. It’s because he never plays sports. He 
never comes up out of his basement. 

Andy uttered a high-pitched laugh. 

Evan started to laugh, too. 

Kermit picked up the Frisbee. He tried to toss it to Andy, but the Frisbee 
sailed way over her head. It hit the side of the garage and bounced off. 

Evan and Andy both laughed harder. 

Evan trotted over to the garage. He sent a sidearm toss toward Andy. She 
missed, and the Frisbee flew into the low hedges at the side of the yard. 

Andy didn’t chase after it. She was laughing too hard. 

Evan laughed even harder. Tears ran down his cheeks. 

What’s happening to me? he wondered, suddenly feeling frightened. 

Why can’t I stop laughing? What’s going on? 

Kermit grinned at both of them. That grin! 

Evan laughed even harder. So hard, his stomach hurt. 

Something is wrong, Evan realized. Something is terribly wrong. 

“K-Kermit—why are we 1-laughing?” he stammered. 

Andy wiped tears from her eyes. She held her sides and laughed some 
more. 

“Why are we laughing?” Evan demanded. 

“I gave you my laughing mixture,” Kermit told them. “I put it in the orange 
soda.” 

Evan tossed back his head and laughed. Andy giggled so hard, she choked. 
But she kept on laughing. 

This isn’t funny. This is scary, Evan thought. But he let out a shrill giggle. 

“How—how long are we going to laugh like this, Kermit?” Evan managed 
to ask. 

“Probably forever,” Kermit replied, flashing his famous toothy grin. 



11 


Evan took a deep breath and tried to hold it. But the laughter burst out of him so 
hard, his chest ached. 

Laughing giddily, Andy made a grab for Kermit. 

Kermit ducked out of her reach and went scampering toward the fence at 
the back of the yard. 

Evan shook his head hard, trying to shake off the effect of the laughter 
potion. But it didn’t help. He laughed until tears rolled down his face. 

Andy chased after Kermit, laughing shrilly. 

Evan followed, gasping for breath. I can’t breathe, he realized. I’m laughing 
so hard, I can’t breathe. 

“K-Kermit—!” Evan choked out. “You’ve got to s-stop it!” A high giggle 
burst out of his throat. “You’ve g-got to!” 

“I don’t know how,” Kermit replied calmly. 

Andy and Evan laughed in reply. 

“It’s awesome—isn’t it!” Kermit declared happily. “The mixture works 
perfectly!” 

Andy made a grab for Kermit’s throat. 

Again, Kermit ducked away. 

Andy and Evan laughed a little harder. 

Andy picked up the Frisbee and tried to heave it at Kermit. But she was 
laughing too hard to control it. The Frisbee sailed over the fence. 

“Hey—get that back. That’s mine!” Kermit demanded. 

Evan and Andy laughed. 

A familiar face popped up on the other side of the fence. 

“Conan!” Kermit cried. 

Conan peered first at Andy, then at Evan. “Are you looking at my yard?” he 
asked Evan. 

Evan struggled to hold it in. But he let out a high, shrill laugh. 

“Didn’t I warn you last week about looking at my yard?” Conan demanded. 

Evan laughed. 

“Conan, give me back my Frisbee,” Kermit whined. 



Conan leaped over the fence. Evan saw that he had the Frisbee in his left 
hand. Conan quickly hid the Frisbee behind his back. 

Andy and Evan laughed. Andy wiped tears from her eyes. Her whole body 
shook with laughter. 

“Give me back my Frisbee,” Kermit insisted. 

Conan ignored him. “What’s so funny?” he asked Andy and Evan. He 
balled his right hand into a fist. 

Andy giggled. 

If we keep laughing, he’ll pound us! Evan realized. But he couldn’t help 
himself. He let out a loud belly laugh. 

“Hey—I want my Frisbee!” Kermit whined. 

“I don’t have your Frisbee,” Conan lied, keeping his left hand behind his 
back. 

Evan tossed his head back and laughed. 

“Yes, you do. It’s behind your back,” Kermit said. “Give it back, Conan.” 

“Who’s going to make me?” Conan demanded in a low, menacing voice. 

Evan let out a high giggle. Andy laughed, too. 

“They are!” Kermit replied to Conan. “They’re going to make you!” He 
turned to Evan. “Make Conan give back my Frisbee.” 

Evan laughed in reply. 

“What’s so funny?” Conan asked again. 

Andy shook her head. “Nothing. Nothing’s funny,” she choked. Then she 
burst out laughing. 

“I don’t like people laughing at me,” Conan said. 

This is horrible! Evan thought. One more laugh—and Conan could 
explode! 

Evan let out a long hyena laugh. 

“I really go ballistic when people laugh at me,” Conan warned. 

Evan and Andy laughed some more. 

“I have to hurt people who laugh at me,” Conan threatened. 

Evan and Andy laughed in reply. 

Conan turned to Kermit. “Why are they laughing like that?” 

Kermit shrugged. “Beats me. I guess they think you’re funny.” 

“Oh, is that right?” Conan shouted angrily, turning back to Evan and Andy. 
“You two think I’m funny?” 

Evan and Andy held their sides and laughed. 



“Give me my Frisbee!” Kermit shouted. 

“Okay. Go chase it.” Conan flung the Frisbee across the hedges. It sailed 
over two yards and disappeared in a clump of evergreen shrubs. 

Kermit went running after it. 

Conan scowled at Evan and Andy. “I’m going to count to three,” he 
growled. “And if you don’t stop laughing by the count of three, I’ll make you 
stop!” He raised both fists to show them how he would make them stop. 

“One...” Conan said. 

Evan laughed. Andy pressed her hand over mouth, but couldn’t stop a 
giggle from escaping. 

“Two...” Conan counted, his face twisted in anger. 

I’ve got to stop laughing! Evan told himself. I’m in serious trouble here. 
Serious. 

He opened his mouth, and a booming “Hahahahaha!” burst out. 

Andy had both hands pressed over her mouth. But it didn’t stop the snickers 
and guffaws from pouring out her nose. 

Kermit came jogging back into the backyard. “I can’t find the Frisbee,” he 
complained. “Somebody has to help me. I can’t find it anywhere.” 

Conan turned to him. “You sure you don’t know why they’re laughing like 
that?” he asked. 

Kermit shook his head. “They told me they think you’re funny-looking,” he 
told Conan. “I guess that’s why they’re laughing.” 

I don’t believe this! Evan thought, so angry he wanted to explode. That 
little creep! How can he do this to us? 

Conan turned back to Andy and Evan. “Last chance to stop,” he said. He 
took a deep breath, stretching out his big, powerful chest. “Three!” 

Andy laughed. 

Evan laughed even harder. 

“I warned you,” Conan growled. 



12 


Andy phoned Evan that night to see how he was feeling. Evan had to hold the 
phone away from his ear. His head hurt too much to press a phone against it. 

“I guess I’ll survive,” Evan groaned. “I’m getting used to looking in the 
mirror and seeing a pile of coleslaw where my head used to be.” 

Andy sighed. “Your cousin is such a creep,” she said. 

“How are you feeling?” Evan asked. “How long did it take you to climb 
down from the tree?” 

“Not too many hours,” Andy replied weakly. 

Conan had said he never hit girls. So he picked Andy up and stuck her onto 
a high tree branch. 

“At least Conan stopped us from laughing,” Evan said. “My stomach still 
hurts from laughing so hard.” 

“Mine, too,” Andy told him. “I’m never going to laugh again. Never. If 
someone tells me the funniest joke in the world, I’ll just smile and say, ‘Very 
funny.’” 

“I can’t believe Kermit did that to us,” Evan moaned. 

“I believe it,” Andy replied dryly. “Kermit will do anything to get us into 
trouble. That’s what he lives for—getting us into major trouble.” 

“Did you hear that little mouse laughing while Conan pounded me into the 
ground?” Evan asked. 

“I was up in the tree, remember? I could see him laughing!” Andy declared. 

There was a long silence at the other end. And then Andy spoke in a hushed 
voice, just above a whisper, “Evan—are you ready to use the Monster Blood on 
Kermit?” 

“Yeah,” Evan replied without having to think about it even for a second. 
“I’m ready.” 



13 


After school the next afternoon, Evan and Andy found Kermit behind his lab 
table as usual. “Hi, Kermit,” Evan called, tossing his backpack down and 
stepping up to the table. 

Kermit didn’t glance up. He was busy stirring ingredients in a large mixing 
bowl, using a large wooden spoon. 

Evan peered into the bowl. It looked like pie dough in there. It was thick 
and gooey and yellowish. 

Kermit hummed to himself as he stirred. 

Andy was wearing a sleeveless, hot pink T-shirt over bright yellow shorts 
and matching yellow sneakers. She stepped up beside Evan and peeked into the 
bowl. “Making a pie?” she asked. 

Kermit ignored her, too. He kept stirring and humming, stirring and 
humming. 

Finally he stopped and glanced up at Evan. “I told my mom you lost my 
Frisbee,” he said, sneering. “She says you have to get me a new one.” 

“Huh? Me?” Evan cried. 

Andy walked around to Kermit’s side of the table. She lowered her head to 
the bowl. “Smells lemony,” she said. “What is it, Kermit? Is it some kind of 
dough?” 

“It was your fault my Frisbee got lost,” Kermit told Evan, ignoring Andy’s 
questions. “Mom says you’re a very bad baby-sitter.” 

Evan let out an angry cry. He balled his hands into fists. He struggled to 
keep himself from strangling Kermit. 

It was a real struggle. 

“Mom wanted to know who drank up all the orange soda,” Kermit 
continued. “I told her you and Andy drank it.” 

“Kermit!” Evan shrieked. “You played a horrible trick on us yesterday! You 
put chemicals in our orange soda! You made us laugh and laugh and laugh— 
until it hurt. Then you got us in major trouble with Conan! Did you tell your 
mom that? Did you? Did you ? ” 

Kermit put his hands over his ears. “Don’t shout, Evan,” he whined. “You 
know I have very sensitive ears.” 



Another angry growl escaped Evan’s throat. He felt about to explode with 

rage. 

“I told my mom that you shout at me all the time,” Kermit continued. 
“Mom says you’re just immature. She thinks you’re very babyish. She only lets 
you stay with me because you’re my cousin.” 

Kermit picked up the wooden spoon and started to stir the doughy mixture 
again. 

Evan spun away, trying to control his anger. 

I’m glad Andy and I are going to do what we’re going to do, he thought. 
I’m glad we’re going to give Kermit a little scare. He’s been asking for it. He 
really has. And now he’s going to get it. 

Evan walked over to his backpack. He unzipped it and pulled out a candy 
bar. “Mmmm. A Choc-O-Lik Bar,” he murmured. He crossed back to the lab 
table, unwrapping the candy bar as he walked. 

Standing in front of Kermit, Evan took a big bite of the chocolate bar. It 
made a loud crunch as his teeth sank into it. “Mmmmmm!” he proclaimed. 
“Choc-O-Lik Bars are cool.” 

The candy bar was part of the plot. 

Evan knew that the Choc-O-Lik Bar was Kermit’s favorite. 

The candy bar was supposed to distract Kermit. While Kermit stared at the 
candy and pleaded with Evan to give him a bite, Andy would slip a tiny chunk of 
Monster Blood into Kermit’s mixture. 

Evan crunched the candy bar loudly, making lip-smacking sounds as he 
chewed. 

Kermit glanced up. He stopped stirring the yellowish dough. “Is that really 
a Choc-O-Lik Bar?” he asked. 

Evan nodded. “Yeah. Sure is.” 

“My favorite,” Kermit said. 

“I know,” Evan replied. He took another crunchy bite. 

Kermit stared at the candy bar. 

Andy stood beside Kermit. Evan saw the blue container of Monster Blood 
in her hand. Just seeing the can made Evan shiver. 

So many bad memories. So many nightmares. 

The green gunk inside the can was so dangerous. 

“Can I have a piece of the Choc-O-Lik Bar?” Kermit asked Evan. 

Andy lifted off the top of the Monster Blood container. 



“Maybe. Maybe not,” Evan told Kermit. 

Andy stuck two fingers in the container. She pulled out a gooey green hunk 
of Monster Blood. 

“Please? Pretty please?” Kermit begged Evan. 

Andy dropped the chunk of Monster Blood into Kermit’s big bowl of 
dough. Then she quietly snapped the cap back on the container and slid it back 
into her bag. 

Evan took another bite of the candy bar. 

“You shouldn’t eat a candy bar unless you have enough to share with 
everyone,” Kermit scolded. 

“You haven’t been very nice to me,” Evan told him. “So I’m not going to 
share.” 

Kermit started stirring the dough again. He stared angrily at Evan as he 
stirred. He didn’t see the green Monster Blood being stirred up in the yellow 
dough. 

Evan took another bite of the Choc-O-Lik Bar. Only a few bites left. 

“I’m going to tell Mom you were mean to me,” Kermit threatened. “I’m 
going to tell her you wouldn’t share.” 

Evan shook his head. “See what I mean? You’re not nice to me, Kermit. If 
you were nice to me, I’d share all my candy bars with you.” 

Andy winked at Evan. Then she peered into the bowl. 

Kermit stirred and stirred. 

Andy’s expression became tense. She gripped the edge of the table with 
both hands. Evan saw her nibble her bottom lip. 

Watching Kermit stir the Monster Blood, Evan suddenly had a heavy 
feeling in his stomach. 

We’ve done it, he thought. 

We’ve opened another can of Monster Blood. 

He stared at the yellow dough in the bowl. It made a soft plopping sound as 
Kermit pushed the wooden spoon through it. 

Now what? Evan wondered. 

Now what’s going to happen? 



14 


Kermit stirred the yellow dough. The big wooden spoon scraped the bowl. The 
doughy mixture plopped softly, tumbling and swirling as Kermit worked. 

Andy kept nibbling her lower lip, her eyes locked on the bowl. Her brown 
hair fell over her face. But she made no move to push it back. 

Evan watched from the other side of the table. His heart began doing flip- 
flops in his chest. He took another bite of the chocolate bar. 

He chewed as quietly as possible. He didn’t want to disturb Kermit. As he 
chewed, he stared at the bowl. 

He and Andy were waiting. Waiting to see what the little hunk of Monster 
Blood would do to Kermit’s mixture. 

Waiting to see the look of horror on Kermit’s face. 

Waiting to pay him back for being such a little monster. 

Kermit didn’t seem to notice how quiet it had become in the basement. 
Dogface came lumbering in, panting loudly, his paws thudding on the tile floor. 

No one turned to look at him. 

The dog hiccupped, turned, and padded out of the room. 

Evan bit off another chunk of the candy bar. 

Kermit stirred, humming to himself. The spoon scraped the side of the 
bowl. The dough slapped against the edge. 

And spilled over. 

Kermit stopped stirring. “Weird,” he muttered. 

Evan’s heart did a flip-flop up to his throat. “What’s weird?” he asked. 

“It grew,” Kermit replied, scratching his white-blond hair. “Look.” 

Kermit pointed to the yellow dough with the wooden spoon. It plopped up 
over the top of the bowl. 

“It—it’s growing really fast!” Kermit declared. 

Evan took a few steps closer. Andy leaned down to get a better look. 

The dough rose up, shimmering and quivering. 

“Wow!” Kermit cried. “It wasn’t supposed to do this! It was supposed to 
turn sticky and black!” 

Andy winked at Evan. Her brown eyes lit up excitedly. A smile spread 



across her face. 

The yellow blob quivered up over the top of the bowl, as big as a beach 

ball. 

How big was it going to get? 

“Oh, wow! This is awesome!” Kermit declared. 

The dough shimmered higher. Wider. 

It rose up high over the bowl. It overflowed the sides. 

Bigger. Bigger. It started to look like an enormous hot air balloon. 

“It’s taller than me!” Kermit declared. His voice had changed. He didn’t 
sound excited now. He was beginning to sound frightened. 

“We’d better stop it, I think,” he murmured. 

“How?” Andy asked. She stepped out from behind the lab table and joined 
Evan on the other side. 

Andy grinned at Evan. She was enjoying the expression of fear on Kermit’s 
face. Evan had to admit he enjoyed it, too. 

The ball of yellow dough shimmered and shook, growing bigger every 
second. It bubbled up faster and faster, pressing Kermit back against the 
basement wall. 

“Hey—help!” he sputtered. 

Andy’s grin grew wider. “He’s terrified now,” she whispered to Evan. 

Evan nodded. He knew he was supposed to enjoy this. It was supposed to 
be sweet revenge. 

But Evan was terrified, too. 

How much bigger would the huge yellow blob grow? Could they stop it? 
Or would it grow and grow and grow until it filled the entire basement? 

“Evan—help me!” Kermit cried. “I’m trapped back here!” 

The dough began to shake harder. It bobbed up against the basement 
ceiling. 

Evan glanced down and realized he was still holding a chunk of candy bar 
in his hand. The chocolate had started to melt. 

Evan started to pop the candy into his mouth—just as the giant dough ball 
exploded with a deafening roar. 



15 


“ULP!” 

Evan swallowed hard as the doughy goop exploded. The force of the blast 
sent the candy chunk flying down his throat. 

He started to cough and choke. 

With a hard splat, globs of sticky dough hit him in the face. The yellow goo 
spread over his hair and covered his eyes. 

“Hey!” Evan choked out. He frantically wiped the dough from his eyes, 
blinking hard. 

He could taste it on his tongue. “Yuck!” He spit it out and rubbed the sticky 
stuff off his lips. Then he pulled thick wads of goo off his face. 

“It’s stuck to my hair!” Andy wailed. 

“Help me! Help me!” Kermit’s cries sounded as if they were coming from 
far away. Evan quickly saw why. Kermit was buried under a big heap of yellow 
goop. 

Pulling dough from his hair, Evan hurried behind the lab table. He reached 
down with both hands and tugged Kermit up from under the dough. 

“Wow. I’m kind of dizzy!” Kermit cried. He leaned heavily against the lab 
table. His hands slid in the yellow goo that covered the table. 

“Til never get it out of my hair!” Andy wailed, tugging at her hair with both 
hands. “Never!” She turned to Evan. “It wasn’t supposed to explode. Just get 
big. I guess something in the dough made it blow up.” 

Wiping dough off the front of his T-shirt, Evan gazed around the basement. 
The yellow dough had splattered over everything. Now it dripped down the 
walls, making soft plopping sounds as it hit the floor. 

“That was an awesome explosion!” Kermit declared. His eyeglasses were 
covered with yellow goop. He pulled them off and squinted around the room. 

He turned to Andy. “Did you put something in the bowl?” 

“Never mind,” Andy replied, still pulling sticky yellow globs from her hair. 

Kermit tugged her arm. “What was it? What did you put in my mixture?” 

“Why do you want to know?” Andy demanded. 

“So we can do that again!” Kermit declared gleefully. “It was so awesome !” 

“No way we’re doing it again!” Evan moaned. 



Their revenge on Kermit hadn’t exactly worked out, Evan realized bitterly. 
Kermit should be in tears by now. Or he should be quivering in fear and terror. 

Instead, his eyes were dancing with excitement and he was grinning from 
ear to ear. 

We were total jerks! Evan thought sadly. Kermit is loving this! 

Kermit pulled out a cloth and cleaned his glasses. “What a mess!” he 
declared, gazing around the room. “Evan, you’re going to be in major trouble 
when Mom gets home.” 

Evan swallowed hard. He had forgotten about Kermit’s mom. 

She had given him one last chance to prove that he was a good baby-sitter. 

Now she was going to come home to a basement splattered with sticky 
yellow goop from floor to ceiling. And Kermit was sure to tell her the whole 
thing was Evan’s fault. 

Aunt Dee will tell everyone in the world why she had to take the job away 
from me, Evan thought unhappily. And I’ll never get another baby-sitting job as 
long as I live. 

Bye-bye, Walkman, he thought grimly. No way he’d ever earn the money 
for one now. 

“This is your fault!” he snapped at Andy, pointing an accusing finger at her. 
A spot of yellow dough stuck to his fingernail. 

“My fault?” Andy shrieked. “You’re the one who wanted to teach Kermit a 
lesson!” 

“But you ’re the one who wanted to use the Monster Blood!” Evan cried. 

“Look at my hair!” Andy wailed. “It’s solid goop! It looks like I’m wearing 
a helmet! It’s ruined! Ruined!” She uttered an angry growl. 

Kermit giggled. He bent down and picked up a chunk of the sticky yellow 
dough. “Think fast!” he shouted—and heaved it at Evan. 

The dough ball hit the front of Evan’s T-shirt and stuck there. “Stop it, 
Kermit!” he shouted angrily. 

“Let’s have a dough fight!” Kermit suggested, grinning. He scooped up 
another handful of the stuff. 

“No! No way! Stop it!” Evan cried. He pulled the dough ball off his T-shirt. 
“This is dangerous! We’ve got to clean this up!” 

Kermit flung another big chunk of yellow goo at Evan. 

Evan tried to dodge out of the way. But his sneakers slipped on a big, slimy 
puddle of goop, and he hit the floor hard. He landed on his side with a loud 



“OOF!” 

Kermit let out a gleeful laugh. “That was awesome!” he declared. “What a 
shot!” 

Andy hurried over and helped tug Evan to his feet. “Maybe we can vacuum 
it all up,” she suggested. She turned to Kermit. “Where does your mom keep the 
vacuum cleaner?” 

Kermit shrugged. “Beats me.” 

Evan leaned against the lab table. His hand rested in a puddle of dough, but 
he didn’t care. 

He suddenly felt strange. 

His entire body started to tingle. His stomach felt queasy. He shut his eyes, 
trying to force the strange feeling away. 

But the tingling grew stronger. 

He heard a shrill whistling sound in his ears. His muscles started to ache. 
He could feel the blood throbbing at his temples. 

“Maybe we can mop it up,” Evan heard Andy say. But her voice sounded 
tiny and far away. 

He turned to see her pick up a mop and bucket from against the basement 

wall. 

That bucket is too tiny, Evan thought. Why does Andy want to use such a 
tiny mop? 

The room tilted—to the right, then to the left. 

Evan blinked hard, trying to straighten everything out. 

His whole body buzzed, as if an electrical current were shooting through 
him. He shut his eyes and pressed both hands against his throbbing temples. 

“Evan—aren’t you going to help me?” Andy’s voice sounded so faint, so 
far away. “Evan—?” he heard her call. “Evan—?” 

When he opened his eyes, he saw that Andy and Kermit were staring up at 
him. Their expressions had changed. Their eyes bulged in fright and surprise. 
Their mouths were wide open. 

“What’s going on?” Evan demanded. His voice boomed through the 
basement, echoing off the concrete walls. 

Andy and Kermit stared up at him. The tiny mop fell out of Andy’s hand 
and clattered to the floor. 

Such a tiny mop, Evan thought again, staring down at it. Such a tiny bucket. 

And then he realized that Andy and Kermit were tiny, too. 



“Oh!” A cry of surprise escaped Evan’s throat. 

Everyone is so small. Everything is so tiny. 

It took Evan a long time to figure out what had happened. 

But when it finally dawned on him, he let out a shriek of horror. 

“Oh, no! No!” he moaned. “I’m growing ! I’m growing bigger and bigger!” 



16 


Evan lowered his eyes to the floor. It seemed so far below. 

“My—my legs—” he stammered. 

Andy and Kermit still hadn’t said a word. They stared up at him, their faces 
twisted in surprise. 

Evan swallowed hard. “What’s going on?” he cried. His voice boomed 
through the small room. “I must be eight feet tall!” 

“You—you’re a giant]” Kermit declared. He stepped forward and grabbed 
on to Evan’s knee. “Me, too! Okay? Okay, Evan? Make me a giant, too!” he 
begged. 

“Give me a break,” Evan muttered. He picked up Kermit easily and set him 
down on top of the lab table. 

Then Evan turned to Andy. “What am I going to do? This is terrible!” 

“Not so loud!” Andy pleaded, covering her ears with her hands. “Please, 
Evan—try to whisper or something, okay?” 

“What am I going to do?” Evan repeated, ignoring her plea. 

Andy forced a smile. “Try out for basketball, I guess.” 

Evan balled his huge hands into huge fists. “I’m not in the mood for your 
sick sense of humor, Andy,” he snapped. 

His body started to tingle again. His muscles ached. 

I’m growing even bigger, he realized. 

Evan’s throat suddenly felt very dry. He realized his knees were shaking. 
They made a loud banging sound as they hit together. 

Don’t panic! he instructed himself. 

The first rule is—don’t panic. 

But why shouldn ’t he panic? His head was nearly pushing up against the 
basement ceiling. 

Kermit stood up on top of the lab table. His white high-tops were splattered 
with yellow dough. They looked like little doll shoes to Evan. 

“Make me a giant, too!” Kermit pleaded. “Why can’t I be a giant?” 

Evan stared down at his cousin. Kermit really did look like a little white 


mouse now. 



Evan’s body tingled harder. The room tilted and swayed again. “This is 
your fault, Andy!” he shouted. 

Andy shrank back against the wall. “Huh? My fault?” 

“You and your Monster Blood!” Evan thundered. “I—I swallowed some!” 

Andy stared up at him. “How?” 

“When Kermit’s mixture exploded,” Evan replied. “I was putting the candy 
bar in my mouth. The dough exploded. I started to choke. The dough hit me in 
the face. I remember I tasted it. It was on my lips. And—and—” 

“And it had Monster Blood in it!” Andy finished his sentence for him. Her 
face filled with horror. “Oh, Evan. I’m sorry. I really am.” 

But then her face brightened. “The Monster Blood splashed on your 
clothes, too. That was lucky. They’re growing with you.” 

Evan let out an exasperated sigh. “Lucky?” he cried. “You call this lucky? 
What if I keep growing and never stop?” 

Kermit remained standing on the lab table. He stared up at Evan. “You 
mean if I eat some of the dough, I’ll turn into a giant, too?” He bent down and 
scooped up a handful of dough. 

“Don’t you dare!” Evan screamed. He leaned over and flicked the dough 
out of Kermit’s hand with two fingers. Then he hovered over Kermit, glaring at 
him menacingly. “I can squash you, Kermit. I really can,” Evan warned. 

“Okay, okay,” Kermit muttered, his voice trembling. He slid off the table 
and stepped behind Andy. 

Wow, Evan thought, I actually have Kermit afraid of me! That’s a first. 
Maybe growing so big isn’t all bad! 

His body tingled and vibrated. The whistling in his ears grew louder. He 
could feel himself grow some more. 

He turned to see Dogface pad into the room. The big sheepdog looked like 
a tiny poodle. 

The dog hiccupped. It sniffed at a yellow puddle of dough on the floor. 

“No!” Evan cried. “Don’t eat that! Dogface—no!” 

He bent over and picked up the sheepdog. 

Seeing a giant human lift him up easily off the floor, Dogface let out a yelp 
of terror. All four legs thrashed the air as the frightened dog struggled to break 
free. 

But Evan cradled the sheepdog in one arm and held on to him tightly. 

When he realized he couldn’t escape from the giant, the dog’s terrified 



yelps turned to quiet whimpers. 

“Take Dogface out of here. Lock him outside,” Evan ordered Kermit. He 
lowered the whimpering dog to the floor. 

Kermit obediently led the dog away. Halfway to the stairs, he turned back to 
Evan. “Hey, you cured Dogface’s hiccups!” 

I guess I scared them out of him! Evan told himself. 

Kermit led Dogface up the stairs. Evan turned to Andy. “I told you to leave 
the Monster Blood in the closet!” he cried. “Now look at me!” 

He had to duck his head. Otherwise it would brush against the ceiling. 

“Who told you to eat the stuff?” Andy replied. “Why did you have to be 
eating that candy bar?” 

“It was part of the plan—remember?” Evan snapped angrily. He uttered a 
bitter sigh. “Great plan we had!” 

“I guess it didn’t work out too well,” Andy admitted. 

“I guess it didn’t,” Evan muttered. “Now what will happen to me? What 
will Mom and Dad say?” 

“What will you eat?” Andy added. “You’ll probably have to eat sixteen 
meals a day! And where will you sleep? And how can you go to school? There 
aren’t any desks big enough for you. And what will you wear? They’ll have to 
make your T-shirts out of bedsheets!” 

“You’re not cheering me up,” Evan murmured glumly. 

He felt his body tingle. Again, he could feel his skin stretching, feel all of 
his muscles throb. 

“Ow!” he cried out as the top of his head banged against the ceiling. 

He had to lean over to rub his head. 

“Evan—you’re growing!” Andy exclaimed. 

“I know. I know,” Evan grumbled. The basement ceiling was at least nine 
feet high. Evan had to stoop to keep from banging the ceiling. That meant he 
was more than nine feet tall. 

A shiver of fear shook his body. He glanced around the basement. “I have to 
get out of here!” he cried. 

Kermit returned to the room. He stopped and gawked at Evan. “You grew 
even more!” he cried. “I’ll bet you weigh three hundred pounds!” 

“I don’t have time to weigh myself,” Evan replied, rolling his eyes. “I have 
to get out of here. I’m so big, I can’t stand up. I’m so big, I—” 

He stopped. He felt himself grow a little more. 



“I’m too big now!” he cried. “I’m trapped down here! There’s no way I can 
get out!” 



17 


“Stay calm,” Andy called up to him. 

“Calm? How can I stay calm?” Evan shrieked. “I’m going to spend the rest 
of my life in this basement! I’m too big for the stairs!” 

“Mom won’t like that,” Kermit said, shaking his head. 

“Try the stairs!” Andy cried. “Maybe you can squeeze up if you hurry!” 

Evan turned to the basement stairs. “I—I don’t think I’ll fit,” he stammered. 
The stairway appeared very narrow. And Evan was now very wide. 

“Come on,” Andy urged. “We’ll help you.” 

“You push and I’ll pull,” Kermit said, running to the stairs. 

Evan lumbered toward the stairs. His sneakers thudded heavily on the tile 
floor. He stooped his shoulders to keep his head from crashing against the 
ceiling. 

“Try not to grow any bigger!” Andy called, following closely behind him. 

“Great advice!” Evan replied sarcastically. “Do you have any more advice 
like that?” 

“Don’t be nasty,” Andy scolded. “I’m only trying to help you.” 

“You’ve already helped me more than enough,” Evan grumbled. 

He felt his body start to tingle. His muscles started to throb. 

“No! Please—no!” He uttered a silent plea. I don’t want to grow any more! 

He sucked in a deep breath and held it. He shut his eyes tight and tried to 
concentrate—concentrate on not growing. 

“I think I just saw you grow another few inches,” Andy called to him. 
“You’d better hurry, Evan.” 

“How big is Evan going to get?” Kermit asked. He had climbed halfway up 
the stairs. “Is he going to get bigger than an elephant?” 

“That’s not helpful, Kermit,” Evan muttered unhappily. “Please stop asking 
questions like that—okay?” 

“If you get as big as an elephant, will you give me a ride?” Kermit 
demanded. 

Evan glared angrily at his cousin. “Do you know what elephants do to 
mice?” he bellowed. Evan raised one foot and brought it down with a crunching 
thud to demonstrate to Kermit what elephants do to mice. 



Kermit swallowed hard and didn’t say anything more. 

Evan walked over to the stairway. He glanced up the stairs. “I don’t think I 
can make it,” he told Andy. “I’m too big.” 

“Give it a try,” she urged. “You’ve got to, Evan.” 

Evan stepped on to the first step. Leaning low, he raised himself to the next 

step. 

“You’re doing it!” Kermit cried happily. He stayed at the top of the stairs, 
watching Evan’s progress eagerly. 

Evan took another step. The wooden stairs creaked under his weight. He 
tried to lean on the banister. But it snapped beneath his hand. 

He climbed two more steps. 

He was a third of the way up when he became stuck. 

His body was just too wide for the narrow stairway. 

Kermit pulled both of Evan’s hands. Andy pushed him from behind. 

But they couldn’t budge him. 

“I—I can’t move,” Evan stammered. He felt panic choke his throat. “I’m 
jammed tight in here. There’s no way I’ll ever get out!” 

Then he felt his body start to tingle. And he knew he was growing even 


more. 



18 


As Evan grew, he heard a cracking sound. 

Soft at first. Then louder. Very close by. 

He cried out as the wall to his left crumbled. His expanding body had 
broken the wall away. 

As the wall cracked and fell, Evan took a deep breath and lurched up the 
stairs. 

“Made it!” he cried as he squeezed through the doorway. 

A few seconds later, he burst out through the kitchen door, into the sunlit 
backyard. 

Dogface lay stretched out near the fence. The dog jumped to his feet as the 
gigantic Evan appeared. Frightened, Dogface gave a loud bark, his stubby tail 
wagging furiously, then turned and bolted from the yard. 

Kermit and Andy followed Evan into the backyard, cheering and shouting, 
“You made it! You’re free!” 

Evan turned to face them. “But now what?” he asked. “Now what do I do? 
I’m nearly as tall as the garage. How tall am I going to grow?” 

Kermit stepped closer to Evan. “Look—I’m standing in your shade!” he 
declared. 

Evan’s shadow fell across the yard like the shadow of a tree trunk. “Kermit, 
give me a break,” Evan muttered. “I have a little bit of a problem here, you 
know?” 

“Maybe we should get you to a doctor,” Andy suggested. 

“A doctor?” Evan cried. “What could a doctor do for me?” 

“Put you on a diet?” Andy joked. 

Evan leaned over her, squinting down at her menacingly. “Andy, I’m 
warning you. One more bad joke, and—” 

“Okay, okay.” Andy raised her hands as if trying to shield herself from him. 
“Sorry. Just trying to keep it light.” 

“Evan isn’t light. He’s heavy!” Kermit chimed in. His idea of a joke. 

Evan let out an unhappy growl. “I don’t think a doctor can help me. I mean, 
I couldn’t fit into a doctor’s office.” 

“But maybe if we brought the can of Monster Blood along, the doctor could 



figure out an antidote,” Andy suggested. “Some kind of cure.” 

Evan started to reply. But shrill voices on the other side of the tall wooden 
fence at the back of the yard made him stop. 

“Cut it out, Conan!” a girl pleaded. 

“Yeah. Leave us alone, Conan!” Evan heard a boy shout. 

Evan lumbered over to the fence and peered into Conan’s yard. He saw 
Conan Barber furiously swinging a baseball bat, swinging it hard, forcing a little 
boy and girl to back up against the fence. 

“Let us go!” the little girl screamed. “Why are you so mean?” 

Conan swung the bat, bringing it close to the boy and girl, making them cry 

out. 

Evan leaned over the fence. His broad shadow fell over Conan. “Want to 
play ball with me, Conan?” Evan thundered. 

The two little kids spun around. They stared up at the enormous Evan. It 
took them a long time to realize they were staring at a real, giant human. 

Then they began to scream. 

Conan’s mouth dropped open and a strangled gurgling sound escaped his 
throat. 

“Hey, Conan, how about a little batting practice?” Evan asked, his voice 
booming over the backyard. Evan reached over the fence and plucked the bat 
from Conan’s hand. 

The little boy and girl ran away screaming. They darted through the hedge 
at the side of Conan’s yard and kept running until they vanished from view. 

Evan took the bat and snapped it in two between his hands. It cracked apart 
like a toothpick. 

Conan froze in place, staring up at Evan in disbelief. He pointed a 
trembling finger. “Evan—you—you—you—” he stammered. 

Evan tossed the two pieces of the cracked bat at Conan’s feet, forcing 
Conan to hop out of the way. 

“You ate Monster Blood!” Conan accused. “That sticky green stuff. The 
stuff that Cuddles the hamster ate last year! You ate some—didn’t you!” 

Evan didn’t want to be reminded of Cuddles the hamster. The little creature 
had turned into a huge, vicious beast after eating Monster Blood. Cuddles had 
returned to hamster size only because the Monster Blood was old and stale. 

But the Monster Blood Evan had swallowed was new and fresh. 

Now I’m a huge, vicious beast, Evan thought sadly. 



“Are you crazy? Are you totally messed up? Why did you eat Monster 
Blood?” Conan demanded. 

“It was an accident,” Evan told him. 

Conan continued to stare up at Evan, but his fearful expression faded. 
Conan suddenly started to laugh. “I’m glad it happened to you and not me!” he 
exclaimed. 

“Huh? Why?” Evan demanded. 

“Because I’m afraid of heights!” Conan replied. He laughed again. “I 
always thought you were a nerd, Evan!” Conan declared. “But now you’re a BIG 
nerd!” 

Evan let out an angry growl and lurched forward. He tried to climb over the 
fence. But he didn’t step high enough. Conan’s fence splintered beneath Evan’s 
heavy sneaker. 

“Hey—!” Conan cried in alarm. 

He tried to turn and run, but Evan was too fast for him. 

Evan grabbed Conan under the shoulders and lifted him off the ground as if 
he weighed nothing. 

“Let go! Let go of me!” Conan screamed. He kicked his arms and legs like 
a baby. 

“I never knew you were afraid of heights,” Evan said. Holding Conan in 
both hands, he raised him high in the air. 

“Let me go! Let me go!” Conan cried. “What are you going to do?” 

“Let’s see if you know how to fly!” Evan exclaimed. 

“Noooooo!” Conan’s shrill cry rose up over the yard. He kicked and 
thrashed as Evan raised him even higher. “Put me down! Put me down!” 

“Okay,” Evan agreed. “I’ll put you down.” He set Conan down on a high 
tree branch. 

Conan clung to the trunk for dear life, trembling and crying. “Evan—don’t 
leave me up here! Please! I told you, I’m afraid of heights! Evan—come back! 
Evan!” 

A huge grin on his huge face, Evan turned away from Conan. “That was a 
lot of fun!” he called down to his friends. 

Conan continued to weep and wail up in the tree. Evan took a few steps 
toward the front yard. “That was excellent!” Evan said, still grinning. 
“Excellent!” 

“Where are you going?” he heard Andy call up to him. 



“Yeah! What are you going to do now?” Kermit asked eagerly. 

“This is kind of cool!” Evan declared. Having his revenge on Conan had 
put him in a better mood. “Let’s go see if we can have some more fun!” 

“Yaaaay!” Kermit cried, racing to keep up with Evan. 

Evan ducked his head to keep from banging it on a low tree branch. He took 
several big steps toward the street. 

“Oh!” He stopped and cried out when he felt himself step on something. He 
heard a cracking, then a crunch beneath his enormous sneaker. 

He turned to see Kermit raise both hands to his face. “Oh, no!” Kermit 
shrieked. “You squashed Andy! Evan—you squashed Andy!” 



19 


Evan gasped and jerked up his foot. 

Kermit let out a high-pitched laugh. “Gotcha, Evan!” 

Andy came running over from the driveway. “That wasn’t funny!” she 
scolded Kermit. “That was a really dumb joke, Kermit. You scared Evan to 
death.” 

“I know!” Kermit laughed, very pleased with himself. 

Evan let out a sigh of relief. He bent down to see what he had stepped on. 
Conan’s skateboard. It lay crushed and splintered, flat on the grass. 

He turned angrily to Kermit. “No more stupid jokes,” he thundered. “Or I’ll 
put you up in the tree with Conan.” 

“Okay. Okay,” Kermit mumbled. “You think you’re tough just because 
you’re so big.” 

Evan held up a pointer finger. “Careful, Kermit,” he warned. “I could knock 
you over with one finger.” 

“Conan is still yelling for help back there,” Andy reported. 

Evan smiled. “Let’s see who’s hanging out at the playground. Maybe we 
can surprise some other kids.” 

Evan crossed the street, taking long, heavy strides. He felt as if he were 
walking on stilts. This is kind of cool, he told himself. I’m the biggest person in 
the world! 

He passed by the neighbors’ basketball hoop, which stood on a pole at the 
curb. Hey—I’m at least six feet taller than the basket! he realized. 

“Hey—wait up!” Andy called breathlessly. “Don’t walk so fast!” 

“I can’t help it!” Evan called back. 

A small blue car rolled by, then squealed to a stop. Evan could see a woman 
and two kids in the car. They were all staring out at him. 

A little girl on a bike turned the corner. She started pedaling toward Evan. 
He saw the look of surprise on her face when she spotted him. 

She braked her bike hard, nearly toppling over the handlebars. Then she 
wheeled around and sped out of sight. 

Evan laughed. 

Another car screeched to a halt. 



As he started to cross another street, Evan turned to see who was in the car. 
He didn’t watch where he was going. 

A loud crunch made him stop. 

With a gasp, he peered down—and saw that he had stepped on a car. 

“Oh, no!” Evan cried. His sneaker had crushed in the top of the car—as if it 
were made of tinfoil. 

Evan backed away in horror. Was someone inside? 

He dropped to his knees to stare in the window. “Thank goodness!” he cried 
when he saw that the car was empty. 

“Wow!” Kermit exclaimed, walking around and around the smashed-in car. 
“You must weigh at least a ton, Evan!” 

Andy stepped up beside Evan, who remained on his knees. “Be careful,” 
she warned. “You’ve got to watch every step.” 

Evan nodded in agreement. “At least I think I’ve stopped growing,” he 
called down to her. 

As they reached the playground, Evan saw several kids shouting and 
pointing excitedly at a tall maple tree on the corner. 

What’s going on? Evan wondered. 

As he lumbered closer, he saw the problem. Their yellow kite had become 
stuck up in the tree. 

“Hey—no problem!” Evan boomed. 

The kids screamed and cried out in surprise as Evan stepped up to them. 
They all backed away, their faces tight with fear. 

Evan reached up easily and tugged the kite loose from the tree limb. Then 
he leaned down and gently handed it to the nearest kid. 

“Hey, thanks!” A grin spread across the kid’s freckled face. 

The other kids all cheered. Evan took a bow. 

Andy laughed. “You need a red cape and a pair of blue tights,” she shouted 
up to him. “It’s Super Evan!” 

“Super Evan!” the kids shouted as they ran off happily with their kite. 

Evan leaned down to talk to Andy. “If I stay big like this, do you think I 
really could get a job as a superhero?” 

“I don’t think it pays very well,” Kermit chimed in. “In the comic books, 
you never see those guys getting paid.” 

They crossed the street and headed toward the playground. Evan glanced at 
the redbrick school building on the corner. It’s so small, he thought. 



He suddenly realized that he stood at least two stories tall. If I walk over 
there, I can see into the second-floor classrooms, he thought. 

How will I go to school? Evan wondered. I can’t squeeze through the door. 
I won’t fit in Mrs. McGrady’s room anymore. 

Feeling a wave of sadness roll over him, he turned away from the school 
building. He heard cheers and shouts. A softball game was underway on the 
practice diamond. 

Evan recognized Billy Denver and Brian Johnson and some of the other 
kids. He always had to beg to play softball with them. They never wanted Evan 
on their team because he wasn’t a very good hitter. 

He strolled over the grass to the practice diamond. Andy and Kermit ran 
behind him, struggling to keep up. 

Brian was starting to pitch the ball. But he stopped short when he spotted 
Evan. The ball dropped from his hand and dribbled to the ground. 

Players on both teams gasped and shouted. 

Evan strode up to Brian on the pitcher’s mound. Brian’s eyes bulged in fear 
as Evan drew near. Brian raised his hands to shield himself. “Don’t hurt me!” he 
pleaded. 

“Hey—it’s Evan!” Billy exclaimed. “Look, guys! It’s Evan!” 

Kids from both teams gathered around, murmuring excitedly, nervously. 

Brian slowly lowered his hands and stared up at the giant Evan. “Wow! It 
really is you! Evan—how did you do that?” 

“What happened to you?” another kid cried. 

“He’s been working out!” Andy told them. 

The kids laughed. Very tense laughter. 

Andy always has a joke for everything, Evan thought. 

“Uh... want to play?” Brian asked. “You can be on my team.” 

“No. My team!” Billy insisted. 

“No way! He’s on my team!” Brian shouted. “We’re one man short, 
remember?” 

“Don’t say short around Evan!” Andy joked. 

Everyone laughed again. 

Billy and Brian continued to fight over which team would get Evan. Evan 
stood back and enjoyed the argument. He picked up a wooden bat. It had always 
seemed so heavy before. Now it felt as light as a pencil. 

Billy won the argument. “You can bat now, Evan,” he said, grinning up at 



him. 

“How can I pitch to him? He’s a giant!” Brian complained. 

“Pitch it really high,” Evan suggested. 

“Evan, do your mom and dad know you grew like this?” Billy asked, 
walking to home plate beside Evan. 

Evan swallowed hard. He hadn’t thought about his parents. They’d be 
getting home from work soon. They weren’t going to be happy about this. How 
would he break the news to them? he wondered. 

And then he thought: I won’t have to break the news to them. They’ll see 
for themselves what has happened! 

He stepped up to the plate and swung the bat onto his shoulder. “Wish we 
had a bigger bat,” he muttered. It was a little larger than a drinking straw. 

“Get a hit!” Billy shouted from behind the backstop. 

“Get a hit, Evan!” several other players called. 

Brian’s first pitch sailed past Evan’s ankles. 

“Higher!” Evan called out to him. “You’ll have to throw it higher.” 

“I’m trying!” Brian grumbled. He pulled the softball back and tossed it 
again. 

This time, the pitch flew past Evan’s knees. 

“It’s hard to throw that high,” Brian complained. “This isn’t fair.” 

“Strike him out, Brian!” the first baseman cried. “You can do it. Evan 
always strikes out!” 

It’s true, Evan thought unhappily. I do usually strike out. 

He gripped the little bat tighter, poising it over his shoulder. He suddenly 
wondered if being so big would make a difference. 

Maybe he’d just strike out bigger ! 

Brian’s next pitch sailed higher. Evan swung hard. The bat hit the softball 
with a deafening thwack —and cracked in two. 

The ball sailed up, up, up. Off the playground. Over the school. And out of 
sight, somewhere in the next block. 

Cheers and cries of amazement rang out over the diamond. 

Evan watched the ball fly out of sight. Then he leaped joyfully in the air 
and began running the bases. 

The longest home run in the history of the world! 

It took only four steps between bases. He had just rounded second base 
when he heard the sirens. 



Evan turned his eyes to the street in time to see two fire trucks squeal 
around the corner. The trucks pulled right up onto the playground grass and 
came roaring toward the softball diamond, sirens blaring. 

Evan stopped at third base. 

The sirens cut off as the two fire engines skidded to a halt along the first 
base line. 

Evan’s mouth dropped open as Conan Barber leaped out of the first truck. 
Several black-uniformed firefighters dropped to the ground behind Conan. 

“There he is!” Conan cried, pointing furiously at Evan. “That’s him! Get 
him!” 



20 


Grim-faced firefighters began hoisting heavy firehoses off the trucks. Others 
moved toward Evan, hatchets clutched menacingly in their hands. 

“That’s him!” Conan shrieked. “He’s the one who put me in the tree and 
wrecked my parents’ fence!” 

“Huh?” Still standing on third base, Evan froze in shock. 

Was this really happening? 

The playground rang out with shouts of surprise. But the voices were 
drowned out by more sirens. 

Evan saw flashing red lights. And then two black-and-white police cars 
roared over the grass, screeching up behind the fire engines. 

A man and woman came running behind the police cars. “That’s the one!” 
they called breathlessly, pointing at Evan. “That’s the one who crushed the car. 
We saw him do it!” 

The firefighters were busily connecting the hoses to hydrants at the curb. 
Blue-uniformed police swarmed on to the field. The kids on the two softball 
teams huddled together on the pitcher’s mound. They all seemed dazed and 
frightened. 

“He tried to kill me!” Conan was shouting to a woman police officer. “That 
giant put me in a tree and left me there!” 

“He crushed a car!” a woman screamed. 

Evan hadn’t moved from third base. He gazed past the fire engines to Andy 
and Kermit. They stood near the backstop. Kermit had the dumb, toothy grin on 
his face. 

Andy had her hands cupped around her mouth. She was shouting something 
to Evan. But he couldn’t hear her over the wail of sirens and the excited shouts 
and cries of everyone in the playground. 

Some of the police and fire officers huddled together, talking rapidly. They 
kept glancing up at Evan as they talked. 

What are they going to do to me? Evan wondered, frozen in fear. 

Should I run? Should I try to explain? 

More people came hurrying across the playground. As soon as they spotted 
Evan, their expressions turned to surprise and amazement. 



They’re all staring at me, Evan realized. They’re pointing at me as if I’m 
some kind of freak. 

I am some kind of freak! he admitted to himself. 

Firefighters formed a line, holding their hatchets waist-high. Others readied 
the firehoses, aiming them up at Evan’s chest. 

Evan heard more sirens. More police cars rolled on to the playground. 

A young police officer with wavy red hair and a red mustache stepped up to 
Evan. “What—is—your—name?” he shouted, speaking each word slowly, as if 
maybe Evan didn’t speak English. 

“Uh... Evan. Evan Ross,” Evan called down. 

“Do you come from another planet?” the officer shouted. 

“Huh?” Evan couldn’t help himself. He burst out laughing. 

He heard some of the softball players laughing, too. 

“I live in Atlanta,” he shouted down to the officer. “Around the corner. On 
Brookridge Drive.” 

Several officers and firefighters held their ears. Evan’s voice came out 
louder than he had planned. 

Evan took a step toward them. 

The firefighters raised a firehose. Several others readied their hatchets. 

“He’s dangerous!” Evan heard Conan shout. “Watch out! He’s really 
dangerous!” 

That got everyone shouting and screaming. 

The playground was filling with people. Neighborhood people. Kids and 
their parents. Cars stopped and people climbed out to see why the crowd had 
gathered. 

More police cars bumped over the grass. Their wailing sirens added to the 
deafening noise, the shouts and cries, the frightened murmurs. 

The noise. The staring eyes. The pointed fingers. 

It all started to make Evan dizzy. 

He felt his legs tremble. His forehead throbbed. 

The police had formed a line. They started to circle Evan. 

As they closed in, Evan felt himself explode. “I can’t take any more!” he 
screamed, raising his fists. “Stop it! Stop it! All of you! Get away! Leave me 
alone! I mean it!” 

Silence as the sirens cut off. The voices hushed. 

And then Evan heard the red-haired police officer shout to the others: “He’s 



turned violent. We have to bring him down!” 



21 


Evan didn’t have time to be frightened. 

The firehoses chugged and gurgled—then shot out thick streams of water. 

Evan ducked low. Dove forward. Tried to get away from the roaring water. 

The force of the water stream ripped the ground to his side. 

Evan dodged to the other side. 

Wow! That’s powerful! he thought, horrified. The water is strong enough to 
knock me over! 

Frightened shouts rose up over the roar of the water. 

Evan plunged through the line of dark-uniformed police officers—and kept 
mnning. “Don’t shoot!” he screamed. “Don’t shoot me! I’m not from another 
planet! I’m just a boy!” 

He didn’t know if they could hear him or not. 

He dodged past several startled onlookers. A long hook-and-ladder stood in 
his path. 

He stopped. Glanced back. 

Firefighters were turning the hoses. The powerful spray arced high. Water 
crashed to the ground just behind Evan, loud as thunder. 

Kids and parents were running in all directions, frantic, frightened 
expressions locked on their faces. 

Evan took a deep breath. Bent his knees. And leaped over the fire truck in 
his path. 

He heard shouts of surprise behind him. He vaulted high over the truck. 
Landed hard on the other side. Stumbled. Caught his balance. 

Then, ducking low, his arms stretched out in front of him, Evan ran. 

His long legs carried him away quickly. As he reached the street, a low tree 
branch popped up as if from nowhere. 

Evan dipped his head just in time. 

Leaves scratched over his forehead, but he kept running. 

Got to watch out for tree branches, he warned himself. Got to remember 
that I’m two stories tall. 

Breathing hard, he plunged across the street. The late afternoon sun was 



lowering behind the trees. The shadows were longer now, and darker. Evan’s 
shadow seemed a mile long as it stretched out in front of him. 

He heard the rise and fall of shrill sirens behind him. Heard angry shouts. 
Heard the thud of footsteps, people running after him. 

Where can I hide? he asked himself. Where will I be safe? 

Home? 

No. That’s the first place the police will look. 

Where? Where? 

It was so hard to think clearly. They were close behind him, he knew. 
Chasing him. Eager to bring him down. 

If only he could stop somewhere, close his eyes, shut them all out, and 
think. Then maybe he could come up with a plan. 

But he knew he had to keep running. 

His head throbbed. His chest ached. 

His long legs were taking him quickly away from the playground. But he 
still felt awkward, with his sneakers so far below him and his head so high in the 
trees. 

I’ll hide out at Kermit’s house, he thought. 

Then he quickly decided that was a bad idea, too. 

“I can’t get in Kermit’s house!” he cried out loud. “I’m too big!” 

And then he had a truly frightening thought: “I can’t fit in any house!” 

Where will I sleep? he wondered. And then: Will they let me sleep? 

Can’t the police see I’m just a boy? Evan asked himself bitterly. He turned 
the corner and ran past his house. The lights were all off. The door closed. No 
car in the driveway. 

His parents hadn’t come home from work. 

He kept running. Running across yards. Ducking low. Trying to hide behind 
shrubs and tall hedges. 

Can’t they see I’m a boy? Not a creature from another planet? 

Why do they think I’m so dangerous? 

It’s all Conan’s fault, Evan decided. Conan got the firefighters and police all 
crazy with his wild stories. 

His wild, true stories. 

And now where can I run? Where can I hide? 

The answer came to him as he neared Kermit’s house. Two doors down, a 
lot had been cleared. And an enormous stack of lumber had been piled at the 



back. Someone was about to build a house on the lot. 

Breathing hard, sweat pouring down his broad forehead, Evan turned and 
ran across the lot. He ducked behind the tall pile of lumber. And stopped. 

He dropped to his knees and leaned against the lumber stack, struggling to 
catch his breath. He wiped the sweat off his forehead with the sleeve of his T- 
shirt. 

Maybe I’ll hide here for a while, he thought. He lowered himself to a sitting 
position. 

If I sit down and hunch my shoulders, the lumber pile hides me from the 
street. And it’s shady and cool behind it. And I can keep an eye on Kermit’s 
house from here. 

Yes. This is a good hiding spot for now, Evan decided. Then, after dark, I’ll 
sneak over to my house and try to explain to my parents what happened. 

He leaned his back against the lumber pile and shut his eyes. 

He had just started to relax a little when he heard a voice cry: “Got him!” 



22 


Evan’s eyes shot open. 

He tried to scramble to his feet. 

But then he saw who had shouted. 

“Kermit!” he cried angrily. “You scared me to death!” 

Kermit flashed his annoying grin. “I knew you’d hide here, Evan,” he said, 
smirking. “I’m so smart.” 

Kermit turned and called out, “He’s back here! I was right!” 

A few seconds later, Andy gingerly poked her head behind the stack of 
lumber. Her eyes studied Evan for a few seconds. Then a smile crossed her face. 

“You’re okay?” she asked softly. “I was so worried—” 

“Yeah. I’m okay—for now,” Evan replied bitterly. 

“The whole town is after you!” Kermit exclaimed. “It’s really awesome! It’s 
like a movie!” 

“I don’t want to be in a movie!” Evan griped. “This movie is too scary.” 

“They’ve got guns and everything!” Kermit continued excitedly, ignoring 
Evan’s complaint. “And did you see those firehoses? It’s amazing! They all want 
to catch you!” 

“They think you’re an alien from outer space,” Andy added, shaking her 
head. 

“And who told them that? Conan?” Evan asked bitterly. 

“Conan made them believe you’re real dangerous,” Kermit said, grinning 
that grin Evan hated so much. 

“I am dangerous!” Evan declared. He growled menacingly at Kermit. 

The growl shocked the grin off Kermit’s face. 

Evan turned to Andy. “What am I going to do? I can’t run and hide for the 
rest of my life. They’re going to catch me. If you two tracked me down, the 
police will track me down, too.” 

Evan let out a long, frightened sigh. “There’s nowhere I can hide. I’m too 
big to hide! So what can I do? What?” 

Andy scratched her arm. She knotted up her face, thinking hard. “Well...” 

And suddenly Evan knew exactly what to do. 



Watching Andy, Evan knew how to solve the whole problem. 



23 


Evan jumped to his feet. His heart began to pound. For the first time in hours, a 
big smile spread across his face. 

“Evan—what’s wrong?” Andy demanded. His sudden move had startled 
her. 

“I know what we can do!” Evan declared. “Everything is going to be okay!” 

“Get down!” Kermit cried. “I hear sirens. They’ll see you.” 

In his excitement, Evan had forgotten that he was taller than the lumber 
pile. He dropped back to his knees. Even on his knees, he was a lot taller than 
Kermit and Andy. 

The sirens blared louder. Closer. 

Evan gazed around. The sun had fallen behind the trees. The sky was 
evening gray now. The air grew cooler. 

“We’ve got to hurry,” Evan told them. He put a hand on Kermit’s slender 
shoulder. “Kermit, you’ve got to help me.” 

Behind his glasses, Kermit’s little mouse eyes bulged with excitement. 
“Me? What can I do?” 

“The blue mixture,” Evan said, holding on to his cousin’s shoulder. 
“Remember the blue mixture?” 

“Wh-which one?” Kermit stammered. 

“The one that shrank my mosquito bite!” Andy chimed in. She suddenly 
realized what Evan was thinking. 

“That’s right,” Evan explained to Kermit. “Watching Andy scratch her arm 
reminded me. That blue mixture of yours shrank the mosquito bite instantly.” 

“Maybe it can shrink Evan, too!” Andy exclaimed excitedly. 

Kermit nodded, thinking hard. “Yeah. Maybe it can.” 

“I’ll rub it all over my body, and I’ll shrink back to my normal size,” Evan 
said happily. 

“It’ll work! I know it will!” Andy cried enthusiastically. She let out a cheer 
and jumped up and down. Then she tugged Kermit’s arm. “Come on, Kermit. 
Hurry! Let’s get to your basement. You still have the blue mixture, don’t you?” 

Kermit narrowed his eyes, trying to remember. “I think so,” he told them. 
“A lot of stuff got wrecked, remember? But I think I have it.” 



“He has to have it!” Evan cried. “He has to!” 

Evan climbed to his feet. “Come on. Hurry.” 

They heard sirens. Loud and near. 

Kermit peered around the lumber pile toward the street. “A police car!” he 
whispered. “They’re cruising this block.” 

“You’d better wait here,” Andy warned Evan. 

Evan shook his head. “No way. I’m coming with you. I want to get that blue 
mixture as fast as I can.” 

He ducked his head. “We can walk through the backyards. No one will see 

us.” 

“But, Evan—” Andy started to protest. 

She stopped when Evan stepped away from the lumber pile and started 
loping quickly across the backyard toward Kermit’s house. 

Dogface greeted them in the driveway. The sheepdog barked happily, 
jumping up on Kermit, nearly knocking him to the ground. 

“Shhh. Quiet, boy! Quiet!” Kermit cried, petting the dog, trying to stop his 
barks. “We don’t want anyone to hear us.” 

Dogface gazed up at Evan—and got very quiet. The dog slumped across the 
driveway. It stared up suspiciously at Evan, panting hard, its stubby tail wagging 
furiously. 

Evan’s eyes darted up and down the driveway. No car. “Your mom isn’t 
home yet, Kermit,” he said. 

“She must be working late,” Kermit replied. “That’s good news. This is our 
lucky day!” 

Evan let out a bitter laugh. “For sure. Lucky day,” he muttered. 

Kermit and Andy hurried to the kitchen door. Evan started to follow. Then 
he remembered he didn’t fit in the house. 

“Wait right there,” Andy instructed him. “Make sure no one sees you.” 

Evan nodded. “Hurry—please!” 

He watched them disappear through the door. Then he sat down behind the 
house. He motioned for Dogface to come over to him. He felt like holding on to 
something. 

But the big dog just stared back and wouldn’t budge. 

The whole town is looking for me, Evan thought unhappily. The whole 
town is looking for a giant me. But they’ll never find the giant me. Because in a 
few seconds, I’ll shrink back to normal size. 



Then everything will be okay again. 

He raised his eyes to the house. What is keeping Andy and Kermit? he 
wondered. Can’t they find the bottle of blue liquid? 

He took a deep breath. Don’t panic, Evan, he instructed himself. They’ve 
only been in the house a few seconds. They’ll be out soon. And everything will 
be okay. 

To pass the time, he counted slowly to ten. Then he counted slowly to ten 
again. 

He was about to start counting one more time when the screen door flew 
open. Kermit stepped out, carrying the blue beaker. Andy followed right behind. 

“Found it!” Kermit cried happily. 

Evan jumped to his knees. He reached out eagerly. “Quick—let me have it.” 

Kermit stretched up his hand. Evan grabbed for the glass beaker. 

It slipped out of his grasp. 

It started to fall. 

“Ohhh!” Evan let out a horrified moan—and caught the beaker just before it 
crashed against the driveway. 

“Wow! Nice catch!” Kermit exclaimed. 

Evan’s heart had leaped to his mouth. He took a deep breath. He grasped 
the beaker tightly in his hand. “Close one,” he murmured. The beaker was so 
tiny in his hand, like something made for a dollhouse. 

They heard sirens in the distance. 

The search for the giant Evan was still on. 

“I—I hope this mixture works,” Evan declared. 

He raised the beaker. Tilted it upside down over his other hand. Waited. 

And waited. 

Finally, a tiny blue drop of liquid dripped on to Evan’s palm. 

Nothing more. 

He shook the beaker. Hard. Harder. The way he shook a ketchup bottle 
when the ketchup stuck. 

Then he raised the beaker to his eye and peered inside. 

A few seconds later, he let out a long, sad sigh. He tossed the bottle 
disgustedly onto the grass. “It’s empty,” Evan reported. “Totally empty.” 



24 


“I knew there wasn’t much left,” Kermit murmured, shaking his head. 

The empty bottle rolled under a shrub. Dogface walked over and sniffed it. 

“I’m doomed,” Evan muttered. Forgetting how strong he was, he angrily 
kicked a pebble down the driveway. The pebble sailed up into the air and 
disappeared over the house across the street. 

“Be careful,” Andy warned. “You could break a window.” 

“Who cares?” Evan snapped. “My life is ruined.” 

“No way!” Kermit cried. “You’ll be okay, Evan.” He started running to the 
house. “Be right back!” 

“Kermit, where are you going?” Evan called glumly. 

“To mix up another batch!” Kermit replied. “It will only take me a few 
seconds, Evan. I’ve got all the ingredients.” 

Evan could feel his sadness lifting. “Do you really think you can do it?” he 
asked his cousin. 

“No problem,” Kermit replied, flashing Evan a thumbs-up sign. “I think I 
remember what I put in it. I’ll mix up more blue shrinking stuff and be back in a 
jiffy.” 

Kermit disappeared into the house. “I’m coming, too!” Andy called after 
him. She turned back to Evan. “I can try to clean up some of the lab while 
Kermit mixes the liquid. If Kermit’s mom gets home and sees the basement, 
you’ll be in big trouble.” 

Evan let out a weak laugh. “Big trouble. Very funny, Annnndrea. You’re a 

riot.” 

“Don’t call me Andrea,” she shot back, ignoring his sarcasm. He watched 
her hurry into the house. 

Dogface got tired of sniffing the blue bottle. The sheepdog lumbered across 
the yard to inspect the fence that Evan had knocked down earlier. 

Evan sighed. I wonder if my own dog will recognize me now? he thought. 
Trigger, Evan’s cocker spaniel, had been the first to eat Monster Blood. The dog 
had grown bigger than a horse. 

I wonder if Trigger ever has nightmares about that? Evan asked himself. 

He knew he’d be having nightmares about today for a long time to come. 



He glanced at his watch. Almost dinnertime. His parents would be getting 
home soon. And Kermit’s mom would be pulling up the driveway at any minute. 

“Wow. She’ll be surprised when she sees me!” Evan exclaimed out loud. 

He turned to the house in time to see Kermit step out. He was carrying a 
fresh bottle of blue liquid. “See? No problem!” Kermit declared. 

Evan carefully took the bottle from Kermit’s hand. 

Andy walked over, her eyes raised to Evan’s. “Go ahead. Rub it all over,” 
she urged. “Hurry!” 

Evan carefully poured a puddle of blue liquid into his palm. Then he rubbed 
it onto his cheeks, his forehead, his neck. 

He poured more into his hand. He rubbed blue liquid onto his arms. Then 
he raised his T-shirt and rubbed some on his chest. 

Please let it work, he prayed silently. Please let it work. 

He turned to Andy and Kermit. “See any change?” 



25 


Andy’s mouth dropped open. 

Kermit’s eyes bulged, and he uttered a choking sound. 

“Well?” Evan demanded eagerly. “Do you see any change? Do you?” 

“Uh... well... uh...” Kermit sputtered. 

“You turned blue! ” Andy cried. 

“Excuse me?” Evan demanded. He knew he hadn’t heard her correctly. 

“Your skin—it’s bright blue!” Andy wailed, pressing her hands against her 
cheeks. 

“My—what?” Evan shrieked. “You mean—HIC!—” A powerful hiccup 
made his entire body shake. 

Evan stared down at his hands. 

“They—they’re blue!” he cried. “HIC!” 

Another hiccup burst from his open mouth. His enormous body shook as if 
struck by an earthquake. 

Frantically, he pulled up the T-shirt and stared at his stomach. His blue 
stomach. 

His arms. His chest. All blue. Bright blue. 

“HIC!” 

“I don’t believe it!” Evan screamed. “I’m bright blue, and—HIC!—I’ve got 
the hiccups!” 

He glared down furiously at Kermit. 

Kermit was so frightened, his legs trembled and his knees actually knocked 
together. “I—I can fix it,” he called up to Evan. “N-no problem! I just mixed it 
up wrong. I’ll be right back with another mixture.” 

He ran to the house. At the screen door, he turned back to Evan. “Don’t go 
anywhere—okay?” 

Evan let out a furious roar, interrupted by a deafening hiccup. “Where can I 
go?” he shrieked at the top of his lungs. “Where can I — HIC! — go?!” 

The door slammed behind Kermit. 

Evan let out another roar, clenching his blue fists and shaking his blue arms 
over his head. He paced back and forth on the driveway, hiccupping every few 



seconds. 

“Try to calm down a little,” Andy called up to him. “People will hear you.” 

“I—I—HIC!—can’t calm down!” Evan complained bitterly. “Look at me!” 

“But the neighbors will hear you. Or see you,” Andy warned. “They’ll call 
the police.” 

Evan replied with a hiccup that nearly knocked him off his feet. 

Kermit came running out of the house. He raised another bottle of blue 
liquid to Evan. “Here! Try this!” 

“HIC!” Evan declared. He grasped the bottle in his blue hand. 

Without saying another word, he turned the bottle upside down. With quick, 
frantic motions, he splashed the blue liquid all over him. Over his cheeks. His 
forehead. His hands and arms. His chest. 

He rolled up his jeans and rubbed the mixture onto his knees and legs. He 
pulled off his socks and sneakers and smoothed the blue liquid over his ankles 
and feet. 

“It’s got to work!” he cried. “This time, it’s got to!” 

Andy and Kermit stared up at him eagerly. 

They waited. 

Evan waited. 

Nothing happened. No change at all. 

Then Evan began to feel it. 

“Hey—I’m tingling!” he announced happily. 

He felt the same electric tingling he had felt before. The itchy feeling he 
had every time he was about to grow a little more. 

“Yes!” Evan cheered. “Yes!” 

The tingling grew sharper, stronger, as it spread over his entire body. 

“It’s working! I can—HIC!—feel it!” Evan shouted. “It’s really working! 
I’m tingling! I’m itching! I can feel it! It’s working!” 

“No, it isn’t,” Andy murmured quietly. 



26 


“Huh?” Evan narrowed his eyes at her. 

The tingling became a violent itch. He started to scratch. But pulled back 
his hand because his skin felt so strange. 

“It... didn’t... work....” Andy said sadly, her voice trembling. 

“Yuck! He looks so gross!” Kermit declared, making a disgusted face. 

“Huh? HIC!” Evan replied. 

He uttered a horrified gasp as he stared at his arms. “F-f-feathers!” he 
stammered in a high, shrill voice. 

He checked out his arms. His stomach. His legs. 

“Noooooo!” Along, low wail burst from his chest. 

His entire body was covered in fluffy white feathers. 

“Noooo—HIC! —oooooooo! ” 

“I’m sorry,” Kermit said, shaking his head. “I don’t know what I’m doing 
wrong. I thought I had the mixture right this time.” 

“You look like a big eagle,” Andy commented. “Except eagles aren’t blue.” 

“HIC!” Evan cried. 

“And eagles don’t get hiccups,” Andy added. She gazed up at him with 
concern. “Poor Evan. That must itch like crazy. You’re having a real bad day.” 

Evan frantically scratched his feathery chest. “It can’t get any worse than 
this,” he muttered. 

And then he saw a police car pull up in front of the house. 



27 


“HIC!” Evan cried. He backed off the driveway and crouched low against the 
back wall of the house. “The police!” he whispered. 

His throat tightened in panic. His feathers all stood up on end. 

What should I do? he asked himself, pressed against the house, ducking his 
head. Should I run? Should I give myself up? 

“One more try!” Kermit cried, leaping into the house. “Let me try one more 
mixture. I think I can get it this time!” 

The door slammed behind him. 

“Hurry!” Andy called from the driveway. “The police—they’re climbing 
out of their car.” 

“How many are there?” Evan whispered. His feathers itched, but he was too 
frightened to scratch. 

“Two,” Andy replied, staring through the gray evening light to the street. 
“They look kind of mean.” 

A sudden cool gust of wind ruffled Evan’s feathers. His huge body 
trembled. 

“They’re walking up the driveway,” Andy reported. “They’re going to be 
here in a few seconds!” 

“I’d better make a run for it,” Evan declared. He took one step away from 
the house and nearly fell. It was hard to run when your feet were covered with 
stiff, prickly feathers. 

His entire body itched. He pressed himself against the house again. “I’m 
doomed,” he murmured to himself. 

“They stopped to check out the front door,” Andy told him. “You’ve still 
got a few seconds.” 

“Hurry, Kermit! Hurry!” Evan urged out loud. 

He turned to the kitchen door. No sign of Kermit. 

Would Kermit get the mixture right this time? Could he get the mixture to 
Evan before the two police officers entered the backyard? 

The screen door opened. Kermit burst out. He tripped on the back stoop. 
The blue bottle nearly went flying. 

He caught his balance. He handed the bottle up to Evan. “Good luck!” 



Kermit called up to Evan. Kermit raised both hands. He had his fingers tightly 
crossed on both hands. 

“Here come the police,” Andy warned. “They’re walking really fast now.” 

The bottle trembled in Evan’s hand. He turned it upside down. It puddled in 
his enormous, feathery palm. 

Frantically, he began rubbing it over his feathers, over his blue skin. 
Splashing it wildly. Pouring it over his body. 

Please work! he silently urged it. Please work! 

He waited. 

Kermit stared up at him hopefully, his fingers still crossed. 

“They’re here!” Andy reported from the driveway. 

Evan gulped. 

The mixture hadn’t worked. 

He hadn’t changed. Not a bit. 

The two dark-uniformed officers approached the back of the house. “Hello, 
there,” one of them called to Andy. 



28 


Evan heard a loud POP. 

He uttered a startled cry as he felt himself falling. Falling to the ground. 

He reached out a hand and steadied himself against the house. 

It took him a second or two to realize that he hadn’t fallen. He had shrunk. 

The two officers stepped into the backyard. One was very tall. The other 
was short and plump. “Sorry to bother you kids,” the tall one said. “But we got a 
call from a neighbor.” 

“A call? About what?” Andy demanded. She cast a surprised glance at 
Evan. She didn’t expect to see him back to normal. 

“Did you kids see a giant in the neighborhood?” the short officer asked. He 
narrowed his eyes at them, trying to appear tough. 

“A giant? What kind of giant?” Kermit asked innocently. 

“A giant kid,” the short officer replied. 

Evan, Andy, and Kermit shook their heads. “He didn’t come back here,” 
Andy told them. 

“No. We didn’t see him,” Evan said. He couldn’t keep a smile from 
crossing his face. His voice was back to normal, too. 

The tall officer pushed his cap back on his head. “Well, if you see him, be 
careful,” he warned. “He’s dangerous.” 

“He’s very dangerous,” the short officer added. “Call us right away— 
okay?” 

“Okay,” all three kids replied in unison. 

The officers gave the backyard one last look. Then they turned and headed 
back down the driveway to their car. 

As soon as they were gone, Evan burst into a long, happy cheer. Andy and 
Kermit joined in, clapping him joyfully on the back, slapping high fives all 
around. 

“Am I a genius or what?” Kermit demanded, grinning his toothy grin. 

“Or what!” Evan joked. 

They were still laughing and celebrating Evan’s return to Evan-size when 
Kermit’s mom pulled up the driveway. As she climbed out of her car, she 
appeared surprised to find them outdoors. 



“Sorry I’m so late,” she called. She hugged Kermit. “How was your 
afternoon?” 

Kermit glanced at Evan. Then he smiled at his mother. “Oh, it was kind of 
boring,” he told her. 

“Yeah. Kind of boring,” Andy repeated. 

“Kind of boring,” Evan agreed. 

Evan knew he’d have nightmares about what had happened to him. And that 
night, he had a really scary one. In the dream, he was a giant boy being chased 
by giant rats. The rats all looked like Kermit. 

Evan sat up in the dark, shivering all over. 

“Just a nightmare,” he murmured, glancing at his clock radio. Midnight. “It 
was just a nightmare.” 

He sat up straight, wiping sweat off his forehead with his pajama-top 
sleeve. I need a glass of cold water, he decided. 

He started to climb out of bed—but stopped when he saw what a steep drop 
it was to the floor. 

Huh? What’s going on? he asked himself. 

He tried to click on the bedtable lamp. But it towered high above him, way 
beyond his reach. 

He stood up on the bed. As his eyes adjusted to the dim light, he saw that 
his bed seemed to stretch on forever. A lump in the bedspread curled up over 
Evan’s head. 

I—I’m short! he realized. I’m as short as a mouse! 

Kermit! 

Kermit strikes again! Evan thought bitterly. 

He made the blue shrinking mixture too powerful. 

I shrank—and shrank—and shrank. And now I’m as tiny as a mouse. 

“I’ll pound Kermit! I really will!” Evan cried. His voice came out as tiny 
mouse squeaks. 

Standing on the edge of his bed, staring down, down—miles down—to the 
floor, Evan heard a rumbling sound. Loud panting that sounded like a strong 
wind through the trees. 

A big head popped up in front of him. Two dark eyes. 

“No! Trigger! Go back to sleep!” Evan pleaded in his little mouse voice. 
“No! Trigger—down!” 



Evan’s squeaks had awakened the cocker spaniel. 

Evan felt the dog’s hot breath blow across his face. 

“Yuck! Dog breath!” he squeaked. 

Then he felt sharp teeth close around his waist. Felt himself tilted sideways. 
Felt the hot, wet saliva of Trigger’s mouth as the dog secured Evan between its 
teeth. 

“Trigger—down! Put me down!” Evan begged. 

He was bounced hard now. The dog teeth tightened their grip. 

“Trigger! Put me down! Where are you taking me?” 

Through the dark hallway. The hot breath blowing over Evan’s helpless 
body. 

Into his parents’ room. Evan gazed up to see his mom and dad getting ready 
for bed. 

Mr. Ross leaned over the dog. “What have you got there, Trigger? Did you 
find a bone?” 

“Uh... Dad? Dad?” Evan squeaked up at him. “Dad? It’s me? Do you see 
me? Dad? Uh... I think we have a little problem!” 




IT CAME FROM 
BENEATH THE SINK! 

Goosebumps - 30 
R.L. Stine 

1 


Before my brother and I found the strange little creature under the sink, we were 
a normal happy family. In fact, I’d have to say we were very lucky. 

But our luck quickly changed when we pulled the creature from its dark 
hiding place. 

The sad, frightening story begins on the day we moved. 

“Here we are, kids.” Dad honked the horn happily as we rounded the corner 
onto Maple Lane and pulled up in front of our new house. “Ready for the big 
move, Kitty Kat?” 

My dad is the only one who can get away with calling me Kitty Kat. My 
real name is Katrina (ugh!) Merton, but only the teachers call me Katrina. To 
everyone else I’m simply Kat. 

“Definitely, Dad!” I shouted. I jumped out of the station wagon. 

“Rowf! Rowf!” Killer, our cocker spaniel, barked in agreement and 
followed me out onto the sidewalk. 

Daniel, my goofy little brother, is the one who named the dog. What a 
dumb name. Killer is afraid of everything. The only thing he kills is his rubber 
ball! 

Daniel and I had hiked past the new house plenty of times already. It’s only 
three blocks away from where we used to live, on East Main. 

But I still couldn’t believe we’d be living here. I mean, I always thought our 
old house was pretty great. But this place is awesome! 

Three stories high, sitting up on its own little hill, with butter-yellow 
shutters and at least a dozen windows. A wide porch wraps around the whole 
house. The front yard must be about the size of a football field. 

It’s not a house—it’s a mansion! 

Well, practically a mansion. Enormous—but not exactly fancy. What Mom 
calls “a comfortable old shoe kind of house.” 

Actually, today it really looked messy and old. A few of the shutters hung 
crookedly, the grass needed mowing, and the whole place seemed to be covered 
with an inch of dust. 

But as Mom said, “Nothing that can’t be taken care of with a good cleaning, 
a coat of paint, and a few bangs with the hammer.” 



Mom, Dad, and Daniel climbed out of the car, and we all stood staring 
excitedly at the house. Today, I’d finally get to see the inside! 

Mom pointed to the second floor. “See that big balcony?” she asked. 
“That’s the room where your father and I will sleep. The next room over is 
Daniel’s.” 

She gave my hand a little squeeze. “The little balcony—that’s outside your 
room, Kat.” She beamed. 

My very own private porch! I leaned over and gave Mom a big hug. “I love 
it already,” I whispered into her ear. 

Naturally, Daniel started whining immediately. He’s ten years old, but most 
of the time he acts as if he’s about two. 

“How come Kat’s room has a balcony—and mine doesn’t?” he complained. 
“It’s not fair! I want a balcony, too!” 

“Get a life, Daniel,” I muttered. “Mom, tell him to be quiet. Don’t I get 
something for being two years older?” 

Well, almost two years older. My birthday was in four days. 

“Quiet, kids,” Mom ordered. “Daniel, you don’t have a balcony. But you 
are getting something neat, too—bunk beds. So Carlo can sleep over whenever 
you want.” 

“Excellent!” Daniel shouted. Carlo is Daniel’s best friend. They’re always 
together—and always bugging me. 

Daniel is okay—most of the time. But he insists on being right. Dad calls 
him Mr. Know-It-All. 

And sometimes Dad calls Daniel the Human Tornado, because he runs 
around like a whirlwind and makes unbelievable messes. 

I’m a lot more like my Dad—sort of calm and quiet. Well, usually calm. 
And we both have the same favorite foods—lasagna, really sour garlic pickles, 
and mocha-chip ice-cream. 

I even look like my father, tall and thin with a lot of freckles and reddish 
hair. I usually wear my hair in a ponytail. Dad doesn’t have much hair to worry 
about. 

Daniel looks more like my mother. Straight, light brown hair that’s always 
falling in his eyes, and what Mom calls a “sturdy” build. (That means he’s 
chunky.) 

Today, Daniel was definitely in Human Tornado mode. He ran up onto the 
big green lawn and began spinning around in a circle. “It’s huge,” he shouted. 



“It’s gigantic. It’s... it’s... it’s super-house!” 

He collapsed in a heap on the grass. “And this is the super-yard! Hey, Kat, 
look at me—I’m Super-Daniel!” 

“You’re super-dumb,” I told him, messing up his hair with both hands. 

“Hey, quit it!” Daniel yelped. He pulled out his super-soaker gun and 
squirted the front of my T-shirt. “You’re captured,” he announced. “You are my 
prisoner!” 

“I don’t think so,” I replied, tugging on the water pistol. “Give up the gun!” 
I commanded. I pulled harder. “Let go!” 

“Okay!” Daniel grinned. He loosened his grip so suddenly that I staggered 
backwards—and fell on to the sidewalk. 

“What a klutz!” Daniel snickered. 

I knew how to get him. I zoomed up the porch steps. “Hey, Daniel,” I 
called, “I’m going to be first in the new house!” 

“No way!” he exclaimed, scrambling up off the lawn. He hurled himself at 
the steps and grabbed me by the ankle. “Me first! Me first!” 

That’s when Dad walked up the driveway, carrying an overstuffed 
cardboard box with Kitchen written on the side. Two moving men followed, 
hauling our big blue couch. 

“Hey, stop goofing around! Mom and I really need your help today. That’s 
why we allowed you to miss a school day,” he called. “Daniel, walk Killer—and 
make sure he has food and water. Kat, keep an eye on Daniel. 

“And Kat, clean the inside of the kitchen cabinets, okay?” Dad added. 
“Mom wants to start putting the dishes and pots away.” 

“Sure, Dad,” I answered. I saw Daniel rummaging through a box on the 
lawn. The box was marked Cards and Comics. 

“Hey, where’s the dog?” I yelled to him. 

He shrugged. 

“Daniel!” I frowned. “I don’t see Killer anywhere. Where is he?” 

He dropped a stack of baseball cards. “Okay, okay, I’ll go find him,” he 
mumbled. He stood up and made his way to the driveway, calling the dog’s 
name. 

As soon as he disappeared around the side of the house, I hurried to the box 
marked Cards and Comics and checked through it. Sure enough, the little brat 
had stolen some of my comics. 

I tucked them under my arm and walked inside to the kitchen to clean out 



the cabinets. One quick glance made me groan. 

Cabinets filled just about every square inch of the big bright room! Sighing, 
I yanked paper towels and a bottle of cleaner out of the Cleaning Supplies box 
and started scrubbing. 

Spritz, rub, spritz, rub. 

This could take hours! 

After I finished a cabinet, I stepped back to admire my work. Then I knelt 
down in front of the cabinet under the sink. 

But something—a squeaky noise, like the sound of a footstep on an old 
wooden stair—made me stop short. 

What is that? I wondered, my heart beating faster. 

I slowly opened the cabinet. Tried to peek inside. 

I opened it a little wider. A little wider. 

I heard the noise again. 

My heart was pounding now. 

I opened the cabinet door another inch. 

And then it grabbed me. 

A dark, hairy claw. 

It wouldn’t let go. 

I screamed. 



2 


“Daniel! You scared me to death!” I screamed. I pounded him on the back. 

Laughing his head off, my brother yanked off the stupid rat costume he had 
insisted on packing. “You should have seen your face!” he cried. “Know what? 
I’m going to start calling you Scaredy-Kat!” 

“Ha-ha. Very funny,” I replied, rolling my eyes. Did I mention that Daniel 
also thinks he’s the king of practical jokes? 

I suddenly remembered what my brother was supposed to be doing. “Dad 
asked you to find Killer. Where is he?” 

“I didn’t have to find him.” Daniel snickered. “He was never lost.” 

“What do you mean?” I demanded. 

“I stuck Killer in the basement,” he said proudly. “While you were hanging 
around on the porch, I ran in through the side door and hid under the sink.” 

“You really are a big rat!” I exclaimed. 

I heard a funny tap-tapping on the linoleum floor. “What’s that noise?” I 
asked. 

Daniel’s mouth dropped open. “Oh, no, it’s a real rat!” he shrieked. “Kat, 
look out! Move!” 

Without thinking, I jumped on to a kitchen chair as... Killer came trotting 
into the kitchen. 

Daniel let out a high-pitched laugh. “Twice on the same trick!” He was very 
pleased with himself. 

I dove at my brother, ready to tickle him. “Prepare to die laughing!” I 
yelled. 

“Stop! Help! No!” he gulped. “Kat, please. Stop, please. I... can’t... take... 
it!” 

“Give up?” I asked. 

Daniel nodded. “Yes!” he half-gasped, half-laughed. 

“All right,” I said generously. “You can get up now.” 

“Thanks!” he said. “Hey, what’s Killer doing over there?” 

“No way. I’m not falling for another one of your tricks,” I declared. 

But when I glanced over, the cocker spaniel did seem very interested in 
something inside the sink cabinet I’d left open. 



He pulled it out, then sniffed. Pushed it with his nose and gave a head¬ 
tossing growl. 

That’s weird, I thought. Killer never growls. 

“What do you have there, boy?” I called to him. 

The dog didn’t even look up. 

Sniff, sniff, sniff... growl. 

I leaned in for a closer view. 

“What is it, Kat?” Daniel asked. 

“Nothing much,” I answered casually. “Just an old sponge, I think.” 

Sniff, sniff, sniff... growl. 

It seemed perfectly ordinary—small, round, and light brown. A little bigger 
than an egg. 

But the sponge had Killer all excited and nervous. The dog danced around 
it, barking and growling. 

I snatched the sponge from him to get a better look. And my sweet dog tried 
to bite me! 

“Killer!” I yelled. “Bad boy!” 

He slunk to a corner. And with an embarrassed howl, he lay his head down 
sadly on his paws. 

I held the sponge up close to my face, to study it better. 

Whoa! Wait a minute! 

I suddenly understood Killer’s strange behavior. 

“Daniel—check it out!” I exclaimed. “Wow! I don’t BELIEVE this!” 



3 


“Huh? What is it, Kat?” Daniel cried. 

I stared in shock at the tiny sponge. 

“Maybe my eyes are playing tricks on me,” I muttered. “It’s totally weird!” 

“Come on, Kat,” Daniel insisted. “What is it?” 

I studied the sponge some more. “Wow!” I gasped. My eyes weren’t fooling 
me. 

The round sponge moved in my hand, gently and slowly, in and out, in and 
out in a lazy rhythm. 

As if it were breathing! 

But sponges don’t breathe. Do they? 

This one sure did! 

I could even hear its little breaths: Whoa-ahhh, whoa-ahhh. 

“Daniel! I don’t think this is just a sponge,” I stammered. “I think it’s 
alive!” I tossed it back into the sink cabinet. I admit it. I felt a little scared. 

My brother put his hands on his hips. “That’s a pretty lame joke,” he 
snickered. 

“But, Daniel—” I started. 

“You can’t get me with that one, Kat. It’s an old sponge,” he insisted, 
grinning. “A dirty old sponge that’s probably been here for a hundred years.” 

“All right, don’t believe me!” I exclaimed. “When I’m famous for 
discovering this thing, I won’t tell them you’re my brother.” 

Mom walked by, carrying an armload of winter coats. I knew that she 
would believe me. 

“Mom!” I yelled. “The sponge! It’s alive!” 

“That’s nice, dear,” she murmured. “Only a few more things to bring in. 
Now, where did I put that box of silverware?” 

My mother acted as if she didn’t even hear me! “Mom,” I started again, 
even louder this time. “The sponge! Under the sink! It’s breathing!” 

She ignored me and kept walking through the kitchen and right out the 
screen door into the backyard. 

Nobody cared about my amazing find. 



Except for Killer. He seemed really interested. 

Maybe too interested. 

Killer bent his neck down low, poked his head into the cabinet, gave the 
sponge a long stare—and growled, deep in his throat. 

Grrrr. Grrrr. 

Why was he growling again? 

Killer touched his wet nose to the sponge. He shoved it around, sniffing and 
sniffing. He gazed up at me for a moment, a puzzled expression on his dog face. 
Grrrr. Grrrr. 

Killer opened his mouth and grabbed the sponge in his teeth. 

“Hey, that’s not lunch!” I yelped, grabbing Killer by his collar and yanking 
him out from under the sink. “That could be a very important discovery.” 

I turned to my brother. 

“See, Daniel? Killer knows it’s alive,” I insisted. “Honest, it’s not a trick. 
Look closer—I promise that you’ll see it breathing.” 

Daniel smirked as if he didn’t believe me. But he poked his head into the 
cabinet. 

“Hey, whoa! You might be right,” he admitted. He pulled himself up to face 
me. “I think it is alive! And I also think... it’s mine!” 

With that, he dove under the sink to grab the sponge. 

“No way!” I protested. I grabbed the back of his T-shirt and hauled him out. 
“I saw it first. The sponge belongs to me!” 

He shook me off and dove back down again. “Finders, keepers!” he cried. 

I made another grab for him. 

But before I could touch him, Daniel uttered a bloodcurdling scream of 

pain! 



4 


“AAAAAIIIIIIII!” 

You could probably hear Daniel’s wail for blocks. 

That got Mom’s attention. She came banging through the screen door from 
the backyard. 

“What happened? Who screamed? What’s wrong? What’s going on?” Mom 
demanded. 

Daniel backed out from under the sink, holding his head. He squinted up at 
us. “I hit my head on the sink,” he wailed. “Kat pushed me!” 

Mom knelt down and put her arm around Daniel. “You poor thing,” she said 
soothingly. She patted his head softly. 

“I did not push him,” I declared. “I didn’t even touch him.” 

Daniel groaned and rubbed the side of his head. “It really hurts,” he 
complained. “I’ll probably have a huge bump there.” 

He glared at me. “You did it on purpose! And it’s not your sponge, anyway. 
It was in the house. So it belongs to all of us!” 

“It is so my sponge!” I insisted. “What’s your problem, Daniel? Why do 
you always want what’s mine?” 

“That’s enough!” Mom cried impatiently. “I can’t believe you’re fighting 
over a stupid sponge!” 

Mom turned to me. “Kat, you are supposed to be keeping an eye on your 
brother, aren’t you?” she demanded. “And, Daniel, don’t take things that aren’t 
yours.” 

She turned to leave the room. “Not one more word about a silly sponge! Or 
you’ll both be sorry!” 

As soon as Mom left the room, Daniel stuck out his tongue at me and 
crossed his eyes. “Thanks for getting me in trouble,” he grumbled. 

He stomped off, with Killer at his heels. 

Alone in the kitchen, I bent down, reached my hand under the sink, and 
picked up the sponge. 

“Everyone’s yelling and screaming around here,” I whispered to it. “You’re 
causing a lot of trouble—aren’t you?” 

I felt sort of dumb talking to a sponge. 



But it didn’t feel like a sponge. Not at all. 

It’s warm, I thought in surprise. Warm and damp. 

“Are you alive?” I asked the wrinkled little ball. 

I closed my hand around it softly—and the weirdest thing happened. The 
sponge started moving in my hand. 

Well, not exactly moving. 

Pulsing—slowly and gently. 

Ca-chunk. Ca-chunk. 

It moved like the plastic model heart we used in science class. 

Could I be feeling a heartbeat? 

I peered curiously at the thing. I ran my fingertips over the wrinkles that 
covered it, pushing back the folds of spongy, moist material. 

“Whoa!” I cried, startled. Two wet, black eyes stared out at me. 

I shuddered. “Yuck!” 

You aren’t a sponge at all, I thought. Sponges don’t have eyes, do they? 
What are you? 

I needed some answers. Quick. But who could I talk to? 

Not Mom. She didn’t want to hear about the sponge. 

“Dad! Dad!” I called out, dashing through the living room and dining room. 
“Where are you?” 

“Mmmmph,” he shouted. “Mmmmmpph.” 

“What?” I yelled, running through the house. “Oh, here you are.” 

Dad stood at the top of a ladder in the front hall. He had a hammer in one 
hand and a big roll of black electrician’s tape in the other. 

And a bunch of nails in his mouth. “Mmmmpph,” he mumbled. 

“Dad, what are you trying to say?” I asked. 

He spit the nails out. 

“Sorry,” Dad grumbled. “I’ve got to get this hall light working. These darn 
old wires.” 

He stared down at a pile of tools on the floor. “Kat, hand me those pliers. If 
this doesn’t do it, I’ll have to call an electrician.” 

Dad is great at getting flowers to bloom and grass to grow. But when it 
comes to handyman stuff, he messes up. A lot. 

One time, he tried to fix a fan—and knocked out the electricity all over the 
neighborhood. 

“Here, Dad.” I handed him the pliers and held up the sponge. 



“Check this out,” I urged. I stood on tiptoes so he could see the sponge up 
close. “I found it under the sink, and it’s warm and it has eyes and it’s alive. I 
can’t figure out what it is.” 

Dad peered out from under his baseball cap. “Let’s have a look at that,” he 
offered. 

I shoved the sponge up so he could reach it. 

He leaned down to grab the sponge from me. 

I didn’t see the ladder wobble. 

And I didn’t see it start to tilt over. 

I only saw Dad’s expression change. I saw his eyes go wide. And his mouth 
open in a startled scream. 

As he started to fall, he grabbed at the light in the ceiling for support. 

“Nooooooo!” 

The light came crashing down on his head. Dad sailed off the top of the 
ladder. He lay on the hall floor, perfectly still. “Mom! Mo-om! Mom!” I 
shrieked. “Come quick! It’s Dad!” 



5 


Mom, Daniel, and I huddled around Dad. His eyes fluttered open. He blinked. 

“Huh?” he murmured. “What happened?” 

Dad shook his head and pushed himself up onto his elbows. “I think I’m 
okay, guys,” he said shakily. 

Dad tried to stand up. But he collapsed to the floor. “My ankle. I think it 
may be broken.” He groaned in pain. 

With me on one side and Mom on the other, we helped Dad to the couch. 
“Oof, that really hurts,” he moaned. He rubbed the ankle tenderly. 

“Daniel, go put some ice into a towel for your father,” Mom instructed. 
“Kat, get him a cold drink.” 

“Now, honey,” Mom whispered, wiping Dad’s brow, “tell me what 
happened.” 

When I came running back into the living room with a tall glass of ice 
water, Mom and Dad had the weirdest expressions on their faces. 

“Kat,” said Mom angrily, “did you push your father?” 

“Why did you push the ladder?” Dad asked, rubbing his ankle. 

“Huh? Excuse me?” I spluttered. “I didn’t push you! I wouldn’t!” 

“We’ll discuss this later, young lady,” Mom said sternly. “For now, I’ve got 
to take care of your father.” 

She leaned over and applied the ice pack to Dad’s swelling ankle. 

I felt a hot red flush of embarrassment creep over my face. How could Dad 
think I pushed him? 

I lowered my eyes and realized I still held the sponge. 

And I realized something else. Something strange and scary. 

Instead of pulsing gently, the sponge throbbed in my hand. Throbbed 
wildly. 

Ba-boom, ba-boom, ba-boom. 

Vibrating—as if someone had turned a blender to high speed. The sponge 
practically purred with excitement. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

I sat down on the hall floor, feeling shaky. 



What’s going on here? I wondered. Daniel thought I pushed him. And then 
Dad said the same thing. 

They both think I pushed them. Why? 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. Ba-boom. The sponge throbbed warmly in my hand. 

I shivered with fear. Suddenly, the sponge seemed kind of scary. I didn’t 
want the thing anywhere near me—or my family. 

I ran outside. I found a big metal garbage can near the garage. I lifted the 
lid. Dropped the sponge inside. Pushed the lid shut firmly. 

Back inside the house, Mom called me into the living room. “I think Dad’s 
ankle is only sprained,” she said. “Now, tell me what happened.” 

Thursday, I sat at my desk, writing down the names of guests for my birthday 
party. The big day was only two days away. 

I had to give the list to Mom today, so she could buy enough favors by 
Saturday. 

I heard Daniel babbling away to Carlo as the two boys clambered noisily up 
the stairs. 

“Check it out—it looks like an old sponge. But it’s alive!” Daniel 
explained. “I bet it’s a prehistoric creature, like a dinosaur or something.” 

I jumped up and ran out of my room. 

“Hey!” I yelled at Daniel. “What are you doing with that?” I pointed at the 
sponge in his hands. “I threw that thing away.” 

“I found it in the garbage can,” Daniel replied. “It’s too cool to throw away. 
Right, Carlo?” 

Carlo shrugged, his shaggy black hair touching his shoulders. “It looks like 
an old sponge. What’s the big deal?” 

“It’s a very big deal,” I shot back. “And that thing is definitely not a 
sponge.” 

I pulled a large book from my new bookcase. “I checked the encyclopedia,” 
I explained. “Under sponges. You should have left it in the trash, Daniel. You 
really should have.” 

“What did the encyclopedia say?” Daniel asked eagerly, plopping down on 
my bed. He held the sponge between his hands. 

“It said that sponges do not have eyes,” I replied. “And they can live only in 
the water. If they’re out of the water for more than thirty minutes, they die.” 

“See, Carlo? It’s not a sponge,” Daniel declared. “Our creature has eyes. It’s 



been out of water since we found it.” 

“Well, I don’t see any eyes. And it sure doesn’t look alive to me,” said 
Carlo doubtfully. 

Daniel leaped off the bed and offered his friend the sponge. “Hold it. You’ll 

see.” 

Carlo carefully cradled the sponge in his hands. His big brown eyes grew 
wide. “It’s warm! And... and... it’s moving. It’s squirming! It is alive.” 

Carlo spun around to face me. “But if it’s not a sponge, then... then, what is 

it?” 

“I haven’t figured that out yet,” I admitted. 

“Maybe it’s some kind of a super-sponge,” Daniel offered. “So powerful 
that it can live on land.” 

“It could be part sponge and part another animal,” added Carlo, gazing at it. 
“Can I take it home for a while? It’ll really spook Sandy.” 

Sandy is Carlo’s baby-sitter. “I’ll bring it right back,” Carlo promised. 

“No way, Carlo,” I said quickly. “I think I’ll keep the sponge right here until 
I know exactly what it is. Here—stick it in this old gerbil cage.” 

“Aw, come on,” Carlo begged, petting the sponge on the top of its wrinkled 
head. “See? It likes me.” 

“No way!” I replied. “Daniel, tell your friend to quit bugging me.” 

“Okay, okay,” Carlo muttered. “Hey, what does this little guy eat, anyway?” 
“I don’t know,” I replied. “But it seems to be fine without eating. Put it in 
the cage.” 

Carlo reached into the gerbil cage and set the creature down. As he did, his 
face filled with horror. 

I saw his arm tremble. 

Then he let out a terrified scream. 

“Aaagh! My hand! It ate my hand!” 



6 


“Noooo!” I shrieked. 

His mouth twisted in horror, Carlo yanked his arm from the gerbil cage— 
and shoved it in my face. 

“Oh!” I gasped. 

Carlo wiggled his hand in my face and began to laugh. His hand was 
perfectly okay. 

“You are horrible!” I yelled. “That is so completely not funny. It’s sick!” 

Carlo and Daniel collapsed with laughter. 

“Excellent joke!” Daniel grinned. “Hey, Carlo. Give me a... hand! Haw, 
haw, haw.” 

He and Carlo slapped each other high fives. “Way to go, dude!” Daniel 
cried. 

I glared at the dumb, immature brats. 

“You know, guys, this isn’t funny,” I said seriously. “We don’t know what 
kind of creature the sponge is.” 

“We don’t know what kind of creature you are, either!” Daniel announced 
with a big grin. 

“If I’m a creature, you’re a creature’s baby brother!” I shot back. 

“Hey, I have an idea,” said Carlo, winking at Daniel. “Maybe you should 
put the sponge on a leash and take it for a walk. The exercise will give it an 
appetite!” He hooted with laughter. 

He really cracked himself up. 

“But it doesn’t have legs,” Daniel chimed in. 

“She can roll it down Maple Lane!” Carlo suggested. 

More laughter. 

“That’s it, you guys. Get out!” I shouted. “Leave me and the sponge alone! 
Now!” 

Slapping each other another high five, Daniel and Carlo turned to leave. 

I could hardly wait for them to go. I needed to be by myself for a while. To 
sit and figure out what I should do with the little round creature. 

But before Carlo and Daniel got out the bedroom door, a scream made me 



nearly jump to the ceiling. 

I turned to see Carlo hopping frantically up and down on one foot. 

“Oh, right,” I said. “Like I’m going to believe another one of your stupid 
jokes.” 

Carlo, his face twisted in pain, pointed wildly to his foot. Falling back onto 
the bed with a groan, he yanked off his sneaker. 

Blood oozed through his white sock. 

“A nail!” he gasped. “I stepped on a nail!” 

I dropped my eyes to the sneaker on the floor. 

Along nail had poked through the thick rubber sole—and into Carlo’s foot! 

Weird, I thought. Where did a nail come from? 

“Hey, it’s really bleeding!” Carlo wailed. “Do something!” 

I searched around frantically for something to use as a bandage. As I did, 
my eyes rested on the sponge in the gerbil cage. 

“Whoa!” I cried. 

The sponge quivered and shook. 

It shook with what seemed like joy\ 

And it breathed—so loudly that I could hear the eerie sound from the other 
side of the room! 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

As I wrapped an old T-shirt around Carlo’s foot, two questions ran through 
my mind—what in the world is happening here? Why did the sponge creature 
suddenly get so excited? 

I wouldn’t find out the frightening truth about the sponge creature until the 
next day. 

When I learned it, I understood why there were so many accidents in our 
new house. 

And it made me wish that I had never opened that cabinet, never reached 
under the sink, and never found the spongy... thing. 

Because now it was too late. 

Too late for us all. 



7 


“Kat, it’s all set.” Mom grinned at me the next morning when I walked into the 
kitchen for breakfast. 

“What’s all set?” I asked sleepily. 

“Your birthday party tomorrow!” Mom replied, giving me a quick hug. 
Mom’s very big on hugging. 

“How could you forget?” she asked in surprise. “We’ve been planning your 
birthday for weeks!” 

“My party!” I breathed with delight. “Oh, I can’t wait!” I sat down at the 
table for cornflakes and orange juice. 

Birthday parties are a really big deal around the Merton house. Mom 
always orders a big cake. And she makes all the invitations and decorations by 
hand. 

This year, I helped with the invitations. We cut them out of purple 
construction paper and used a pink sparkle pen to write the words. 

I usually have a theme for my parties. Last year’s theme was “Make your 
own pizza.” And it was awesome! My friends talked about it for weeks. 

Now that I’m going to be twelve, I decided I’m too old for a theme. So 
Mom and Dad are taking me and five of my best friends to WonderPark—for the 
entire day. 

WonderPark is definitely the coolest. It has two wave pools, a whole bunch 
of water slides, and the Monster Masher. That’s the scariest upside-down roller 
coaster I’ve ever been on! 

Just how cool is it? Well, last summer, Carlo lost his lunch after a ride on 
the Masher. 

Pretty cool. 

“This is going to be my best birthday ever!” I exclaimed, smiling across the 
table at Mom. I turned to Daniel. “Sorry, you’re not invited. This is for twelve- 
year-olds only.” 

“No fair! Why can’t I come along?” he complained, banging his spoon into 
his cereal and splashing milk all over the table. “I promise I won’t talk to any of 
Kat’s friends. Who would want to? Please let me come!” 

I started to feel sort of bad. I started to change my mind. 



And then Daniel totally mined his chance. 

He folded his arms over his chest. “Kat gets everything around here,” he 
grumbled. “She won’t even share the sponge with me!” 

“That old thing Kat found under the sink?” Mom asked in surprise. “Who’d 
want it?” 

“Me!” yelled Daniel. 

“Well, I found it, so it’s mine. And I’m bringing my sponge to school 
today,” I informed Daniel. 

“Why?” Mom asked. 

“I’m going to show it to Mrs. Vanderhoff,” I explained. “Maybe she’ll 
know what it is. Now I need to find a carrier for my sponge.” 

I searched around in the kitchen cabinets. “Perfect!” I proclaimed, holding 
up a plastic container labeled Deli. It still smelled faintly of potato salad. 

With an old pair of scissors, I punched a few air holes in the top of the 
container. Then I ran upstairs to get the sponge. 

Back in the kitchen, I set the sealed container on the floor and opened the 
refrigerator. 

“Mom,” I called, “which lunch bag is mine?” 

“The blue one, honey,” she replied. 

I grabbed my lunch and shut the refrigerator. 

I heard a sniffing sound coming from the kitchen floor. I looked down. 

“Killer, what are you doing, boy?” I smiled at the floppy-eared dog. 

Snrff. Snrff. Snrff. 

He sniffed at the container. 

Grrr. Grrr. 

He pawed the ground and growled. 

Here we go again, I thought. 

Killer set his ears back, circling the container suspiciously. 

And barked. 

And barked. And barked. 

“Killer! Get back!” I shouted. 

But the dog was way too excited to listen to me. 

“Mom, Daniel!” I called. “Help me get Killer away. I think he wants to eat 
the sponge for breakfast!” 

Mom grabbed Killer by his collar and hauled him, still growling, away from 
the container. She pushed the door open and shooed the dog into the backyard. 



“Go outside, boy, there you go,” she said gently. 

Mom turned to me. “What’s got that dog so upset? He sure is acting 
strange. Now get a move on, or you’ll be late for school. And then I’ll be 
growling and barking!” 

Throwing my backpack over my shoulder, I gave Mom a quick kiss good¬ 
bye and followed Daniel out the door. 

“Watch this!” he yelled, dashing across the street to the Johnsons’ house 
and planting himself underneath their basketball hoop. 

Daniel faked a dribble and a pass, and ran madly around in circles. “Bet you 
can’t jump this high!” he said, pretending to sink a basket. 

“Come on, Daniel,” I replied, walking quickly down the street. “Mrs. 
Vanderhoff will keep me after school if I show up late.” 

Daniel trotted over to me. Suddenly, his eyes bulged! 

“Kat! Look out!” he screamed. 

Craaack! 

I heard a frightening sound above my head. A loud cracking. As if someone 
had cracked about a thousand knuckles at the same time. 

I glanced up in time to see a huge dead tree branch hurtling down through 
the air. 

I froze. 

I couldn’t scream. I couldn’t move. 

I couldn’t move a muscle. 

I was about to be crushed into Kat litter! 



8 


“Ohhhhhhh.” A terrified moan escaped my throat. 

I felt someone shove me hard from behind. 

The force of it sent me flying to the ground. 

I lay there in shock and watched the huge tree branch crash down to the 
ground, cracking and shattering. 

It landed a few feet behind me. 

As I struggled to pull myself up, the sponge container rolled out of my 
hand. The little creature came spilling out onto the sidewalk. 

“Saved your life!” cried Daniel. “Now you owe me big!” 

I barely heard him. 

The sponge. I could only stare at the sponge. 

Whoa-ahhh, whoa-ahhh. 

Breathing louder and faster and deeper than I’d ever heard before. 

Whoa-ahhh, whoa-ahhh. 

Throbbing its little heart out. Practically hopping around on the ground in 
excitement. 

Ba-boom, ba-boom. 

Very weird. I’d almost been killed by the falling branch. And the sponge 
seemed really excited. As if it enjoyed my near accident. As if my accident made 
it really happy. 

“Mrs. Vanderhoff!” I called, rushing into the classroom. “I have to show you 
something!” 

Mrs. Vanderhoff is a brain. She basically knows everything about 
everything. 

She’s very smart. And she takes us on great class trips. At Halloween, we 
visited a spooky old theater that’s supposed to be haunted by the ghosts of dead 
actors. 

But Mrs. Vanderhoff is also really strict. Anyone who goofs off or talks out 
of turn stays after school for a week! 

One other problem. She has no sense of humor at all. I’ve never even seen 
her crack a smile. 



“Check this out, Mrs. Vanderhoff,” I blurted out, shoving the sponge under 
her nose. “I found it under the kitchen sink of our new house. And when Daniel 
went to grab it, he hit his head. And my Dad thought I pushed him, and—and—” 

Mrs. Vanderhoff peered at me over her wire-rim glasses. “Kat, sshh,” she 
ordered sharply. “Now, start over—slowly and clearly.” 

I took a deep breath and began again, starting with moving day and ending 
with the falling tree branch. 

“And you say it throbs and breathes?” Mrs. Vanderhoff asked, staring hard 
at me. 

“Yes!” I exclaimed. 

“Let me see it,” Mrs. Vanderhoff replied. I handed over the container. 

Hesitantly, she stuck her hand in and lifted the sponge out. 

“Oh, wow.” I groaned in disappointment. The sponge appeared dry and 
shriveled. 

It didn’t breathe. It didn’t throb. 

Mrs. Vanderhoff glared at me. “Kat, what’s the meaning of this?” she 
huffed. “This is an ordinary kitchen sponge.” 

She made a face. “A dirty one, I might add.” 

“You’re wrong!” I cried shrilly, desperate for her to believe me. “It’s much 
more than a sponge. It’s alive. It has eyes—see? You’ve got to see!” 

Mrs. Vanderhoff squinted at me, shaking her gray-haired head. 

“Oh, all right,” she said with a sigh. She bent her head and examined the 
sponge closely. She ran her fingers over its wrinkled surface. 

“I don’t know what in the world you’re talking about,” she said angrily, 
motioning for me to take my seat. “This thing doesn’t have eyes. And it’s not 
alive. It’s a dirty, dried-up old sponge.” 

Mrs. Vanderhoff glared at me. “If this is your idea of a joke, Katrina, I don’t 
get it. I don’t get it at all.” 

“But...” I started. 

Mrs. Vanderhoff held up her hand. “Not another word,” she instructed. She 
handed the sponge back—dropping it into my hand like a piece of junk. 

My stomach churned with disappointment. 

Couldn’t I say anything else to convince her? 

The sharp rap of a ruler on her desk interrupted my thoughts. “I’m going to 
pass back the papers from your math test last week,” Mrs. Vanderhoff 
announced. 



Everyone groaned. The surprise quiz on long division had been a major 
disaster for all of us. 

“Settle down,” Mrs. Vanderhoff snapped. 

She reached into her desk to pull out the test papers, and —slammed her 
fingers in the drawer! 

With a howl of pain, she shrieked, “My fingers! Owww—I think I broke 
my fingers! ” 

I was still standing beside her desk. Holding her hand, she turned to me. 
“Help me, Katrina. I’ve got to get to the nurse’s office!” 

I opened the classroom door for Mrs. Vanderhoff. Then I helped her down 
the hall to the infirmary. 

“What’s happened?” Mrs. Twitchell, the school nurse, jumped up from her 
desk and came running up to us. Her starchy white uniform rustled as she 
moved. She sat Mrs. Vanderhoff in a comfortable chair. 

“My fingers,” groaned Mrs. Vanderhoff, holding up her red, swollen hand. 
“I smashed them in the desk drawer!” 

“All right,” Mrs. Twitchell said soothingly. “We’ll put some ice on that 
hand. And I’ll make sure the principal sends somebody to watch your class.” 

“Thank you,” Mrs. Vanderhoff moaned. “Katrina, you can go on back to 
class now. You’ve been very helpful.” 

Helpful? 

Everywhere I went these days, I told myself, somebody seemed to get badly 

hurt! 

Unhappily, I shuffled my way back toward classroom 6B. 

“Kat! Kat!” I heard someone shouting my name. 

Daniel raced out of the library, nearly tripping over his untied shoelaces. He 
crashed right into me. 

“I found it!” he cried breathlessly. “I found the sponge creature! In a book! I 
know what it is!” 



9 


I grabbed Daniel by the front of his shirt. “What is it? What?” I demanded. “I 
have to know!” 

“Whoa. Take it easy. Cool your jets.” Daniel pushed my hands off his shirt. 
“Til show you,” he promised. “I have a picture in here.” 

“In where?” I asked. 

Daniel gazed around the hall. No one in sight. 

He pulled a book out from under his shirt and handed it to me. A big black 
volume. 

I glanced quickly at the title: Encyclopedia of the Weird. 

“Is your picture in there?” I teased. 

“Ha-ha. Very funny,” he replied. He grabbed the book away from me. “Do 
you want to see your sponge?” 

“Definitely!” 

Daniel flipped the pages quickly, muttering to himself, “Grebles, Griffins, 
Grocks. Here it is!” 

He shoved the book under my nose. It smelled funny—sort of musty. I 
guessed it had been sitting on the library shelf a long, long time. 

Daniel pointed to a drawing on page 89.1 lowered my eyes to the page. 

Wrinkly skin. Tiny black eyes. “It does look like the sponge,” I gasped. 

I began reading the story underneath the drawing. 

“This is a Grool. ” 

A Grool? I thought. What in the world is that? I returned to the book: 

“The Grool is an ancient and mythical creature. ” 

“Mythical?” I cried. “That means it’s not real—that it’s made up! But it is 
real!” 

“Keep reading,” Daniel urged. 

“The Grool does not eat food or drink water. Instead, it gets its strength 
from luck. Bad luck. ” 

“Daniel,” I stammered. “This is weird. Really weird.” He nodded, his eyes 
wide. 

“The Grool has always been known as a bad-luck charm. It feeds on the 



bad luck of other people. The Grool becomes stronger each time something bad 
happens around it. ” 

“This book is crazy,” I muttered. I eagerly read some more: 

“Bad luck for the Grool owner never ends. The Grool cannot be killed—by 
force or by any violent means. And it cannot — ever—be given away or tossed 
aside. ” 

Why not? I wondered. 

The next lines gave me the answer: 

“A Grool is only passed on to a new owner when an owner dies. Anyone 
who gives the Grool away will DIE within one day. ” 

“That is so stupid!” I exclaimed. “Stupid. Stupid. Stupid.” 

Turning to Daniel, I said in a low voice, “There is no such thing as a 
creature that lives on bad luck.” 

“How do you know, genius?” Daniel demanded. 

“Everything needs food and water,” I replied. “Everything that’s alive, 
anyway.” 

“I don’t know,” Daniel said. “I think the book could be right.” 

The drawing of a creature on another page caught my eye. “Hey, what’s 
this?” I asked. 

It looked like a potato—oval and brown. But it had a mouth full of sharp, 
pointy teeth. 

I quickly read the description. 

“The Lanx is a cousin of the Grool. But it is much more dangerous. ” 

“Yuck!” Daniel cried, making a face. 

I kept reading: 

“Once the Lanx latches on to someone, it never lets go—until it has drained 
every drop of energy from that person. ” 

I slammed the encyclopedia shut. “Here, Daniel, take this dumb book!” I 
shoved the Encyclopedia of the Weird back into my brother’s arms. “This stuff is 
totally crazy. I don’t believe any of it.” 

“But I thought you wanted to know more about the sponge,” Daniel said. 

“I do. But not this made-up stuff!” I told him. 

I knew I was acting sort of rotten to Daniel. And that he only wanted to 

help. 

But give me a break. After all that had been happening, I was a little 
stressed out. 



I mean, it had been a bad couple of days—with Dad falling off the ladder, 
and Mrs. Vanderhoff slamming her hand in the desk. 

And me nearly being crushed by the tree branch! 

I stomped down the hall back to class. “Stupid book,” I muttered to myself. 
But another thought kept forcing its way into my mind: What if the book is 
right? 

I stared at the Grool, still sitting in its container on the corner of Mrs. 
Vanderhoff’s desk. I walked up to it. 

It was wet again. And breathing. Its cold, black eyes stared back. 

I felt a chill of fear and a prickling all over my skin. 

“Mythical creatures don’t exist,” I whispered to the creature. “I’m not going 
to believe that book. I’m not!” 

The sponge stared up at me, breathing softly. 

I picked up the container and shook it angrily. “What are you?” I cried. 
“What?” 

Daniel told Carlo the whole story on the walk home. I walked behind them, 
trying to think about something else. Anything else. 

“It’s called a Grool. And it’s a bad-luck charm,” Daniel explained excitedly. 
“Right, Kat?” 

“I think you’re the bad-luck charm,” I snapped. “And I don’t think that 
book makes any sense.” 

“Oh, yeah?” he cried. He grabbed my backpack. 

“You don’t need these books, do you?” he teased. “You’re so smart, you 
know more than the encyclopedia.” 

Dancing down the street with my books, Daniel turned on to Maple Lane. 
“Hey, Mom’s outside!” he cried, surprised. He started to run. 

Carlo and I hurried to catch up with Daniel. 

Mom stood at the door, waiting for us. Her face wore a tense, worried 
expression. “Hi, kids. Come on inside,” she said. 

Daniel, Carlo, and I followed Mom into the kitchen. 

“I’m afraid I have some very bad news,” she began sadly. 



10 


“Killer is gone,” Mom announced. She bit her lower lip. 

“Gone?” Daniel and I shrieked at once. 

“He ran away,” Mom explained. “I can’t find him anywhere. He must have 
slipped out when I went to put some things in the garage.” 

“But, Mom—” I protested. “Killer never runs away. He’s never done it 
before.” 

“Kat is right!” Daniel agreed. “He’s not brave enough to run away.” 

“Don’t worry,” Mom said. “I’m sure we’ll find him. I’ve called the police, 
and they’re out searching for him right now.” 

“I’ll find Killer,” Daniel cried. “Bet I can find him before the police! Come 
on, Carlo!” 

Daniel grabbed a handful of doggie treats and ran out. Carlo followed close 
behind. 

The door slammed shut behind them. 

Poor Killer, I thought. Out somewhere alone. Probably lost. Bet he’s scared. 

Our new house is so close to the highway—to all those speeding cars. What 
will happen to my little dog? 

I suddenly felt like crying. I grabbed the sponge in its container and ran up 
the stairs. 

“It’s all your fault, isn’t it?” I accused the creature. “I bet you are a Grool 
after all!” 

As I talked, the Grool pulsed. It shook so hard, I expected it to throb right 
out of the container. 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. 

And it breathed fast and deep. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

I yanked the Grool out. “We’ve had enough bad luck!” I wailed. “Maybe 
this will stop you!” I hurled the horrible thing as hard as I could against the wall. 

The Grool hit the wall with a sickening splat. 

And I let out a shrill cry of pain. 



11 


I glanced down and saw red. 

Red blood. 

Flowing over my left hand. 

As I threw the Grool, I slammed the hand down on my desk—onto the 
sharp point of a pair of scissors! 

“Ohhh!” I moaned, checking out my hand. A deep, nasty cut. 

I wrapped some tissues around the cut to slow the bleeding. Then I spotted 
the Grool down on the floor. 

Dead, I hoped. 

I bent down. 

“Gross!” I yelped. The Grool was breathing and throbbing—faster and 
harder than ever before. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

I leaned in closer. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

“Hey, what’s that?” I murmured. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

I guess you’d call the noise a laugh. A dry, cruel snicker that sounded more 
like a cough. 

Then, as I listened to that evil laugh, the Grool began changing. 

Its color suddenly brightened—from dull brown to light pink. As I stared in 
amazement, the Grool turned bright tomato-red. 

As red as the blood on my cut hand. 

My hand! Yuck! Blood seeped through the tissues and dripped slowly onto 
the floor. 

I needed help with this. Mom’s help. 

“Mom!” I called, leaping up. “I need a Band-Aid. A big one!” 

As I hurried down the hall, a jumble of questions ran through my mind. 

Why did the Grool change color? I wondered. And that laugh—I’d never 
heard it before. What did it mean? Was it really laughing? 

Did I hurt the Grool when I threw it against my bedroom wall? Is that why 



it turned red? 

So many frightening questions.... 

I listened at the door, cupping my hand around my ear. 

Voices. Inside my room. 

“Who’s there?” I called out shakily. 

The door flew open. 

“It’s the ghost of the Grool,” Daniel whispered in a spooky voice. 
“Owoooooooo.” 

Daniel and Carlo stood over the gerbil cage, giggling. 

“Oh, I’m so scared,” I sneered. “Did you find Killer?” 

“No,” Daniel replied sadly. “Carlo and I searched all over the 
neighborhood. Mom says the police will find him.” 

I turned my eyes to the gerbil cage. “How did the Grool get back in there?” 

“I found it on the floor, so I stuck it back in the cage,” Daniel replied. “How 
did it get out?” 

“Beats me.” I shrugged. I didn’t feel like explaining. 

Carlo, who’d been studying the Grool closely, stared at me. “Hey, what 
happened to your hand?” he asked, pointing to my bandage. 

I didn’t want to tell them. 

“Oh, uh, nothing,” I replied. “Just a little cut. Why are you guys standing 
there staring at the Grool?” 

“Carlo still wants to borrow it,” Daniel explained, tapping the side of the 
cage to get the creature’s attention. “I told him no.” 

Carlo turned to me. “Please,” he begged. “I promise I’ll be careful. Please, 
please, please, please...” 

That stupid Grool! “Oh, take it and keep it!” I snapped. 

“Excellent!” Carlo’s eyes lit up, and he reached eagerly into the plastic cage 
to grab his prize. 

“Wait!” Daniel cried, grabbing Carlo’s arm to stop him. “Kat, remember 
what the Encyclopedia of the Weird said.” 

Daniel began reciting the Grool entry from memory, staring at me all the 
while. 

“You cannot give a Grool away. Anyone who gives the Grool away will DIE 
within one day. ” 

A feeling of dread grew in my stomach. 



But I couldn’t believe that stupid book. Could I? 

Did the encyclopedia say that Grools laugh? Or change color? 

No. 

Carlo and Daniel stared at me. Waiting for my decision. Should I give the 
sponge creature to Carlo? 

I studied the Grool. 

“Don’t do it, Kat,” Daniel urged. “Please don’t give it away. It’s too 
dangerous.” 

I knew only one thing. I wanted to get the Grool away from me as quickly 
as I could. And if Carlo wanted it so badly, I decided, let him have it! 

“Go ahead, Carlo,” I said. “Take the gross, disgusting thing.” 

Daniel grabbed the Grool out of the cage and held it tightly. “No!” he cried. 
“Carlo is not taking it. I don’t care what you say. I won’t let him take it!” 

“Now who’s the scaredy-cat?” I asked, giving Daniel a poke in the arm. 

“I’m trying to save you!” Daniel exclaimed. “Don’t you understand?” 

Poor Daniel. He seemed so serious, so frightened. I decided to give him a 
break. 

“Well, okay. Carlo, I guess you’d better not take the Grool,” I announced. 

Daniel heaved a sigh of relief. 

Carlo frowned. “Okay. Bye. I’m out of here.” 

“I’ll go with you,” Daniel said, tossing the Grool back into the cage. “Come 
on, let’s ride our bikes to the park. Maybe Killer’s there.” As he hurried out of 
the bedroom, Daniel turned and gave me a thumbs-up. 

After the boys left, I collapsed on my bed. What’s going to happen next? I 
wondered. 

I lifted my eyes to the plastic cage and glared at the Grool. I felt a deep 
hatred for the little creature. 

“If one more bad thing happens around here, I’ll bury you,” I promised it. 
“I’ll bury you so far in the ground that no one will ever find you or see you 
again. Ever.” 

It was a promise I would soon have to keep. 



12 


The next morning I woke up with a jolt. 

Toot! Toot! Daniel stood at the foot of my bed, blowing away on a party 

horn. 

“Time to get up, Kat!” he squealed. 

I reached out to grab the noisy horn away. “Quit it, you loser!” I grumbled. 
Then I remembered. 

My birthday! Finally! Something to celebrate. 

I jumped out of bed. Time to get ready to go to WonderPark! 

I planned to be on the Seattle Log Flume and the Wild Wave Slide all day 

long! 

Running to the window, I peeked out through the glass. “No!” I cried in 
disappointment. “No! It can’t be!” 

Rain poured down. Lightning crackled through the sky. Thunder boomed so 
loud, I felt the house shake. 

How could we go to WonderPark in this mess? 

“Kat,” Mom called from downstairs. “Breakfast.” 

I threw on my purple-and-pink-striped leggings and a purple T-shirt and ran 
to the kitchen. On my birthday Mom always makes my favorite—waffles with 
strawberries and powdered sugar. 

“Here’s the birthday girl. Happy birthday, honey.” Mom beamed, giving me 
a big hug. 

“I’m dressed for my party,” I said hopefully as I sat down at the table. 

“Oh, honey, I’m afraid we’ll have to cancel your party,” Mom said sadly. 
“We certainly can’t go to WonderPark in this storm.” 

Cancel? I poked unhappily at my waffles. 

“Can’t we have the party here—indoors?” I pleaded. “We’ll order pizza and 
play computer games in the den.” 

“You know that we can’t do that,” Mom said. “The painters will be here all 
day in the living room and dining room. With all those ladders and buckets of 
paint, I can’t have your friends running around.” 

What rotten luck. 

“But, Mom, it’s my birthday!” I protested, throwing down my fork. “And 



you promised I could have a party. You promised!” 

Mom sighed. “I know how disappointed you are, Kat. We’ll have your party 
another day. Maybe next weekend.” 

Another day wouldn’t be my birthday. “Everything’s going wrong!” I cried. 
“Ever since we moved!” 

I hated this new house. I even hated my birthday. 

Most of all, I hated the Grool. 

Leaving my waffles on the plate, I ran up to my room. I snatched the Grool 
out of its cage and shook it as hard as I could. 

“I warned you!” I threatened. “You ruined my birthday! Now you’ll pay!” 

The Grool throbbed happily in my hand, and I hurled it back into the gerbil 
cage. “I hate you!” I shrieked. “I really hate you! You and your bad luck!” 

Plopping down at my desk, I decided I had to take action. Strong action. 

No birthday party. No more Grool. 

“I’m keeping my promise,” I told the creature. 

I pulled a notebook out of my desk drawer and began to make some plans 
to get rid of it. 

“Daniel, it’s not raining anymore,” I whispered to my brother. “Come on, it’s 
time.” 

The Grool vibrated in its plastic container. 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. 

Daniel glanced up from his computer screen. “Now?” he asked. “Give me a 
break, Kat. I’m on level ten, and I need to slay only one more troll before I can 
open the treasure chest.” 

“This is important. Really important,” I insisted. 

Daniel sighed. “Do you think you should do it? You know what the book 
said.” 

“I’ve got to!” I cried. “Remember, it’s the Grool’s fault that Killer ran 
away.” 

Daniel was definitely nervous. And scared. 

But he obediently hit the save button on Troll Terror and followed me 
outside to the backyard. It had rained all day. But now a few stars shone high 
above us in the charcoal night sky. 

“Here. You hold the Grool,” I whispered. I shoved the creature into his 
trembling hands. 



I skipped over to the garage—feeling happy for the first time in days. “I’m 
getting rid of the Grool,” I sang to myself. 

Grabbing the biggest shovel I could find, I made my way back to Daniel. 
Then I started to dig. 

This had to be a serious hole, a deep hole. Something the Grool could 
never, ever climb out of. 

A cool breeze blew around me. But digging in the damp ground was hard 
work. Sweat rolled down my back and forehead. 

I didn’t feel scared at all. I had to do something to make life normal again. I 
had to stop all the bad luck. 

And if it meant burying a living sponge, fine. As long as I never had to see 
that stupid, snickering creature again. 

I peered down into the hole. It seemed pretty deep, about as long as my 

arm. 

“I’m finished,” I told my brother. “Pass me the Grool.” 

Daniel silently handed the sponge to me. 

As I held it over the deep hole, the sponge didn’t throb. It didn’t breathe. It 
didn’t even feel warm. 

It felt dry and dead, like an ordinary kitchen sponge. 

But I knew better. 

I dropped the Grool into the hole and watched happily as it tumbled down 
the steep dirt sides to the bottom. 

Picking up the shovel again, I began throwing dirt onto the creature—heap 
after heap. 

Dig. Throw. Dig. Throw. 

Finally, the hole was filled up. I used the back of the shovel to smooth the 
dirt flat. “There,” I said. “No one but us will know the Grool is buried here.” 

I lowered my eyes to the soft, wet dirt. “Bye, bye Grool,” I called out 
happily. “Daniel, I think our luck is going to change now.” 

Daniel didn’t reply. 

I spun around. “Daniel? Daniel? Where are you?” 

My brother had disappeared. 



13 


What had I done? 

I dropped the shovel in a panic. “Daniel!” I shrieked. “Where are you?” 

Had I made my brother disappear? Did burying the Grool somehow make 
Daniel vanish into thin air? 

“Daniel? Daniel?” I called in a trembling voice. 

I heard a soft rustling sound coming from behind the garage. 

I crept quietly toward it. “Daniel,” I whispered. “Is that you?” 

No reply. 

I peeked behind the garage. 

Daniel sat with his arms locked around his knees. Safe and sound. 

“Daniel!” I cried. I felt so relieved that I pinched him. 

“Cut it out,” he snapped. He leaped to his feet. 

“What are you doing back here? I was so worried—I thought the Grool got 
you!” 

Daniel didn’t reply. He lowered his eyes to the ground. 

“Why did you hide?” I demanded. 

“I was scared,” he murmured. “I thought the Grool might explode or fight 
back or something.” 

“You were scared?” I asked. “Why didn’t you at least answer me when I 
called you?” 

“I thought maybe the Grool was chasing you,” he confessed, his face 
turning red. 

“Daniel, don’t worry,” I said. The poor guy was really frightened. And 
embarrassed that he had hid. 

I put both hands on his shoulders. “The Grool is gone. It’s buried deep in 
the ground.” 

He swallowed hard. “But what if it comes back? What if what the book said 
comes true?” 

“We’ll never see the Grool again,” I said quietly. “And don’t forget—the 
book said Grools don’t really exist. It’s all made up. Just a myth, a fairy tale.” 

Daniel sighed. “I hate to admit it, but you’re right, Kat,” he said. “At least 



this time.” 

“This time?” I shot back. “How about all the time?” I slugged Daniel on the 

arm. 

“Oh, that hurts so much I think I’m going to pass out!” Daniel cried 
sarcastically. He fell on to the wet lawn and pretended to faint. 

“Come on, let’s go in,” I urged. “You’re getting soaked. And I’m covered 
with dirt.” 

Daniel scrambled up and elbowed me aside. 

“Race you!” he cried, running toward the house. 

I leaped up the steps and beat him into the house by about a second. I 
slammed the screen door and held it closed, so Daniel couldn’t open it. 

“I won!” I shouted. 

“Only because I let you,” Daniel cried. He banged on the door. 

“Do you want to get in here?” I asked. 

Daniel nodded. 

“Then say, ‘Kat beat me fair and square’,” I commanded. 

“No way!” he replied. 

“Stay out there all night, then—with the Groooooooool!” I told him. I let 
out a ghostly howl. 

“Okay, okay. Kat beat me fair and square,” Daniel grumbled. “But I’ll win 
next time!” 

Actually, I didn’t really care about the race. I felt so glad that I buried the 
Grool, I would have let Daniel win ten races. 

As we burst into the living room, Mom and Dad raised their eyes from their 
newspapers. The house smelled of fresh paint. 

“Where were you?” Dad asked. 

“Oh, just fooling around in the yard,” I replied. 

“Is everything all right?” Mom asked with concern. “You’re filthy!” 

“Everything is fine,” I answered. “Now.” 

“Okay, go and wash up,” Mom ordered. “Then come into the kitchen.” 

Daniel and I crowded into the bathroom, leaned over the sink, pushing and 
bumping each other, and cleaned ourselves up. 

“Do you know what time it is?” Mom asked as I raced back into the 
kitchen. 

“Yes!” I shouted happily. “It’s time for my birthday cake.” 

Mom beamed. “Well, sit right down here.” 



I dropped excitedly into the chair she offered. Finally, I thought, things are 
going right again. 

Daniel perched on the chair next to mine. He grabbed my arm. “Something 
bad is going to happen,” he whispered. “I know it. I just know it.” 

I’m not going to let anything wreck tonight, I thought. 

“Don’t be such a wimp,” I whispered. “Everything’s fine.” 

At the kitchen counter, Mom hovered over the cake. She touched a match to 
each of the thirteen candles—one for each year and an extra one for luck. 

What an awesome cake! Mom had ordered it from the bakery down the 
street. It had all my favorites: pink frosting roses, chocolate icing, and a layer of 
strawberries. A tiny chocolate Ferris wheel sat on top. 

“Ready, Kat?” Mom asked. She carried the cake to the table. Her faced 
glowed happily in the candlelight. Dad flashed me a big grin. 

They all began to sing “Happy Birthday”. 

I saw Daniel watching me closely as he sang. 

They finished the song. I shut my eyes and made my wishes. 

“I wish Killer would come home,” I said to myself. “And I wish the Grool 
would never return. And that Daniel is wrong—that nothing bad will happen.” 

I leaned forward, closer to the candles, and blew hard. 

Pop! 

The loud noise from the kitchen nearly made me fall into my cake! 



14 


“Boy, that cork was loud!” chirped Mom. 

She set down a tray of glasses and a large green bottle. “It’s your favorite— 
sparkling apple cider,” she announced. “I know it’s not as good as a day at 
WonderPark....” 

“Oh, Mom!” I gasped, my heart still pounding. “It’s great. Everything is 
going to be great.” 

An excellent birthday. Cake, sparkling cider, and presents—two new video 
games, a Discman and some CDs, a purple backpack, and a sweatshirt in pink 
and purple—my favorite colors. 

That night before bed, I stuffed my school books into my new backpack. I 
stared at the gerbil cage. Empty and clean—as if the Grool had never even 
existed. 

I got rid of the disgusting creature, I thought happily. I really did. 

My family will finally be safe from bad luck. 

The clock in the hall chimed ten. Time for bed. I climbed into my nightshirt 
and dove under the covers. 

When the alarm rang the next morning, I bounced out of bed and ran to the 
window to check the weather. 

“Oh, nooo!” 

I uttered a low moan of horror. 

The backyard—it looked like a desert! 

Overnight, the grass had all burned brown. All the pink begonias dropped to 
the ground, dead and brown. Dad’s red roses had shriveled and turned black. 

Poor Dad, I thought. He worked so hard to make the yard beautiful. And, 
now... 

As I stared at the ugly, dead yard, I tried to force the thought from my mind. 
But deep down inside, I knew exactly how it all happened. 

The Grool. 

From its grave, the Grool had turned its evil powers on the lawn. And it 
killed every single living plant, flower, and blade of grass! 

What should I do? I wondered, staring out at the burned, dried-out, dead, 



dead yard. 

Should I remove the Grool from the ground? 

Did I have a choice? 

Not really. 

I quickly pulled on my new sweatshirt and a pair of jeans. Then I crept 
downstairs. I sneaked out to the spot where I had buried the Grool. 

And I began to dig. 

Brown, dry leaves rained down on my head. My shoulder ached from lifting 
the damp, heavy dirt. My stomach didn’t feel too great, either. 

Dig, toss. Dig, toss. 

The more I dug, the worse I felt. 

I wanted to throw the shovel down and run from the spot. To leave the 
terrible creature buried for good. 

But I had to face the truth. 

If I left the Grool buried, it would keep on punishing me. It would punish 
my whole family. 

I dug to the bottom of the hole. Then I bent down and pushed the dirt away 
with both hands. 

Slowly, before my frightened eyes, the Grool throbbed into view. More 
alive and excited than ever. 

“I should smash you with this shovel!” I yelled at it. 

The Grool vibrated crazily, almost as if what I said made it happy. 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. I could hear it breathe. 

And then once again, it turned from brown to pink to tomato-red. And it 
kept changing color as it breathed. 

Brown. Pink. Red. 

Brown. Pink. Red. 

I grabbed the Grool from its grave. It pulsed so hard that it throbbed right 
out of my hand and fell to the ground. 

“Stay still!” I shrieked, snatching it up. 

The Grool stared at me. Its tiny, round eyes glowed red with evil. 

I shivered. 

I gritted my teeth and shoved the Grool into the pocket of my new 
sweatshirt. I trudged back to the house, through the kitchen door, and into the 
hall that led to the stairs. 

At the bottom of the stairs, I heard a noise. It came from Mom and Dad’s 



bedroom. 

They’re awake, I thought. I’ve got to hurry before they see me and ask 
questions. That’s all I need. 

I leaped up the stairs, taking them two at a time. 

Whomp! I slipped and landed hard on my right knee. “Ouch!” I shrieked. 

I felt the Grool shake in my pocket. I heard its ugly, soft snicker. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

It was laughing at me! 

I jerked it out of my pocket and squeezed it so hard that my fingers hurt. 
Then I ran to my room and threw the Grool into the gerbil cage. 

“I’ll find a way to destroy you,” I promised. I rubbed my aching knee and 
glared at the little beast. “Before you can bring us any more bad luck, I will 
destroy you!” I cried. 

But how? I wondered. 

How? 



15 


“Kids, Aunt Louise is coming tomorrow,” Mom told Daniel and me the next 
morning. “So I want you both to clean up your rooms after school today.” 

“Aunt Louise is coming?” I asked. “Great!” 

Aunt Louise is my favorite aunt. Even though she^s a grown-up, she^s 
completely cool. 

She wears long, flowery dresses and drives a bright yellow convertible. 

And Aunt Louise blows the biggest bubble gum bubbles! And she knows a 
lot of really funny jokes. 

Mom says Aunt Louise has her head in the clouds. I guess that means she 
has a wild imagination. I don’t know about that, but she does know a lot about 
things like astrology and tarot cards. 

And, maybe—about Grools. 

That night, after I cleaned my room and before I went to bed, I said a 
special good night to the Grool. 

“My aunt is coming tomorrow and she’s going to help me get rid of you 
forever,” I whispered. It stared up at me, breathing softly. 

After school the next afternoon, Daniel and I turned the corner onto our block. 
And we saw Aunt Louise’s yellow convertible in the driveway. We ran the rest 
of the way home. 

“Hey—what’s up?” Aunt Louise called as we burst into the house. A floppy 
yellow straw hat covered her black curly hair. 

Before Daniel could get to her, I threw my arms around Aunt Louise and 
whispered in her ear, “Come upstairs with me. Now. It’s super-important.” 

My aunt pulled off her hat and set it on my head. She admired me in the hat. 
“Super-important?” she asked. 

“Yes,” I whispered, grabbing her hand and tugging her toward the stairs. 

“Have you ever heard of a Grool?” I asked. 

“A Grool? Hmmm. I’ll have to think about that one for a minute,” she 
replied thoughtfully. “No, I don’t think so. What is a Grool?” 

“Well,” I explained, “Daniel found a picture in an encyclopedia. And the 
book said it was an ancient, mythical creature....” 



“Well, if it’s mythical, honey, that means it doesn’t exist,” Aunt Louise 
interrupted. 

“But it’s not mythical!” I cried impatiently. “I should know because I have 
one. And it causes trouble, lots of trouble.” 

Aunt Louise followed me to my room. 

“Have you ever heard of a Lanx?” I asked. 

She shook her head. 

“That’s another creature in that encyclopedia. It looks like a potato, but it 
has a mouth full of sharp teeth.” 

“Good heavens. It sounds disgusting!” Aunt Louise exclaimed. “But tell me 
about this... Grool. What does it look like?” 

“Here. I’ll show you,” I said. I pulled her into my room. 

I pointed at the gerbil cage. The Grool squatted in the corner. 

Aunt Louise walked up to the cage. “So you’re a Grool,” she said, leaning 
down. She reached over to pick it up. 

“Wait,” I cried. “Maybe you shouldn’t touch it.” 

But I was too late. 



16 


Aunt Louise picked up the Grool and placed it in the palm of her hand. She 
studied it for a long while. 

Then she turned to me. “Kat, it’s only a dried-up sponge. What’s the big 
idea?” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Oh, I get it!” she laughed. “You really had me fooled! I thought you were 
serious!” She tossed the Grool to me. 

I tried to catch it, but I didn’t want to touch it. It plopped to the floor. 

“Pretty funny, kid.” She chuckled as she turned to leave. “You have a great 
imagination. Just like your aunt.” 

I picked up the Grool and examined it closely. 

Not warm. 

Not breathing. 

Not moving at all. 

Dry and hard. 

An ordinary sponge. 

Aunt Louise thought I was joking. But the joke was on me. 

The Grool had tricked me again! 

I hurled the creature back into the gerbil cage. It lay there lifeless. “I hope 
you rot in there!” I exploded. 

Before my amazed eyes, the dry brown sponge began plumping-up. In a 
few seconds, it became fuller and moister. 

“Yuck!” I groaned, watching it turn pink and then red. 

The Grool huffed and puffed. Whoa-ahhhh. Whoa-ahhh. 

Those little black eyes peered out at me excitedly. 

The Grool snickered softly. 

Why was it so pleased with itself? I wondered. Nothing horrible had 
happened. 

Or had it? 

I thought of Dad’s fall off the ladder. The tree branch. Mrs. Vanderhoff’s 
fingers. Killer running away. My spoiled birthday party. Our dry, rotted 



backyard. 

It was all too much. Too much! 

With a desperate cry, I yanked the evil thing out of its cage. Then I 
slammed it down hard on my desk. 

Breathing hard, my heart pounding, I grabbed one of my heaviest 
textbooks. And I slammed it down onto the Grool. 

“Die!” I shouted. “Please! Die!” 

I raised the book high. Pounded the Grool with it. 

Again. Again. 

I pounded hard enough to kill anything. 

Finally, I stopped. Gasping for breath, my arms aching, I stared down at 
what I’d done. 

Yuck. What a mess. 

Brown and pink shreds of Grool littered my desk. 

I had smashed it to pieces. 

“Yes!” I cried breathlessly. “Yes!” 

Finally! I had finally destroyed the evil creature! 

“Yes!” I cried again. 

But the cry stuck in my throat. 

As the pink and brown shreds started to move, I stared down in horror—and 
began to shake all over. 



17 


“This can’t be happening,” I whispered. 

But it was. 

The pieces—the shreds of Grool—they were sliding across the desktop. 
Slithering. Rolling together. 

Coming back together. 

Forming a brown ball. A sponge. 

It didn’t take long. A minute at the most. 

And now the Grool stared up at me again. And it vibrated so hard that my 
desk actually began to rock. 

Its cruel snicker cut through my shocked silence. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

“Shut up! Shut up!” I screamed. 

But it snickered even louder. 

Frantic, I grabbed a dirty sock from the clothes hamper. I used it to pick up 
the Grool. And then I hurled the thing back into the cage. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

With a cry, I threw myself face down on my bed and covered my ears. “Will 
I have this bad luck for the rest of my life? Is there anything I can do?” 

I was so frightened. So angry. So confused. 

I couldn’t even pretend to be my usual cheery self. 

When Aunt Louise took me and Daniel out to an ice-cream parlor, I 
couldn’t even finish a small butterscotch sundae. Usually, I’m good for a triple 
decker. 

But how could I ever be happy again? I was stuck with the Grool—forever. 

“Wake up, Kat! Wake up!” A frantic voice whispered in my ear. 

I slowly raised my head off the pillow. “Huh?” 

Daniel was waving his bookbag back and forth about an inch above my 
head. “Get that away!” I shouted, grabbing for it. 

“Hey, I’m only trying to help you,” he replied, snatching the pack away. 
“You’re going to be late for school. You’d better get moving!” 



He ran out of the room. 

I tore the covers off and raced to the closet. I slipped on my Save the Earth 
sweatshirt and purple flowered leggings. Then I remembered. 

“Daniel, you little dweeb!” I bellowed. “We have no school today! There’s 
a teachers’ conference!” 

He peeked back into my room. 

“Got you!” he gloated. 

I hurled a pillow at his head and hit him in the face. A nice shot. 

“You’re a bad sport,” he said, laughing. “Carlo’s coming over after 
breakfast. We can play Mega Monster Warriors. ” 

I slammed the door in his face. 

Daniel’s stupid tricks usually don’t bother me too much. 

And a day off from school always puts me in a great mood. 

But how could I enjoy myself? I just kept wondering what bad thing was 
going to happen next. 

What bad luck would the evil Grool bring today? 

After breakfast, I hung around on the back porch, reading a magazine. And 
trying to ignore Daniel’s and Carlo’s shrieks and wild laughter as they played 
computer games. 

I really missed Killer. He usually sits next to me when I read. 

After about an hour, I got bored. I decided to go up to my room and work 
on my social studies assignment. 

I had to write an essay for Mrs. Vanderhoff. My Family and What They 
Mean to Me. 

But I kept thinking about the Grool and how it was totally ruining my 
family. 

So far, all I had written was: “I’m Kat Merton and my family means an 
awful lot to me.” 

Not exactly grade-A material. And the paper was due tomorrow morning. 

I decided to take a break. I went to the kitchen and poured myself a glass of 
chocolate milk and grabbed a handful of oatmeal cookies. 

On my way back upstairs, I peeked into the den. Things seemed very quiet 
in there. 

I didn’t see Carlo. Only Daniel, playing Underwater Adventure Quest. 

“Where is Carlo?” I asked. 

“Um,” Daniel replied, his eyes glued to the submarines and torpedoes 



flashing across the computer screen. 

“Was my question too hard for you?” I asked sarcastically. “I’ll go slower 
now. Where... is... Carlo?” 

“Home,” he mumbled. 

“Did he get mad because you sank more enemy submarines than he did?” I 
joked. 

Daniel didn’t answer. 

I headed upstairs to my room. I set down my milk and cookies. I couldn’t 
help but glance at the gerbil cage. 

It wasn’t what I saw that made a prickle of fear run down my back. It was 
what I didn’t see. 

The cage stood empty. 

The Grool was gone. 

Escaped. 



18 


How had it escaped? The Grool had never even tried to get out of its cage 
before. 

In fact, the stupid sponge never seemed very interested in going anywhere. 

Why did it disappear now? And where did it go? 

And what kind of trouble was it planning to make? 

It couldn’t get very far, I told myself. It had no legs. 

I started to call to Daniel. But my throat choked with panic. 

I frantically started to search for the Grool. I slid on my stomach under the 
bed. Not there. 

I pulled everything out of my closet. I opened dresser drawers. No sign of 
it. 

I checked every inch of the room. I even called out to it: “Here Grool, here 
Grool.” 

No. No way. The creature was gone. 

The words from the Encyclopedia of the Weird suddenly flashed into my 
mind: “Anyone who gives the Grool away will DIE within one day.” 

“Daniel!” I shrieked. “Daniel!” I tore downstairs and into the TV room. I 
shook him so hard, he dropped his computer mouse. 

“The Grool is gone!” I cried. “It escaped!” 

Daniel turned away from the computer screen. “Excuse me? What do you 
mean—gone?” 

“It’s gone! The cage is empty!” I wailed. 

Daniel scrunched up his face, thinking hard. “I know where it is,” he said. 
“Carlo.” 

“Huh?” I cried. “How could you? How could you let Carlo take it?” 

“I didn’t let him!” Daniel snapped. “He must have grabbed it when he left. 
Carlo thinks it’s all a big joke. He said there’s no way a little sponge can do 
anything bad.” 

“What a jerk!” I sputtered. “Maybe we should let him keep the Grool. It 
would teach him a lesson—a real nasty lesson!” 

“Kat, we can’t!” Daniel exclaimed. “He’s my best friend. We have to get 
the Grool back from him—before something terrible happens!” 



Daniel and I pulled our jackets out of the hall closet. Then we ran out to the 
garage. We jumped on our bikes and pedaled furiously down Maple Lane. 

“Where do you think he went?” I shouted. 

“Let’s try the school playground,” Daniel suggested. “There’s always a 
bunch of kids there.” 

“Yeah, and Carlo’s a big show-off,” I exclaimed. “He probably went 
straight to the playground to show off the Grool.” 

“He is not a show-off,” Daniel protested. 

“Is too!” I argued. Pedaling furiously, I shot way ahead of Daniel. 

I made it to Chestnut Street a few minutes later. “Only two more blocks!” I 
called breathlessly. I slowed down so that Daniel could catch up. 

I turned the corner. 

“Oh, no!” I screamed. 

I squeezed on the brakes. Stopped short. 

Who was that lying in the middle of the street? 

Was it Carlo? 

Yes! 

Carlo. Sprawled on his stomach. His arms and legs stretched over the 
pavement. 

“We’re too late!” Daniel cried. “We’re too late!” 



19 


Our bikes crashed to the ground as Daniel and I leaped off them. We bent over 
Carlo, calling his name. 

“Ohhhh, wow.” Carlo let out a low moan. He clutched his right leg. 

“Carlo!” I yelled breathlessly. “What is it? What happened? Are you okay?” 

Carlo bent his leg carefully and winced. “My knee really hurts. I twisted it 
when I fell off my bike.” 

I looked up and saw his bike, on its side under a tree. 

“How did it happen?” Daniel asked weakly. My brother hates the sight of 
blood. 

“Some of the older kids wanted to race me,” Carlo groaned. “I didn’t really 
want to race them—but they dared me.” 

He sat up, still rubbing his knee. “Man, I was flying! Then, well, I hit some 
gravel—and skidded into a tree. Those kids all thought it was a riot. They just 
rode off and left me.” 

“Daniel, help me get him up,” I instructed. We put our arms around Carlo 
and guided him over to the curb. 

Then we just sat there, staring at Carlo’s mangled bicycle. The handlebars 
looked like a giant metal pretzel. 

“You know what?” Carlo finally said. “I didn’t even see that stupid tree 
until I was right on top of it.” 

Daniel poked me. I knew he was thinking what I was thinking. 

The Grool strikes again. 

We had to get the Grool back. 

“Carlo, where is the Grool?” I asked. 

“Right there in my bike basket.” He pointed. 

I reached over the tangled handlebars and felt around the basket with my 
hand. 

And felt again. 

Nothing in the basket. Completely empty. 

“Carlo, give me a break,” I complained. “There’s no Grool in there. Where 
is it?” My voice got high and shrill. I could feel the panic sweeping over me. 



“Huh? It’s got to be in there!” Carlo declared. “That’s where I stuck it. I 
was going to take it right home.” 

“Oh, sure, Carlo,” I snapped. “Like you weren’t going to bring it to the 
playground and show it off?” 

Carlo hung his head. “Well, maybe for a couple of minutes.” 

“Great! Just great!” I fumed. “Because of you, the Grool is missing.” 

Daniel leaned close to me, his face pale with fear. “We’ve got to find the 
Grool, Kat,” he whispered. “Remember what the encyclopedia said. If you don’t 
find it in a day, you’ll die!” 

“I remember,” I replied with a shudder. “But how are we ever going to find 
it now? Where can it be?” 



20 


“I don’t even know where to start looking.” I sighed. 

“Maybe it fell out of the basket when I hit the tree,” Carlo suggested. 
“Maybe it rolled somewhere around here.” 

Daniel tugged on my sleeve. “Come on,” he urged. “Let’s start looking.” 

Carlo stood up. “I’d better get home,” he said. He limped away. Luckily, his 
house was on the next block. 

Daniel and I hunted all over the block. In doorways, underneath cars, in 
flower beds—anywhere the Grool might have rolled. 

No luck. 

As we were about to give up, I spotted a sewer grating a few feet away 
from Carlo’s bike. Could the Grool have tumbled down there? 

Daniel saw the sewer, too. “Kat? I’ll bet it rolled down into the sewer! It’s 
down there. I know it is!” 

I dropped to the pavement. On my stomach. I peered into the darkness 
through the grating. 

“It’s way too dark to see anything,” I reported. “Somebody will have to go 
down there.” 

“Uh... somebody? Maybe... maybe I could go,” my brother offered in a 
shaky voice. 

Daniel acts really brave. But I know he’s afraid of a lot of things. Like dark 
sewers. 

He’d freak out down in the sewer. 

“No. I’ll do it,” I said. “The Grool knows me better.” 

We lifted off the heavy grate. I felt around with my sneaker. It slid against a 
narrow ladder built into the side of the sewer. 

“I guess this is the only way down,” I said softly. “Here I go.” 

Slowly, I lowered myself into the dark wet hole. The ladder rungs were wet 
and slippery. The walls were thick with sewer slime. 

“This place really stinks /” I called up. “I can’t believe I’m doing this.” 

Squishhhhh! 

As I reached the sewer floor, my sneaker landed on something wet and 
oozy. 



“Gross!” I screamed, pulling my foot back up. 

“Are you okay?” Daniel called from above. He sounded ten miles away. 

“Yeah,” I shouted back. “I think I stepped in a pile of slime. Wow, it’s really 
dark down here.” 

I carefully touched my feet down again, and gripped the ladder tightly with 
one hand—afraid I would never find my way back if I let go. 

It’s too dark, I realized. I’ll never find the Grool down here. 

Then I heard it. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhhh. 

Breathing! 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhhh. 

The Grool! But where? 

I held my breath and stood completely still. I concentrated really hard, 
trying to figure out exactly where in the inky blackness the breathing came from. 

Whoa-ahhh. Whoa-ahhhh. 

Somewhere to my right? 

I knew I had to walk over there and snatch the Grool. But I was afraid to let 
go of the ladder. Finally, I decided to count my steps there, find the Grool—then 
count the same number of steps back to the ladder. 

I swallowed hard and let go of the ladder. I stepped into the blackness and 
started counting. 

“One... two... three... four...” 

The breathing sounded a little closer. 

“Five... six...” 

I stopped. I listened hard. 

“Huh?” I cried to myself. “What’s that scratching sound?” Then I saw the 
eyes. Not the Grool’s small, round eyes. Big, bright eyes. Several pairs of them. 
All glowing at me in the dark. 



21 


The scratching grew louder. The eyes stared up at me. 

Yellow eyes. Glowing in the darkness. 

I heard a creature scrabble over the floor. Felt something warm and furry 
brush against my leg. 

Were they raccoons? Rats? 

I didn’t want to know. 

Another one brushed against me. They were all starting to scrape around on 
the sewer floor. They were growing restless. 

I forced myself to breathe. 

Turned. 

And started to run. 

Get me out of here! I thought. Get me out of here before they attack! 

My sneakers slid over the damp, slimy floor. 

“Please let me find my way out of here,” I prayed as I stumbled through the 
darkness. 

“Oww!” 

My knee slammed into something hard. 

I cried out and reached for something to lean on. 

And caught hold of the ladder. 

“Yes! Yes!” I cried happily. 

Ignoring my throbbing knee, I scrambled up the slimy rungs. Up, up, up 
toward the light. 

“Daniel—help me out!” I cried. 

Daniel leaned down and grabbed my hands. He helped pull me out of that 
awful hole. 

I fell on to the pavement and nearly sobbed with relief. 

Daniel dropped down next to me. “Did you get it?” he asked eagerly. “Did 
you find it?” 

I wiped my sludge-covered hands on my jeans. “No,” I told him. “No 
Grool.” 

“I should have gone down there,” he declared. “I definitely would have 



found it.” 

“You definitely would have been terrified!” I replied angrily. “There were 
animals down there. Rats, maybe. Dozens of them.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” he said, rolling his eyes. He sighed. “Now what do we do?” 
He kicked a pebble across the street. 

I sighed. “Don’t worry—we’ll find the Grool.” 

“But how?” he cried. “We can’t even find Killer. We’ll never find a little 
sponge.” 

I had never seen Daniel this upset. “Daniel, the police will find Killer. I 
know they will,” I said softly. 

“We must have missed the sponge,” he said, ignoring my words. “We have 
to check everywhere again.” 

We started to search again. In the street. In the grass. Behind hedges. Under 
trees. 

Carlo appeared as we were about to give up. He was walking fine. He 
examined his mangled bike. Then he helped us with our search. 

The afternoon sun was settling behind the trees. The air felt cooler. Evening 
was approaching. 

I sank down on the sidewalk, feeling totally hopeless. 

The warning in the encyclopedia kept running through my mind. Was it 
possible? Could it be true? If we didn’t find the Grool, would my life really be 
over by tomorrow? 

“There it is!” 

Daniel’s excited shout interrupted my frightening thoughts. 

“There it is!” my brother cried happily. “I see it! I see the Grool!” 



22 


Daniel took off, running full speed. 

“Way to go!” My heart pounding, I leaped up from the sidewalk. “You are 
the most awesome brother in the entire universe!” 

I was so excited and happy, I threw my arms around Carlo. “He saved my 
life!” I shouted. “He saved my life!” 

“Hey—give me a break!” Carlo cried, squirming away. 

I hurried after Daniel. I watched him bend down to pick up something. 
Something small and round and brown. 

But a gust of wind rolled the Grool away from him. 

“Hey—!” he cried out. He stumbled after it. The wind blew it out of his 
reach again. 

“Got you!” Daniel cried, pouncing on it. 

“Bring it here!” I yelled. 

“Oh, wow,” he murmured. His face fell. “Sorry about that. It’s not the 
Grool.” 

I grabbed the thing from his hands. “No, it’s not,” I whispered sadly. 

Not the Grool. Only a brown paper bag, all wadded up in a ball. 

Daniel hurled the paper bag to the ground and stomped on it. 

My stomach lurched. I really felt sick. 

Time is running out, I thought. And we have no idea where the Grool might 
be. 

A tear came to my eye, and I blinked it away quickly. I didn’t want Daniel 
and Carlo to see how scared I was. 

The panic rose in my chest. Would I really die if we didn’t find that evil 
creature? 

I suddenly pictured Mom and Dad sitting around crying and missing me. I 
pictured Aunt Louise wailing, “It’s all my fault. I didn’t believe her.” 

I imagined Daniel walking to school all alone. 

I gazed down at my brother, who slumped sadly on the curb with Carlo. 

And I had a truly terrifying idea. Maybe the Grool xvasn ’t lost. 

Maybe the creepy little creature had decided to hide. 



To hide from me. 

So it could perform its most evil trick of all. 

Hide for twenty-four hours so that I’d have the ultimate bad luck. 

Death! 

Carlo startled me by jumping to his feet. His dark eyes glowed excitedly. “I 
—I have an idea!” he cried. 

“An idea?” I demanded. “What kind of idea?” 

He smiled at me and grabbed my arm. “Come on. Hurry. I think I know 
where the Grool might be!” 



23 


“You know those guys who raced me?” Carlo asked, tugging me forward along 
the street. “The ones who hang out at the playground?” 

“Yeah. What about them?” I asked. 

“HI bet one of them picked up the Grool. I kind of remember—” 

Daniel didn’t even wait for Carlo to finish the sentence. “Let’s go!” he 
shouted. He sprang onto his bike and raced off toward the playground. 

I picked up my bike and started pedaling after my brother. Carlo ran behind 
us, calling, “Wait up! Wait up!” 

We pedaled to the playground and walked our bikes to the baseball field. 
That’s where the older kids usually hang out. 

“There they are,” Carlo said. He pointed to a group of boys taking turns 
batting and fielding balls. 

“Carlo,” Daniel whispered nervously. “Those guys are really big. They look 
like they’re in high school.” 

I spotted two older boys standing on the side of the baseball field. Their 
heads were bent, and they were staring at something in the taller boy’s hands. 

Something small and round and brown. 

The Grool! 

I ran up to them. “Hey, how’s it going?” I said in my friendliest voice. “I 
know this sounds dumb, but you’ve got my favorite sponge. Can I have it back?” 

The tall boy narrowed his eyes at me. He was kind of good-looking, with 
bright green eyes, and straight blond hair down over his shoulders. 

“Your favorite sponge?” he repeated. He grinned. “Sorry. You’re mistaken. 
This is my favorite sponge.” 

“No. Really,” I insisted. “It fell off that kid’s bike.” I pointed to Carlo. He 
and Daniel stood watching from a distance. “I really need it.” 

“Can you prove it’s yours?” the boy demanded. He rolled it around in his 
hand. “I don’t see your name on it.” 

I narrowed my eyes and gave him my meanest glare. “You’d better give it 
back to me,” I threatened. “Because it’s not really a sponge. It’s evil. It brings 
bad luck to anyone who has it.” 

“Oooh, I’m really scared,” he teased. “Maybe it’s bad luck for you— 



because you’re not getting it back!” 

He waved the Grool in front of my face, then called to his friend, “Hey, 
Dave. Catch!” 

He tossed the Grool to Dave. “Here,” he snickered. “Catch some bad luck!” 

“Hey, give me that!” I leaped for the Grool. But the sponge sailed high over 
my head. 

Back and forth they threw the Grool, laughing, keeping it high over my 
head, out of my reach. 

They were having fun. I wasn’t. 

After ten minutes of their stupid keep-away game, I gave up. 

Fine, I thought. Let them play with the Grool. 

They would soon find out that it didn’t play fair, I thought nastily. 

As I backed off, I shouted at the two older boys, “You’ll be sorry.” 

The blond guy shrugged his shoulders, laughed, and hurried off to take his 
turn at bat. He made a big show of tucking the sponge into his back pocket— 
where he knew I couldn’t get it. 

He stepped to the plate, crouched in a batter’s stance... 

Thwock! 

The very first pitch beaned the guy in the head. 

His eyes rolled around wildly. He wobbled, then sank to the ground. He 
collapsed in a heap and didn’t move. 

“Help!” the other boys were shouting. “Somebody—help!” 

The Grool had done its work. The bad luck had struck again! 

“Is he okay?” Daniel asked. “Is he—?” 

I didn’t answer. I saw the Grool roll out of the boy’s back pocket and onto 
the ground. 

I darted forward and dove for the evil sponge. 

But my hands closed around dry grass. 

Dave, the blond boy’s friend, snatched the Grool before I could reach it. 

“Go chase it!” he cried. He heaved the little creature high into the sky. 



24 


I made a desperate grab. But Dave was much taller than me. He caught the Grool 
easily. 

“Here. Take it,” he said. He tossed it at me. Then he hurried over to check 
on his friend. 

The blond boy was sitting up now, rubbing his head. “I’m okay,” he kept 
repeating. “Really. I’m okay. What hit me?” 

Daniel and I hurried to our bikes. Carlo came running after us. I tossed the 
Grool into my bike basket. 

The sponge creature pulsed so violently that the basket shook as I rode. Its 
body changed from red to black, red to black, changing in time to its horrible 
breathing. 

Ba-boom. Ba-boom. 

It snickered with joy. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

It acted so pleased with itself. So happy it had knocked the blond boy out. 

“You’re disgusting!” I shouted. “I’m taking you home and locking you in 
that cage!” 

I pedaled rapidly, standing up for an extra boost of speed. Home, I thought. 
Get me home. 

I zoomed down Oak Street, hunching over the bike with my head down. 
Faster, faster I pedaled. 

The wind whipped my hair into my eyes. 

I heard Daniel calling out from behind me. 

But I was riding too fast. The wind rushed past me. I couldn’t make out 
Daniel’s words. 

I heard him call out again. 

And then I heard the blare of a horn and the shrill squeal of brakes. 

I turned around in time to see an enormous black and silver truck skidding 
over the street, about to crush me like a bug. 



25 


I squeezed my brakes hard. 

The truck skidded up behind me, tires scraping the pavement, horn blaring. 

My bike lurched to a stop—and I tumbled off. 

Hit the pavement hard on my elbows and knees. 

The bike bounced on to the curb. Toppled over. 

I rolled on to the grass. 

As the truck swerved away. Squealed to a stop. 

Missed me by less than a foot. 

I climbed shakily to my feet. And stood there on the side of the road, too 
terrified to move. 

I turned to see the truck driver toss open the door of his cab. “What were 
you doing in the middle of the street?” he shouted at me. “I could have killed 
you! Do your parents know you’re out here like this?” 

Great, I thought bitterly. First this guy almost squashes me into a pancake— 
then he yells at me. 

“Sorry!” I called. 

What else could I say? 

I waited for the truck driver to back up and drive away. 

And all the time, I kept thinking: Bad luck forever. I’m going to have bad 
luck forever. 

I called to Daniel and Carlo that I was okay. Then I raced down Oak Street 
and turned on to Maple. 

Only two houses to go, I thought. I pushed down harder on the pedals. 

Blam! 

My front tire hit something. A broken bottle, I think. 

The bike toppled on to its side, and I fell with it. 

“Ow!” I cried. I’m spending a lot of time on the ground, I realized. 

I examined the tire. Completely shredded. 

Bad luck. Bad luck forever. 

Heh, heh, heh. I heard the Grool’s wicked laugh. 

The sound filled me with rage. I kicked the bicycle and stubbed my toe on 



the metal wheel rim. 

“Oww!” I yelped, grabbing my foot. 

Bad luck. Bad luck forever. 

With a furious cry, I grabbed the evil sponge and flung it to the ground. 
Then I jumped back on my bike and started to run over the Grool. 

Back and forth, back and forth. 

Squishing the evil creature into the ground. 

“Stop it! Stop!” Daniel screamed, riding up onto the grass. “You can’t kill 
the Grool. You’re only giving it what it wants.” 

I glared at my brother. I struggled to catch my breath. 

“Look at it!” Daniel shouted, pointing. “The Grool is getting even more 
excited. You’re helping it, not hurting it!” 

I lowered my eyes to the Grool. It pulsed faster than before. An evil light 
shone from its ugly little eyes. Its blood-red body gleamed in the afternoon sun. 

Heh, heh, heh. 

The cruel snicker cut through the air like fingernails on a blackboard. 

I grabbed my bike and wheeled it to our driveway. I let it fall on to the 
asphalt. 

Then I ran back to the Grool, gripped it tightly in one hand, and carried it 
into the house. 

Daniel followed close behind me. “Now what are you going to do?” he 
asked. 

“You’ll see,” I said. I made my way into the kitchen. 

My heart pounded. I could feel the blood racing at my temples. 

I jammed the Grool into the kitchen sink drain. Then I grabbed a wooden 
spatula and stabbed at the Grool, shoving it deep into the pipe. 

Daniel stood beside me, watching in silence. 

I turned the hot water on full force. I flicked a switch next to the sink and 
smiled at my brother. 

The garbage disposal gurgled on. 

The gurgle became a whine. 

The whine became a roar as the grinding teeth went to work. 

“Yes!” I cried happily. “Yes!” 

A few seconds later, the disposal had ground up the Grool. 

“That’s the end of that,” I told Daniel, sighing happily. I listened to the 
pipes run clean. “Down the drain! Yaaay!” 



Carlo came running into the kitchen. “What’s happening?” he cried 
breathlessly. “Where’s the Grool?” 

I turned to Carlo, grinning. “It’s gone. The Grool is gone!” I announced 
gleefully. 

Then I heard my brother gasp. 

I saw his mouth drop open as he stared down at the sink. “No, it’s not.” His 
voice was so low, I could barely hear him. “No, it’s not gone,” he whispered. 



26 


I lowered my eyes to the sink. 

And realized at once what had horrified Daniel. 

The hot water had started to back up. 

It splashed and spurted up from the drain. As if something were pushing it 
with great force. 

The hot water churned quickly—rolling up from the pipe below. 

“I don’t believe it!” Carlo cried. 

The Grool popped up, bobbing in the churning hot water. 

There it was. Still in one piece. It had turned bright purple, an angry purple. 
As I stared down at it in horror, it thumped wildly in the sink. 

“No!” I screamed. “It’s impossible! You can’t be back!! You can’t!” 

I grabbed the sopping wet Grool and squeezed it as hard as I could. 

A river of water ran out of the slimy thing and into the sink. 

The harder I gripped, the warmer the Grool felt. 

Warmer and warmer and... 

“Ow!” I dropped it as it became scorching hot. Quickly, I ran my hands 
under soothing cold water. 

The Grool perched on the side of the sink. It throbbed with joy, leered up at 
me with its creepy eyes, and let out an evil cackle. 

“Daniel, Carlo,” I moaned. “There has to be a way to kill this thing! There 
has to! Think, guys!” 

But the two of them stared in silence at the throbbing Grool. 

“Come on, Daniel—think!” I waved my hand in front of Daniel’s face. 
“Help me! I’m all out of ideas.” 

Suddenly, his eyes came back into focus. “I’ve got an idea,” he said quietly. 

He rushed out of the kitchen. “I’ll be right back,” he shouted, leaving Carlo 
and me alone with the nasty creature. 

“I hate you!” I shouted at it. But my anger seemed to make it pulse faster. 

A short while later, Daniel hurried back into the room. “Maybe this will 
help,” he announced. He set the Encyclopedia of the Weird on the kitchen table. 

“I borrowed it from the library,” he explained. “I thought we might need it.” 



He started to search for “Grool” in the index. 

“Oh, Daniel,” I sighed wearily. “We’ve already read everything in that book 
about Grools. It can’t help us.” 

“But maybe you missed something important,” Carlo insisted. 

Daniel flipped through the pages of the encyclopedia. “Here’s the part about 
killing the Grool,” he said. “Let’s see what it says.” 

He started reading: “The Grool cannot be killed—by force or by any violent 
means. ” 

“That’s it?” I demanded. “There’s nothing else?” 

Daniel slammed the book shut. “Nothing else,” he replied sadly. “Kat, it 
really can’t be killed. It’s the most evil creature in the world and it can’t be 
killed. Not by force. Not by violence. Not by anything.” 

“Not by force,” I repeated, thinking hard. “Not by violence.” 

I stared at the throbbing, purple creature. 

“Hmmmm.” I couldn’t help but smile. 

“Kat? What’s your problem?” Daniel demanded. “Are you totally losing it? 
Why are you smiling?” 

“Because the Grool can be killed,” I announced. “And I’ve just figured out 
how to do it.” 

“Huh?” Carlo cried. “You’ve really figured it out?” 

“What are you going to do?” Daniel demanded. “You can’t kill it. It always 
conies back to life.” 

I shook my head. “We’ll see,” I replied. 

I wanted to think my plan through before I explained it to them. 

Actually, it turned out to be pretty simple. 



27 


Much as I hated to, I picked up the throbbing Grool from the sink and held it 
gently in my hands. 

I patted the disgusting creature tenderly on its wrinkled head. Then I sang to 
it sweetly: 

“Lullaby and good night, little Grool, I love you. Please sleep tight, little 
Grool, la la la, la la la.” 

“Kat, I’m worried about you,” Daniel groaned. “Stop it, okay? You’re a 
little messed up. You need to lie down.” 

But I just kept singing as sweetly as I could. 

“What is she doing?” Daniel asked Carlo. “Do you get it?” 

Carlo shook his head. 

I didn’t pay any attention to them. 

I had to concentrate. 

I forced myself to stroke the Grool lovingly. I hugged the slimy thing and 
cuddled it in my arms—as I would a soft puppy. 

I cooed in its ear: 

“Little Grool, cute Grool, you are so nice, so sweet, so wonderful. I love 
you, Grool.” 

“Kat, please stop,” Daniel begged. “You’re upsetting me. I’m really worried 
about you, Kat.” 

“How can you pet the thing?” Carlo demanded. “It’s so gross!” 

“Sweet, Grool,” I whispered. “So sweet.” I cuddled it tenderly and stroked 
its wrinkled skin. 

If this doesn’t work, I told myself, nothing will. 

“I’m going to get Mom and Dad,” Daniel threatened. He started backing 
toward the kitchen door. 

“Ssshhh.” I raised a finger to my lips. Then I pointed down at the Grool 
cradled in my arms. “Look, guys.” 

The Grool’s violent throbbing had slowed to a gentle pulse. 

I sang some more, softly, gently, sweetly. 

And we all watched in amazement as the Grool’s color faded. From red to 



pink, and—finally—back to its ordinary dull brown color. 

“Wow!” Daniel whistled. 

“Keep watching,” I said, hugging the Grool closely. I sang another lullaby. 

The Grool let out a low sigh. I could see it shrinking, see it drying up in my 
arms. 

Its eyes closed. The dry, brown skin covered them up. 

“It—it’s getting weaker, Kat,” Daniel whispered excitedly. 

“Keep watching,” I told him. Then I cooed to the Grool, “There, there little 
Grool. What a sweet Grool.” I rocked it like a baby. 

The Grool’s breathing slowed—slowed—then stopped. 

The Grool slumped lifelessly in my hand. Not a sound. Not a throb. Not a 
twitch. 

“Now, check this out!” I announced to Daniel and Carlo. 

I raised the wrinkled sponge to my face—and planted a big fat kiss on it. 



28 


The two boys made disgusted faces. 

But I knew what I was doing. 

I lowered the Grool from my face and studied it carefully. 

“Aaaaaaaah. ” The sponge let out a long, slow sigh—and shrank into a tiny 

ball. 

I took a deep breath and blew. 

The tiny ball flew apart. Dry, brown puffs floated into the air. 

I watched the feathery puffs float to the floor. Then I wiped my hands off on 
a towel. “All done.” 

“It—it’s gone!” Carlo declared. 

“But how?” Daniel demanded. 

“Well, you helped give me the idea,” I told him. 

“I did?” 

“Yes,” I replied. “When you read that part of the encyclopedia that said the 
Grool can’t be killed by force or violence.” 

I smiled. “I kept going over that in my mind. And finally, it hit me.” 

“What hit you?” Carlo asked. 

“I knew the Grool couldn’t be killed by force or violence,” I explained. 
“But what about the opposite? I guessed that no one had ever tried being nice to 
it before.” 

Both boys stared at me in rapt silence. “That gave me the idea that being 
kind was the secret to destroying the Grool,” I continued. “And it worked. The 
Grool was so evil that it couldn’t stand being loved.” 

“Wow!” Carlo breathed. 

“Excellent!” Daniel exclaimed. “I’m glad I came up with it.” 

“Yeah, it’s great to have a genius in the family,” I said sarcastically. 

I reached into my back pocket and pulled out the twelve dollars my 
grandma had sent for my birthday. “What do you say we celebrate with ice¬ 
cream?” I suggested with a grin. 

“Excellent!” the two boys cried happily. 

“Maybe our luck will change now,” I told Daniel. “I bet we become the 



luckiest family on the block.” 

Then I heard it. That familiar, terrifying, breathing sound again. 

I swung around and faced the door. 

“What’s that?” I cried, my heart sinking. “Do you hear it, too?” 

Yes. We all heard it. 

My throat felt dry. Cold chills ran down my back. The breathing grew 
louder. Closer. “I didn’t kill it,” I moaned. “It’s back. It’s back!” 



29 


Daniel grabbed my hand. I could see the fear on his face. 

Carlo took a step back from the door. He backed up till he bumped against 
the kitchen counter. 

We huddled together in the kitchen, afraid to move. Afraid to go look. 

“We have no choice,” I choked out finally. “If it’s back, we have to let it 

in.” 

I took a deep breath. My legs didn’t want to carry me. They felt as if they 
were made of lead. 

But I forced myself to the back door. 

My entire body trembled as I reached for the doorknob. And yanked the 
door open. 

“Oh!” I let out a startled cry. 

Killer gazed up at me, breathing noisily, his stub of a tail wagging furiously. 

“Killer!” I yelled joyfully. “You’re back!” I bent down to hug him. But the 
dog ran past me, into the kitchen. 

Daniel let out a happy cry and pulled the wiggling dog into his arms. Killer 
covered Daniel’s face with wet licks. 

“Our luck has changed!” I declared. 

I looked outside. 

Wow! Healthy green grass covered the ground. The flowers lifted their 
drooping heads and burst back into dazzling color as I watched. 

All of the Grool’s evil seemed to be disappearing. 

I grabbed Killer and hugged him hard. “Killer, Killer,” I crooned. “We got 
rid of the Grool.” 

“Come on,” Daniel cried. “Ice-cream time!” 

I set Killer back on the floor and kissed him on the head. “We’ll be back 
soon, boy,” I said. 

“To the ice-cream parlor!” Daniel shouted as he dashed outside. “Race 
you!” he cried as he ran down the street. “The winner gets a triple-decker 
sundae!” 

Carlo and I took off after Daniel. I pumped my legs hard and pulled out in 
front. 



But at the last minute, Daniel pushed past me and tagged the door of the 
restaurant. “I won!” Daniel cried happily. 

We hurried into the ice-cream parlor. “Table for three,” Daniel said with a 
grin. The waitress seated us, handed out menus, and wiped the table with a... 
sponge! 

“Yuck! Get that thing out of here!” Daniel shrieked. 

The waitress didn’t understand. But we all laughed—for the first time in 
weeks. 

“Don’t mind my brother,” I said. “He’s got a thing about sponges.” He 
kicked me under the table, and I pinched him back hard. 

The waitress rolled her eyes. Then she took our orders. 

As we shoveled down our sundaes, I realized how hungry I was—and how 
happy I was. 

The Grool was gone—forever. 

We were so full that we practically rolled back home. 

“Killer. Here, boy!” I pushed the back door open and stepped into the 
kitchen. 

“Hey—Killer? Come here! Aren’t you glad to see us?” 

Killer didn’t turn around. 

He stood at the sink, growling and wagging his tail. He had his nose pressed 
up against the cabinet door, trying to push it open. 

“All right, Killer. We had our ice-cream. Now it’s time for your treat,” I 

said. 

I put down a fresh bowl of dog food—and added a few small pieces of last 
night’s turkey. 

“Come on Killer. Dinnertime,” I called. 

He growled at the cabinet underneath the sink. 

What’s going on? This dog never walks away from a meal, I thought. 
“Killer,” Daniel said, “what are you doing under there? Killer?” 

I bent down and petted the dog’s back. “Killer, there’s nothing in there. The 
Grool is gone.” 

But Killer kept growling. 

“Okay, okay.” I yanked the cabinet door open for the dog. “See?” 

Killer shoved his head inside. 

I grabbed him by the scruff of his neck and pulled him out. He carried 



something in his teeth. 

“What is that, boy?” Daniel asked. 

Killer dropped his find on the floor, then gazed up at me. 

I picked it up. Hmmm. Something hard. Lumpy. 

“What is it?” Daniel asked, stepping close. 

I breathed a sigh of relief. “No problem. It’s only a potato.” 
I started to hand it to Daniel. 

But something sharp pricked my finger. 

“Ow!” I cried, startled. 

I rolled the potato over in my hand. 

It felt warm. I could feel it breathing. 

“Daniel, I don’t like the looks of this,” I murmured. 

The potato had a mouth full of teeth. 

